IEO 4






The main street that ran through the village of Shelter was little more than a wide dirt path. The homes that ran along both sides of it were squat buildings with thatch roofs. The sound of people talking and the creaking of wood could be heard off in the distance. Nothing looked broken or ruined, but everything looked like it had been patched several times.

Geralhd walked through the front door of the house where he was staying. It led into a small kitchen. Khita and Blacknail followed him. As Geralhd threw some water into a pot and lit a small fire in his stove, both his guests sat down at the table in the center of the room.

“So you didn’t answer me before. Why are you here?” Geralhd asked after he joined them a few moments later.

“You owe me more cheese. I don’t have any left,” Blacknail immediately told him. His voice was rather intense, because he was rather upset about it.

Geralhd rolled his eyes, but before he could reply, there was a knock on the front door and someone spoke up from outside. “It’s me, Tannin. I heard you had some guests a visiting so I decided to stop on by.”

“Come one in. I just put some water on for tea,” Geralhd replied after letting out a deep sigh. The young man then turned and gave Blacknail a meaningful look.

“Be good,” he told the hobgoblin.

“I’m always good. You humans are the ones who always mess things up. Do better,” Blacknail replied dismissively. As the leader, he was the only one that got to judge people’s performances.

The front door then swung open and Tannin stepped inside. The bearded old man gave them all a polite nod of greeting. There was a friendly smile on his face and his eyes held a warm twinkle. Blacknail decided that this meant the old man wanted something. The hobgoblin was getting used to humans’ strange ways.

“I see you’re still alive, young lass,” Tannin told Khita. “A few of the others had a bet going. Most of them thought you’d die or come crawling back here within a day or two. Living out in the forest is rough going for anyone, let alone a young woman.”

“I can take care of myself,” Khita replied scornfully. “I don’t need anyone telling me what to do, where to live, or how to survive. Tell those old hags you stuck me with before to mind their own damn business. They can shove their etiquette where the sun don’t shine.”

Her angry words just caused Tannin to chuckle loudly and grin wider. He looked quite amused.

“I take it that means you plan on staying out in the forest for a while longer?” he asked her playfully.

“Yes, I do,” she replied in a chilly tone.

Tannin nodded and then turned towards the cloaked hobgoblin. “And I see Blacknail is being as mysterious as always. Do you ever not wear a hood?”

“Yes,” Blacknail replied as he waited for his tea. He hoped it wasn’t the bitter kind. For now, Tannin had nothing the hobgoblin wanted, so talking to him wasn’t important.

Geralhd got up and pulled out a chair for Tannin, and then they both sat down. The two made small talk for a few moments, and Blacknail fought the urge to close his eyes and take a nap. When was he going to get his tea? He tried glaring at Geralhd to get his point across, but the man ignored him. He wasn’t a very good minion. Blacknail was going to have to do something about that later.

“Why don’t you ask for Blacknail’s help?” Khita suddenly asked. The use of his name caused Blacknail to focus back on what everyone was saying. He hadn’t been paying attention at all, so he had no idea what they were talking about.

“Does he know a lot about goblins?” Tannin asked. Blacknail felt a small tingle of panic, but the man sounded friendly and curious.

“I dare say, he is one of the utmost experts on the subject,” Geralhd replied with obvious amusement.

“I suppose he must have run into a lot of them out in the wild Green,” Tannin mused aloud.

Blacknail had been about to claim complete ignorance about goblins, but since Geralhd had spoken up, he decided to go along with it. This must an important conversation. Food was probably involved.

“You’re having a problem with goblins?” Blacknail asked as he straightened up in his chair.

“Ya, you could bloody well say that!” Tannin huffed in frustration. “We’ve suddenly been overrun by an infestation of the little pests. They’re getting into everything! The thieving is bad but it’s the destruction they leave in their wake that is the real damned problem. They’re spoiling more food than they actually steal. Every day we lose vital supplies.”

Tannin sounded and looked like he wanted to hit something. He was holding one hand up and was clenching it tightly into a fist. This topic was obviously making him angry. Blacknail could use that. Tannin could probably be convinced to offer a tasty reward to anyone who solved his problem.

As the old man continued to ramble on about spoiled grain, Blacknail heard a scratching noise from the far window. He looked out of the corner of his eye and noticed a green flash of movement. It was a goblin, a familiar one. Ferrar had caught up to them and was peeking in through the window.

“This batch even seems smarter than usual,” Tannin continued. “They sniff out poison, and they even avoid all our traps! The weighted barrel trap used to catch them by the dozen, but when young Raius checked it last night it was empty. Not only that, but somehow the goblins actually managed to disarm it and make off with the bait! If I didn’t know better, I would swear they were listening in on us and learning to counter our plans.”

“That’s silly; goblins aren’t that smart,” Blacknail quickly agreed in a flat voice as he turned away from the goblin in the window and focused on Tannin’s face. He needed to focus on manipulating the foolish human.

“Probably not, but something’s going on here. Do do you have any special tricks up your sleeves for dealing with the bloody things?”

“There is nothing up my sleeves but my human arms, but I do know some tricks,” Blacknail replied carefully. He didn’t want to give himself away.

There was moment of awkward silence, so Blacknail spoke up again. “I usually set bait out for them and then shoot them. Have you tried that?”

Blacknail had just made that up, but it was the best he could come up with on short notice, and it even sounded like it could work. When Blacknail wanted to chase goblins away he simply gave them chores. He usually never saw them again after that.

However, this idea didn’t appear to appease Tanin. The old man frowned and shook his head. He opened his mouth as if to speak but Khita cut him off.

“Blacknail, you’re forgetting one obvious solution,” she interjected.

“I am not,” Blacknail hissed at her. She was dumb.

“You keep the wild goblins away by training other goblins to guard your stuff. Mr. Tannin could do the same thing. There is no reason he can’t.” Khita shot back.

Blacknail grunted sourly. He hadn’t forgotten that. It was just a really stupid thing to bring up. Was she trying to expose his true identity and ruin his plans? Probably not, she was just stupid.

“Guard goblins?” Tannin asked doubtfully. He didn’t seem sure if Khita was joking or not, but he clearly found the idea hilarious. There was an amused grin on his bearded face.

“That’s what he does, and it works,” Khita replied defiantly. She then shrugged like she didn’t much care what he thought, even though it was obvious she did.

As he turned towards Khita, Blacknail sighed and gave her an annoyed glare. Seriously? Why was she bringing this up? This idea was so dumb only a human could have thought of it. Tannin would never consider such a dumb plan.

“My old master used to do it,” Blacknail explained after turning towards Tannin. “Goblins are territorial so if you take one in then it will drive the others away, but even trained goblins can be very annoying and get into trouble.”

“Huh, that actually doesn’t sound completely unreasonable,” Tannin mused as he looked off to the side contemplatively. “At this point I’d try almost anything, and feeding one goblin would cost us less than feeding a hundred of the gods damned despoilers.”

Under his hood, both of Blacknail’s eyes widened from surprise. Khita’s plan was so stupid it might actually work! He couldn’t waste this opportunity to take advantage of how weird humans were. Letting the humans get used to goblins would suit Blacknail’s purposes. It would also allow him to spy on the humans without concern, although apparently it wasn’t that hard. Even feral goblins could do it. Ferrar was still looking in through the window, and Blacknail had no doubt that he knew exactly what was going on.

“Er, I happen to have some goblins you could borrow,” Blacknail suggested. He had to press his advantage. “They know some simple commands and will keep out of trouble. Geralhd and the others can help you train them, so within a few days you should see a lot less goblin thefts.”

“How exactly do you train goblins?” Tannin asked. It sounded like he was seriously considering the idea.

“Mostly you just hit them a lot and offer them food. They only get into trouble if they get hungry,” Blacknail told him.

The water finally finished boiling and the shrill whistle of the kettle on the stove filled the air. As Geralhd got up and served the tea, everyone continued to discuss the goblin problem. Eventually, Tannin agreed to accept a pair of goblins from Blacknail.

With that decided, Blacknail and Khita excused themselves. Geralhd had promised to give Blacknail some cheese when they stopped by on their way out of the village, and they had finished their tea, so there was little point in sticking around. They still had to go track down Joan and ask her a few questions for Scamp and Imp.

“I suppose you youngsters don’t want to hang around here with an old man like me,” Tannin laughed as they were leaving. “Although, I suppose I have no idea how old you are, Blacknail.”

“Er… I’m ten,” the hobgoblin answered him. That was a good age for a human right?

“You’re ten?” Tannin repeated in disbelief. Uh oh, he seemed suspicious. Was that too low?

“Ten and a half?” Blacknail suggested.

“Ha ha, Blacknail is such a joker,” Geralhd laughed. His laughter was awkwardly loud and there was a stiff smile on his face.

“Get out of here and let me talk to Tannin,” he added as he motioned for Blacknail to leave. The hobgoblin immediately did as he was told and fled.

Once outside, Blacknail and Khita headed towards where they had met Joan during their last visit, and the sound of little footsteps followed them.

They passed by a few villagers as they walked and Blacknail gave them polite nods. When they got to their destination, Joan wasn’t there, so Khita went to find her while Blacknail waited.

“Hello again, Mr. Blacknail. How can I help you?” Joan asked when she arrived alongside a proud looking Khita. The young blonde woman was wearing a long homespun dress and there was a polite but curious expression on her face.

Blacknail didn’t immediately respond. He just stared at her blankly. What had he wanted to ask her again? Ferrar had been the one who had wanted to talk to her. He couldn’t remember what the goblin had told him…

“Um…” he mumbled aloud to buy time.

Thankfully, he didn’t have long to wait. Ferrar appeared from behind the corner of a nearby building. The little goblin looked extremely excited. He practically bounced as he ran over to join the conversation.

“Ask her about the color of clay matters, sometimes it goes black,” the goblin suggested as he grabbed Blacknail’s pants and looked up at the hobgoblin with wide eyes that shone with excitement.

“Does the color of the clay matter? Sometimes it’s black?” Blacknail repeated uncertainly at Joan.

There was no immediate reply. The blonde girl studied Blacknail and the goblin for several long seconds. She was squinting at them, and she seemed unsure of something.

“Is the goblin asking the question? I think that’s what I just heard,” she asked in disbelief.

This called for some skillful evasion of the truth.

“We’re both asking,” Blacknail answered. “He likes to talk, even if it’s nonsense, but you know that. He was here before.”

“Hmm, are you sure this is the same goblin? It looks a little different...”

“Yep, he is the same, and his name is Scamp,” Blacknail replied cheerily as he nudged Ferrar with his foot. The little pest had better play along.

“I’m Scamp and I’ve visited you before. That happened,” Ferrar quickly agreed as he nodded along enthusiastically. He was a smart little pest.

“How many talking goblins do you think there are? This is the same one as before,” Khita added as she laughed. Her words seemed to convince Joan, although Blacknail wasn’t sure why anyone would take her word over his. It was kind of insulting to be judged lower than Khita in any way....

Ferrar left Blacknail’s side and wandered over to Joan. The young woman continued to stare at the goblin suspiciously, but she didn’t back away. Ferrar began to ask her question after question and she answered them one by one. Blacknail and Khita hung back and tried to look interested. It was hard. Making clay pottery was apparently much more complicated than Blacknail had thought.

After talking for a few minutes, Joan led Ferrar inside of a shed and showed him around. Ferrar kept up his barrage of questions as they walked past several shelves. They stopped in front of an oven for few moments and Joan opened its door to show Ferrar. Blacknail peered inside as well, but it was empty and boring. Could they leave now?

“Alright time to go. We have important things to do,” Blacknail announced after a few minutes. He’d had enough. Looking at the oven had made him hungry.

“I’ll come visit you again!” the goblin told Joan as he smiled happily.

“I look forward to it,” Joan replied. She still didn’t seem to know what to make of the goblin and his questions, so she just smiled back politely.

With their farewells complete, Joan left to walk home and Ferrar disappeared. The goblin couldn’t leave by the front door with them and had to sneak out. That left Khita and Blacknail alone again.

“Let’s get out of here before we run into one of the old ladies that live here. I swear the hags have nothing better to do than bug me,” Khita complained as she turned to watch the street. She looked in both directions as if she was afraid someone was trying to sneak up on her.

On the way out of the village, they stopped by Geralhd’s again. Blacknail still needed to pick up his cheese. By this time, Tannin was gone and Geralhd met them at the door.

“Here you go. Someday soon I think I’m going to have to check out this base of yours,” Geralhd remarked as he handed the package of cheese over to Blacknail. It smelled like a good batch. He could tell because, it burned his nose when he tried to sniff it.

“Er… you can’t do that,” Blacknail told him as he tucked the precious bit of dairy away in his cloak. Geralhd didn’t know about Elyias or the horde of goblins there.

“Why not?” Geralhd asked. The quick reply had made him curious.

“It’s… a secret?” Blacknail muttered uncertainly. The cheese fumes were still clouding his brain. He was still seeing flashes of color.

One of Geralhd’s eyebrows rose. “You have a secret base?”

A grimace appeared on Blacknail’s face. It sounded dumb when Geralhd said it like that.

“There’s a huge wolf pack in the area. They’ve been acting aggressively so it wouldn’t be safe,” Khita added.

“Ya, that,” Blacknail agreed. How was Khita being so helpful? She had covered for him several times. It was weird. The hobgoblin scratched his nose. Maybe he was just having an off day?

“Oh, well take care of yourselves,” Geralhd told them. At the first sign of danger he had completely changed his mind about joining them.

“We’re not afraid of any wolves,” Khita replied confidently. Blacknail didn’t agree with her. He was tactically cautious about anything larger than him that wanted to eat him.

After saying their goodbyes, Blacknail and Khita headed out the village gates. They crossed the fields and met up with Ferrar and the other goblins, who were waiting for them. Well, one goblin was missing, but Blacknail was sure it would show up later, or not. The important thing was that they had accomplished their mission.

“Did you learn what you wanted to?” Blacknail asked Ferrar.

“Yep, I know many new things about fire and clay! I can burn more now,” Ferrar replied eagerly.

“Did you learn how to cook or make better food,” Blacknail asked suspiciously. That was the reason he had agreed to let Ferrar come along.

“Um, yes. I learned about ovens,” the goblin replied carefully.

“Good. Good,” Blacknail muttered as he turned away. He had gotten his hands on cheese, new ways of cooking, and convinced the stupid humans to let goblins inside their village. Things were looking up.








IEO 5










Although Blacknail stopped every time he heard a twig break and studied every bush for signs of slavering monsters, he and the others made it back to the goblin lair without an incident. None of them were picked off by giant wolves, not even Khita. Blacknail didn’t understand how she had survived so long.

The base was much the same as they had left it, which was unsurprising since less than a day had passed. After doing a quick patrol to make sure nothing suspicious was going on, Blacknail retired for the night. He was feeling lazy after so much walking.

When he woke up the next morning and went to grab some breakfast, there were signs of new construction going on. Over by the clay-works the hobgoblin Imp was busy constructing a building of his own. It looked like a smaller version of the longhouse Gob had built, except round. Out in front of it, Ferrar was busy digging a small pit, while goblins piled clay up beside him into a huge heap. As was normal for a project involving goblins, it was chaotic mess as goblins ran about in every direction. Half of them were so dirty they looked like mobile piles of mud. Only around Imp was there any sense of order. The hobgoblin’s presence cowed the nearby goblins.

“What are you doing? Why do you need so much clay?” Blacknail asked Ferrar as he wandered over to take a look. Was the goblin going to fill the hole with clay and bathe in it? Blacknail knew Ferrar really liked clay, but that seemed silly and impractical.

“Building a furnace,” Ferrar answered as he continued to dig energetically.

“Out of clay?”

“Yes, fire hardens it. Fire is great! You use clay and fire to make more clay and more fire. You can never have enough! I need more fire!” Ferrar explained as he gestured energetically at the empty hole in the ground and the pile of clay beside it.

This seemed dumb to Blacknail, but what did he know? He was only the smartest hobgoblin ever to live.

“And you can use it to make food?” Blacknail enquired in a firm tone. It was important to keep everyone’s priorities straight. He was the leader.

“Yep, that too,” the goblin replied absent-mindedly without looking up.

Blacknail rolled his eyes and looked over at Imp for a few moments. The hobgoblin was still busy building the hut and ordering goblins around. Feeling assured that none of his nearby minions were slacking off, going crazy, going crazier, or planning to kill him, Blacknail yawned and went to find some that were. He wanted some excitement.

Eventually, he gave up and decided to head back to Shelter. He had promised to deliver some goblins to them, and that sounded like it would be pretty amusing. After rounding up Khita and a pack of goblins, he headed out back into the forest. Khita was basically part of his disguise. Most of the people in the village seemed to like her, for some reason. However, they also planned to solve their goblin problem by importing more goblins, so they obviously weren’t that smart.

After the walk through the woods, Blacknail and Khita met up with Tannin inside the gates. As promised, they brought a pair of leashed goblins with them. Blacknail had chosen them because they both looked big and lazy. Thus they were large enough to fight off other goblins and not energetic enough to get into trouble. They had both volunteered – after being grabbed and leashed - when they had learned that they would be getting free food without having to do anything to earn it.

“So these are the critters, eh?” Tannin mused as he studied the goblins. He looked and sounded skeptical.

“Yes, I trained them myself,” Blacknail replied. He had smacked them aside the head and told them to behave. That counted as training.

“Do they obey commands?”

“A few simple ones, like sit and come.”

“And having them around will keep other goblins out?”

“Yes, goblins are very territorial.”

These new guards were probably some of the same goblins that had been causing the problems in the first place, but Blacknail wasn’t going to mention that. In his experience, there were a lot of things humans were better off not knowing. It would only bother them.

After explaining a few things and promising to deliver more goblins if the current pair worked out, Blacknail and Khita headed back. As they emerged from the trees around the goblin lair they were presented with a great view of the clearing. Work was being done on building a second longhouse, Imp was building his own small hut, and there were almost a dozen fire-pits scattered around the camp. However, the biggest change was the wall. The barrier of wooden stakes now stretched around almost half the exterior. The clearing had changed drastically since Blacknail had shown up. It used to look like an empty cluster of rocky hills. Now it was beginning to look like a proper base.

Feeling proud of himself, Blacknail decided to stroll around. It wasn’t like he was busy, anyway. Imp’s hut was the most novel change so he decided to check it out again. It also wouldn’t be a bad idea to make sure Imp wasn’t plotting anything dangerous. Blacknail was still expecting an attempt on his life.

As he walked over, Blacknail spotted a heap of stuff piled outside the door of Imp’s home. None of it looked like it had been made by goblin’s hands. There was a pair of iron pots, some glass jars containing random powders or creams, a small pile of silverware, and a live chicken in cage. The terrified bird stared at the hobgoblin with mad eyes. What did Imp want with a live chicken? Was it just a snack or something else entirely? Blacknail had no idea, but he doubted it was part of an assassination attempt, unless Imp planned on poisoning it...

The hobgoblin chieftain looked around for a few seconds, before creeping up to the door and peering inside. He didn’t want to interrupt Imp’s work, or walk into a trap. At first glance, there didn’t appear to be anything suspicious going on inside. Imp was busy hanging things from the ceiling and storing things on crudely made shelves. However, after looking closer Blacknail recognized some of the items. He saw a metal scale and a glass jar from Mahedium’s lab! Imp had been carrying that stuff in his bag, but Blacknail had taken that bag away from him and hidden it after Imp had become a hobgoblin!

“Hey, where did you find that? I hid that bag!” Blacknail asked as he stepped inside and frowned.

Imp jumped slightly in surprise and then spun around. He then studied Blacknail for a quick second before answering. “My bag? I found it in a hollow tree. I just followed my nose. It has a strong smell.”

There was a friendly expression on Imp’s face as Blacknail glowered at him. Damned hobgoblins, Blacknail didn’t like it when they used his own tricks against him. He wished he could outlaw it. It wasn’t fair.

“Did you want it back?” Imp asked respectfully.

“No, you can keep it. I’m a generous leader, so you can consider it a gift,” Blacknail replied. Imp would have already taken out and hidden all the important things anyway.

Since there was nothing else to do here, Blacknail decided to leave. He was a little disappointed. Neither Scamp nor Imp had tried to overthrow him, and didn’t seem to even want to. What a bunch of layabouts! What kind of hobgoblins were they?

On his way out, Blacknail spotted Ferrar’s latest project. The pit he had dug had been filled in by a mound of clay that rose several feet into the air. There was a big hole in one side and another at the top. Ash was spilling out of the bottom hole. It looked like Ferrar had been burning things in the mound to harden the clay. Blacknail quickly lost interest in the mound and wandered off. It was just clay.
Since Blacknail had no idea where Scamp was, he went to talk to Gob instead. There was no need to even look for him, since Blacknail could hear him yelling orders every once in a while. Gob’s voice led Blacknail over to the newest section of the wall. The other hobgoblin was busy supervising the construction, as he had been ordered. Gob was very obedient. Blacknail needed more hobgoblins just like him.

“Good job keeping the goblins in line. You’re doing great work,” Blacknail congratulated the other hobgoblin.

“Thank you, supreme leader. I live to obey,” Gob replied as he turned and bowed ever so slightly. The gesture caused the hobgoblin to lower his eyes submissively. He had just been watching the goblins working on the wall.

“Good to know,” Blacknail replied happily. “I’m looking for Scamp. Have you seen him around?”

“He’s over by that hill. He’s sleeping, because I punched him out and tied him up.”

“Oh, did you get tired of his stupidity?” One of Blacknail’s eyebrows rose in surprise. He could understand if that was the case.

“No, he tried to bash my head in with log. He was helping me build the wall and I turned my back on him, but I kept my ears open,” Gob explained as he wiggled his long green ears. “I let him live as you commanded.”

“Good job,” Blacknail replied with even more cheer. Maybe there was hope for Scamp yet!

Both of the hobgoblins had earned a reward. He would take them hunting for big game. That was a fun activity that they could all do together! There was nothing like killing things to help hobgoblins bond. It was also one of the few jobs left that only Blacknail could do, so if he trained some replacements then he could slack off more.

After getting directions, Blacknail went to fetch Scamp. He found the other hobgoblin at the base of a nearby hill. Just as Gob had said, he was tied up by ropes. One of them even ran around his head and through his mouth so that he couldn’t talk. Scamp was lying on his back and staring at the sky, but he looked over and started fidgeting when he heard Blacknail approach.

“You tried to kill Gob, he’s my second-in-command,” Blacknail accused Scamp as he leaned over him. “You’re not good enough to replace him. Try it again and I’ll boil you alive.”

There was a muffled whimpering sound as Scamp nodded desperately in agreement, so Blacknail sighed and began untying him. A few minutes later, he led the two other hobgoblins over to his cave and had them wait outside while he grabbed some things. When he returned he was carrying three bow staves.

“These are for you,” Blacknail told them as he held two of the weapons out. “We’re going to go hunting.”

He then taught them how to string and maintain the bows. One of the bows was for Blacknail himself. It was the one his master had given to him in Daggerpoint and it was made from a weird type of wood that was very hard and flexible. The other two bows had been taken from enemies, or enemies that had used to be friends until they weren’t.

Once they had fired off a few practice arrows at a log, the hobgoblins headed off into the forest. They were mostly there to learn from Blacknail’s amazing skills, so they could practice accuracy later.

“If you shoot anyone in the back it won’t stop me from tearing your limbs off,” Blacknail warned Scamp.

“I would never do that, boss! I’m loyal and obedient,” Scamp replied nervously. He had been eyeing Gob and playing with his bow when the other hobgoblin’s back was turned.

With a disdainful huff, Blacknail led them past the creek. They jumped across its muddy banks and went deeper into the Green. Most animals worth hunting avoided the area around the goblin’s camp.

The trio trudged through the greenery before stumbling upon a fresh set of tracks. Blacknail took the time to point them out and give the other hobgoblins some tips on tracking. He then told them to be quiet and started following the trail.

A few minutes later, Blacknail spotted a flicker of movement. Most of the trees here were huge things with smooth grey bark and trunks wide enough for several people to hide behind. They were fairly widely spaced apart, but row upon row of the trees stretched out in front of the group, and clusters of thick roots grew around the trees’ bases. Around a hundred feet ahead, a herd of deer were walking between the trees.

There were about a dozen of the graceful beasts. Their brown spotted coats camouflaged in with the dark ground and bushes. They would have been hard to make out if they had been holding still and hadn’t been walking. At the head of the herd was a large stag with magnificent antlers that were over a foot long. The stag looked warily around in every direction as he led his herd through the woods.

Blacknail raised a hand and motioned for the others to be silent, and then started to creep through the trees. He wanted to slip around the herd and cut them off so he could get a better shot. It was a maneuver that humans would have had difficulty doing, but hobgoblins were naturally stealthy and this was their element. They simply had to follow their primal instincts. Hunting and creeping up on unexpecting prey was what they did best.

Scamp and Gob fell in behind Blacknail as he hunched down and scampered quietly around the deer. Occasionally, one of the beasts would glance over in their direction, but none of them noticed the approaching predators. The hobgoblins moved with an eerie precision and quiet that surprised even Blacknail. Sometimes he forgot that Scamp and Gob had been born in the wild. Even if they hadn’t been taught by the greatest ranger ever to live like he had, they had survived on their own in these very forests for years.

There was a thick tree positioned ahead of the herd and a bit to the side. Blacknail snuck up to the tree’s trunk and hid himself behind it. The other two hobgoblins joined him a second later. The grey behemoth easily concealed all of them, and Blacknail quickly peeked around it. The deer were still headed towards them. If they didn’t change course they would pass within easy bowshot of the hobgoblin’s hiding place.

As they waited, Blacknail prepped his bow and drew an arrow. Scamp and Gob copied him. Once ready, Blacknail relaxed and waited for the right time to strike. The stag wandered within a hundred feet and started to walk past the tree. The herd was moving parallel to Blacknail’s group now. Every step now carried the lead deer further away.

From behind the tree, Blacknail chose a target and drew his bow back. He would leave the stag alone and aim for one of the closer does. The hobgoblin could already taste the sweet deer flesh. He grinned wickedly as he let his arrow fly. The projectile zoomed through the air. It closed in on the doe's flank, and then passed under it. There was a thud as the quivering arrow sunk into the ground. Blacknail had missed.

“Turtle shit,” he cursed to himself. There must have been wind or something.

The noise and flash of movement from the arrow alerted the deer. The herd all perked up and then began to run off into the trees, away from the hobgoblins. That was when another arrow whirred past Blacknail and hit the flank of one of the fleeing deer. The animal crumpled onto the ground, and the other deer left it behind as they dashed out of sight.

Blacknail turned around and saw Scamp holding an empty bow. There was a big happy grin on his face.

“I set that up for you,” Blacknail told him flatly. It had probably been beginner’s luck.

“Thanks boss,” Scamp replied. He was still smiling, and that annoyed Blacknail.

“Since you shot it, you’re carrying the carcass back,” he told Scamp.

Gob helped tie the deer to a long pole and then he and Scamp began carrying it back to base. As they walked, Blacknail told them stories about Saeter and taught them little tracking tricks. If it looked like the other hobgoblins weren’t paying enough attention then he kicked them in the ass, hard. He would tolerate no disrespect towards his old master.

It hadn’t been so long ago that Blacknail had been the one learning this way. A feeling of sad nostalgia came over the hobgoblin. He missed his master.

It was starting to get dark by the time they returned to the goblin camp. The main cooking campfire was burning and so were a few of the smaller ones, like where Ferrar was busy firing clay. The little goblin never seemed to stop burning things. Sure fire looked pretty and all, but there were other things to life.

The hobgoblins dropped the deer carcass over by the drying rack. The nearby goblins watched with interest and a hungry gleam in their eyes. The smell of blood was strong. Just as Blacknail was ordering Gob and Scamp to prepare the meat, Elyias marched over. The goblins scattered out of his way as he walked up to Blacknail’s side.

“What is it?” Blacknail asked. Something must have happened. Elyias almost never sought him
out.
“I was doing my rounds and I found four sleeping goblins with signs of growing horns. That’s what you told me to watch out for,” the young man answered anxiously.

Elyias had been placed in charge of watching the goblins for signs of transformation. He had been a natural choice for the job, since he wasn’t a goblin himself, he was already paranoid about hobgoblins, and it didn’t take much in the way of intelligence.

Blacknail arched his back and laughed. The shrill sound rang out above the camp. Goblins fell silent and looked his way with both curiosity and fear. Even Elyias looked uncomfortable as the loud inhuman sound filled the air. Blacknail ignored them and shared his joy with world. Behind him, the campfire crackled and threw light up against the hills.

Finally! He had waited so long. Things had been going infuriatingly slowly, but now his scheme was starting to pay off! He needed hobgoblins and now he was getting them. They were the entire reason he had bothered building up this grimy little base. He needed the goblins to be well fed and feel secure so they would transform.

Still laughing, Blacknail contemplated the future. It was time to move on to the next part of his plan. Vengeance against Werrick would be his. He needed to rip the man apart with his own two hands. No one took what was his.










IEO 6










The sound of mad hobgoblin laughter cascaded through the rocky clearing. Blacknail was full of exhilaration now that his plans were finally coming to fruition. The laughter was just bubbling out of him. Nothing could stop him from getting his terrible revenge!

“What in all the hells is Blacknail up to? Did he get hit in the head?” Khita asked as she scowled and walked over. She had a finger deep in one of her ears and was twisting it around.

“I wouldn’t get to close. He might scratch you or something. He seems really wound up,” Elyias replied dryly. He was walking beside her.

Blacknail stopped laughing and turned to glare at the two humans. They were ruining this for him. Well, whatever. He would get them back later, Elyias especially. Blacknail had plans for him.

Smiling smugly to himself, Blacknail ignored the humans and immediately went to work preparing for the next phase of his scheme. Now that he had built up his base enough to start producing hobgoblins, it was time to introduce a bit of chaos and excitement into the system. Chaos created opportunity, and Blacknail excelled at taking advantage of opportunities.

The hobgoblin chieftain grabbed a sack from off the ground as he walked. He had no idea where it came from, but that didn’t matter. Some goblin had probably stolen it from Shelter.

The next thing he needed was light, so the hobgoblin built a primitive torch from a branch and some dry rope and cloth. He wandered over to the clay firing pit to set it aflame, but his first few attempts failed to produce a useable amount of fire. The end of the torch just blackened and smoked.

“Imp has light,” Ferrar said from nearby. The goblin had been working but he had stopped to watch Blacknail’s efforts. As usual, his eyes shone with perceptive intelligence.

“I know that,” Blacknail muttered as he futilely poked the fire one last time. He didn’t like failing in front of his minions. Stupid torch.

The hobgoblin then threw his failed torch on the fire and headed for Imp’s hut. It wouldn’t surprise Blacknail if there was a torch or something among all the junk Imp had piled up there. He seemed to have everything else.

There was a shuffling sound from inside as Blacknail walked up to the door. Imp was inside. He was walking around his home as he picked up and put down a plethora of small items. Every once in a while he would stop and stare intently into one of two large clay pots.

Blacknail coughed to get his attention, and when Imp looked over he spoke up. “Your leader – me - is looking for a light so I can go into a dark cave. Give me light.”

“Ah, I have that,” Imp replied.

He nodded enthusiastically and then walked over to a shelf. He picked something up off of it and then turned to show it to Blacknail. In the center of the hobgoblin’s hand was a small transparent crystal.

“Oh, right, magic,” Blacknail replied. He remembered those crystals; Mahedium had used to make them. “Good job acquiring something so useful, Imp. I thought your bag was full of useless trash.”

“No, I made this,” Imp explained. “You just need a pot, special dirt, and blood.”

“Huh, it’s not going to blow up, is it?” Blacknail asked warily as he took a step back. He then glanced nervously at the contents of all the nearby shelves. Mahedium’s workshop had tended to explode every now and then.

“No, light stones don’t go boom, only the more interesting and harder to make stones do that. I’m just growing light makers. The worse they do is cut your fingers with their sharp edges, or burn your eyes out and blind you. Just don’t look directly at them for too long.”

“Ah, that doesn’t sound too bad,” Blacknail mused aloud. Even the sun could blind you, and some of Blacknail’s favorite possessions were designed to cut people.

Imp quickly agreed to follow his glorious chieftain, and the pair headed over to the deepest cave in the camp. Since Blacknail wasn’t a mage he couldn’t use the light stone, and thus Imp had to come along.

Cautiously, Blacknail jumped down the ledge that led to the cavern. He walked through the cave entrance and looked around. It was too dark for him to see anything inside, even though the sun was still shining brightly outside. He could barely make out the rock studded walls of the dark tunnel, and the way forward was nothing but a murky black void.

As Imp stepped up behind Blacknail, light flooded out to fill the tunnel. Suddenly, the cracks and crags in the grey stone walls were completely visible. Blacknail could see down into the cave until the way forward curved out of sight. The floor was dirty and uneven. Short spiky stalactites hung from the ceiling. Blacknail glanced back over his shoulder and saw Imp holding one hand up above his head. The light was pouring out from between the hobgoblin’s fingers.

“Follow me,” Blacknail ordered Imp as he turned back around and began walking deeper into the cavern. He was in no way afraid of the light going out and being stranded all alone in the dark. He was just going to keep very close to Imp.

The two hobgoblins carefully made their way deeper into the cave. After only a few moments of scrambling over rocks and cracks in the floor, they reached their destination. The cave abruptly ended at a wall of loose rock. It looked like the ceiling had collapsed, but that wasn’t why they were here. The light pouring out from Imp’s stone was thrown back by something embedded in the cave wall. It sparkled with a yellowish tint.

“Ah, yellow shiny rocks,” Imp observed as he leaned closer.

“It’s called gold!” Blacknail explained proudly. He still knew a lot of things that Imp didn’t. The other hobgoblin wasn’t as smart as he liked to pretend he was.

“It’s pretty, but what is it for?” Imp asked. He seemed sure they weren’t here just to admire the view or get a new shiny trinket to play with.

“You use it to trick humans. They go all crazy when they see gold. All their favorite coins are made from it,” Blacknail replied confidently. He didn’t have a complete understanding of how currency worked, but he knew that was one of the most important parts.

“You want to trick some humans?”

“No, I want to trick all of them,” Blacknail explained as he spread his arms apart as if he was trying to grab something gigantic. There was a fierce smile on his face.

“Ah, that sounds like fun,” Imp replied cheerfully as he studied the gold. He wasn’t looking at Blacknail.

“You don’t sound like you believe me,” Blacknail observed crossly. Imp’s lack of enthusiasm was a little insulting. “When we leave I will show you how it works with Elyias. You’ll see; he’s easy.”

Blacknail and Imp then spent a few minutes gathering up any loose yellow rocks they could find. The sack Blacknail had brought was just starting to get uncomfortably heavy, when he heard a wet sloshing sound from behind him. It was quickly followed by the thud of a falling rock.

Both of the hobgoblins turned and looked at each other. Upon seeing that the other was just as confused as them, they both glanced over their shoulders. The noise had come from the barrier of fallen rock behind them. As they watched, there was another splashing sound from somewhere out of sight.

“You should check it out. In fact, I order you to, as the leader,” Blacknail told Imp.

“If I die then we lose the light, and you’re a much tougher fighter,” Imp quickly countered.

Those were good points. This was why Blacknail hated smart minions. He should have brought someone expandable, like a goblin.

“Ugh, fine,” he muttered as he tiptoed over towards the source of the sound. It was probably a rat or something.

The rocks in front of him were piled up on each other to form a steep slope. The light from the mana stone didn’t light it all up because its surface was so uneven. Instead, the uneven rocks were covered in slowly shifting shadows. There were several dark gaps in the rock that looked disconcertedly deep. Some of them might even penetrate right through the rocks and lead to a chamber on the other side of the collapse.

A flash of movement and another wet sound drew Blacknail’s attention. Something was moving on the other side of a tall grey rock. The hobgoblin leaned sideways to get a better look, just as something stepped into sight. The empty eye sockets of a human skull stared at Blacknail, and he stared back.

“Um, what?” Blacknail exclaimed in surprise. Below the skull, a frame of bones formed a complete standing skeleton.

“Did you know that human bones could walk around?” Blacknail asked Imp as he stared at the sight before him and slowly reached down to draw his sword.

Human remains didn’t scare the hobgoblin all that much. Even living humans weren’t typically that dangerous, and they were usually in much better shape than corpses, but it was better to be safe than sorry.

“I didn’t know that. It seems a little weird. None of the other dead humans I’ve seen could walk, and goblin bones don’t do that,” Imp replied as he gazed past Blacknail. He sounded a little surprised. “Maybe we both ate a bad mushroom?”

Before Blacknail could reply, the skeleton took a shambling step forward and Blacknail was forced to take a wary step back from it. The moving corpse was still mostly in the shadows, and he was in no hurry to fight it. How did you kill a pile of bones anyway?

“Here, let me help,” Imp said. “I don’t think we’re seeing it right.”

A second later, Imp held his hand out and the light he was holding grew much brighter. The white glow of the stone suddenly illuminated the skeleton as it stepped forward again, and Blacknail got a good look at it.

“Oh, it’s covered in slime,” he observed as he suddenly had a realization.

The human bones were wrapped in transparent goo, and it was very familiar looking to Blacknail. Before he could finish his thought though, the skeleton suddenly lurched forward and swung an arm at him. Blacknail dodged under the blow and stabbed the attacking monster in the stomach. The blade sank into the slime and bounced harmlessly off of bone.

The skeleton didn’t appear to have been harmed. It ignored the blow and swung at him again. Blacknail was forced to throw himself back out of the way. His blade came free with a wet sucking sound. After stumbling, he caught his balance and raised his sword up into a guard.

“You could help,” Blacknail hissed at Imp.

“How? I have no sword and I’m not touching that. It looks icky,” he replied.

“Magic?”

“We’re standing a little close. The boom is big,” Imp answered skeptically.

“Fine, I’ll do it myself,” Blacknail told him as he stepped in and took another swing the shambling pile of bones and ooze. The attack hit, but once again it accomplished next to nothing. The thick slime slowed the blow enough that the bones were barely damaged by the strike.

This wasn’t the first ooze monster Blacknail had ever fought, but this one was noticeably tougher than the last. Oozes usually had vulnerable organs, but this one’s were protected by the skeleton’s ribcage. The stolen human bones also allowed to it to walk instead of rolling around, and its arms gave it some reach. Every time the skeleton flailed at Blacknail tendrils rose off the monster’s arms and reached for him.

Again and again, Blacknail sliced and swung his sword but the ooze remained unfazed. The hobgoblin was forced to retreat as the skeleton lurched towards him with outstretched arms. If the slime got a hold of him it would be difficult to get free and the monster would quickly squeeze the life from him.

This fight wasn’t going anywhere. The skeleton was too slow to hit Blacknail, but he couldn’t hurt it either. He needed to change things up. Imp certainly wasn’t helping. He was just standing back and watching the fight. That wasn’t what minions were for!

“You’re going to make me do this, aren’t you?” Blacknail muttered at Imp as he readied himself.

A second later, he lunged towards the slime. He was holding his sword down low, and as he charged he thrust it towards the skeleton’s chest with all his might. He needed to break some bones.

Before the slime could react, Blacknail’s sword slammed into its chest. The tip of the blade cut through the slime and hit a pair of ribs. For a moment, the bones seemed to stop the attack, but then they shattered. The blade slipped right through the skeleton’s chest.

Unfortunately for Blacknail, he couldn’t stop his charge. He had built up way too much momentum. It carried him right into his opponent, and they both fell over in a tangle.

“Ugh, this feels icky!” Blacknail cried after hitting the ground. The slime had already begun enveloping him. It had firm hold on him now, and that wasn’t good.

Suppressing his disgust, Blacknail let go of his sword and fought to keep one hand free. As the slime spread towards his face and pulled him down, the hobgoblin plunged his hand through the skeleton’s broken ribs and began feeling around. The thick slime moved around his fingers and made it hard to tell if he was hitting anything. He needed to destroy the thing’s organs.

The ooze bubbled up and covered Blacknail’s mouth. The hobgoblin couldn’t get free now and he had only a few seconds left to find his opponent’s weak spot. Where was the damned thing? He should have already grabbed it. This wasn’t the first time Blacknail had stuck his hand inside a human chest cavity, it wasn’t that large!

A burning sensation flared to life within Blacknail’s lungs. He couldn’t breathe, or even get his hands loose so he could try to pry his mouth open. Where in all the hells was that organ! What did humans even mean when the talked about the hells? It was all so confusing. He was getting too weak…

A loud cracking noise splintered the quiet, right next to Blacknail’s head. He flinched and glanced in that direction. The sight of a shattered skull filled his vision. A large rock had smashed open the dome of the slime’s stolen skull, and a pair of green hands was holding the rock. As Blacknail watched, black fluid began to leak out of the cracked remains of the skull’s eye sockets, and the slime holding him went limp. The organ had been in the skull, not the chest.

“That was my plan all along. I set that up for you,” Blacknail told Imp as he sat up and began coughing. There was slime in his throat. It did not taste great.

“Of course, boss. Your mighty struggle was amazing,” Imp replied flatly.

Blacknail wasn’t sure if he was being sincere, but he was too tired – and slimy - to care right now. He stood up and began wiping himself off. The fallen skeleton was at his feet and the now inactive ooze was sloughing off of its bones.

Before he was anywhere near clean, there was a scuttling sound from where the slime had come from. Both hobgoblins looked over to see a pale crab-like creature emerge from the rocks and stare back at them. It was the size of a large dog.

“Let’s get out of here,” Blacknail told Imp.

The other hobgoblin didn’t argue. Blacknail grabbed the sack of gold and they scrambled out of the cave. They had gotten what they had come for anyway, so there was no point in sticking around.

The first thing Blacknail did after leaving the cave was to jump in a deep pool of water and change his clothes. Once all the slime had been washed away, Blacknail and Imp went to talk to Elyias. They found the man sitting atop one of the hills at the edge of the camp. He was looking outward towards the forest, and his slouching posture made him seem tired and depressed. What a whiner.

“What do you want?” Elyias asked when he spotted the hobgoblins approaching.

“What do you want?” Blacknail countered cheerfully.

“To leave and get back to civilization,” Elyias replied. He didn’t sound amused.

“Alright, I’ll take you there.”

“Are… are you being serious?”

“Why would I lie?”

“Because you find it amusing?”

Blacknail fought to keep the serious look on his face. Elyias had him there, but that wasn’t the case now. “No, I want to take you back to human lands. Do you want to go?”

“Like all the demons in all the hells are chasing me,” Elyias replied. His eyes had gone wide with surprise and hope. It was sort of cute, in a kickable way.

“Good, we leave tomorrow,” Blacknail told the young man. The hobgoblin’s lips had twisted into an amused grin. “There are just two things you have to do for me?”

“Oh?”

“First, I command you to tell everyone about Shelter. You need to convince people to come here.”

“Ha, whatever floats your boat. Get me out of the wilds and I’ll do anything you say.”

Blacknail grinned knowingly to himself. Elyias thought he was being clever. Blacknail knew the man planned on running at the first chance he got. Why did humans always underestimate him? “Yes, you will. You won’t run or forget my orders because of the second thing I need from you.”

“What’s that?” Elyias asked cautiously.

“I need you to take this with you,” Blacknail explained as he reached into the sac and pulled out a lump of yellow rock. “When you’ve done as you’ve been told, I will give you more.”

“That’s highly suspicious,” Elyias observed as he stared at the gold. “But I really can’t say no.”

“No. No, you can’t,” Blacknail replied as he winked at an impressed looking Imp.









IEO 7










“Do you remember what you have to do?” Blacknail asked.

“Ya, it’s not that complicated, just stupid. Why are you doing this?” Elyias countered.

The hobgoblin and the young man were standing outside of a small inn. Blacknail was hooded to conceal his unnaturally good looks, so that he wouldn’t attract attention. After trudging back along the route through the forest they had taken to Shelter, the pair had eventually found a major human road, which had led them here to this inn. The journey had taken a week and all of it had been long and boring. Blacknail had spent the entire time annoying Elyias and making him do chores, most of which had been utterly pointless, but fun to watch.

“You don’t need to know why I’m doing this. Just repeat your orders. It’s important,” Blacknail hissed at Elyias.

“Fine, I’m supposed to find some of Werrick’s men and tell them about Shelter. I’m not supposed to mention you or any of Herad’s old minions, but I have to tell them about there being heaps of gold there.”

“Good, and do you remember what will happen if you don’t obey my orders or mess this up by doing some stupid human thing?”

“I remember. You promised to gut me like a fish and hang my nude corpse from a village gate,” Elyias replied dryly.

“You make me sound so mean! I’m just trying to help you remember everything properly. Motivation is important!” Blacknail protested. “Also, on that topic, don’t think I won’t find you if you try to run. I can follow you through a city. Herad’s enemies weren’t safe from me in Daggerpoint. I hunted them down like rats.”

“Rats? What? Agh, never mind. I thought I was finally going to be free of you,” Elyias muttered under his breath as he turned towards the inn door.

Blacknail’s ears were sensitive enough to pick up his words, but he just smiled to himself. He didn’t say anything as Elyias disappeared through the door, leaving Blacknail alone on the long dusty road.

The inn was an isolated building that served as a safe house for travelers. It was a solidly built structure that looked like it had been designed with defense in mind. There was a stable off to one side, and Blacknail could hear several horses neighing and whinnying inside it. The hobgoblin had to resist the urge to burn the whole thing down. Killing a few disgusting and obnoxious horses wasn’t worth messing up his amazing plan. The stable did look really flammable though. There was hay everywhere…

“I paid for a good bed. I demand better than this!” a woman yelled from inside the inn. The noise derailed Blacknail’s train of thought.

“Well, Elyias is finally back among his own kind, whiny people, so I should get moving,” the hobgoblin told himself before turning and starting to walk away.

He had a long journey ahead of himself. Without stopping , he travelled down the road for the rest for the day. By the time the sun was starting to set he had almost driven himself crazy.

He was so bored! He hated being alone. He wasn’t used to it anymore. Blacknail hissed in frustration as he looked down the road. Being the leader was pointless if there was no one to brag to or boss around. He already regretted leaving Elyias behind, but he’d had no choice. The plan was more important than anything else. He would just have to find another human that was even more fun to torment.

Boredom was one of the main reasons he hadn’t become a feral hobgoblin after Saeter had died. It had been tempting to leave the whiny humans behind, but if he’d obeyed his instincts and ran off into the woods then there wouldn’t be anyone for him to agonize or lord-over. Being around stupid humans and shifty-eyed hobgoblins he couldn’t trust was dangerous, but there was more to life than just living, like cheese.

When night came, Blacknail pulled off his pack and unrolled his blanket. He was always able to find some sort of crevice or nook to sleep in. The forest was full of predators, but only a few of them hunted during the blackest part of the night, and fewer still would dare prey on a hobgoblin.

By the third day, hiking along the dusty road past all the trees was really starting to get old. If he looked up, there were some clouds and some mountains on the horizon, but those weren’t exactly riveting either. Blacknail found himself talking to random birds that were up in the trees. They chirped a lot but they didn’t talk back.

When Blacknail finally drew close to his destination, several more days had passed, and he was desperate for company. All the hobgoblins had been too busy to come with him, every goblin was worthless, and he’d rather swallow a spiny toad than spend so much time alone with Khita. However, he should have forced at least one of the hobgoblins to come along. There was several hours worth of hiking left until he got home, and they were going to be excruciatingly dull.

Letting out a deep sigh, Blacknail passed underneath a huge slanted tree that overshadowed the path. The giant had partially fallen over some time ago, but it was still alive. The forest around the hobgoblin was quiet. The short leafy bushes and tall tree trunks around him were still.

Suddenly, an uncomfortable tingle spread across Blacknail’s back and up his neck. Was it perhaps too quiet? Wasn’t there usually more birdsong and scurrying noises? Blacknail stopped walking. He turned to look around. Nothing seemed out of place, but he still felt on edge.

Cautiously, Blacknail began walking again. He couldn’t just wait around all day. He had places to be. If he was walking a little quicker than before it wasn’t because he was afraid. Ha, that would be ridiculous. He was the hunter, not the hunted.

Just then, Blacknail heard a rustling. It sounded like something was in the bushes, and creeping closer to him. He kept walking as if he hadn’t heard anything, but he also surreptitiously glanced over his shoulder towards the noise. Out of the corner of his eye he saw a patch of grey fur. Blacknail began to walk a little faster and one of his hands grasped the hilt of his blade. He really should have brought someone else along.

As he hustled along the path, Blacknail was careful to keep his eyes open and to walk close to tree trunks so one of his sides was covered. A snapping sound from behind him - like a twig breaking - reminded him that he was being followed. He needed to do something about that, but first he needed to figure out exactly what sort of situation he was in. Proper tactics were important.

There was a huge tree up ahead. The giant stood alone; no bushes or other trees were within two dozen feet of it. Its trunk was wider than Blacknail’s arms and covered in pale smooth bark. Most importantly, there was a pair of low hanging branches on it. Blacknail dashed forward towards the tree. When he reached it, he planted his feet, and drew his blade as he spun around. The sword whirred through the air until it came to a stop up in a guard position in front of Blacknail’s face. The hobgoblin grimaced in determination as he took a defensive stance and prepared himself for combat.

Immediately, there was an explosion of leaves, as several low shapes burst out from the underbrush. Four of them were normal wolves, while the fifth was much larger and had a small crystalline horn on its head. It was the mutant wolf that attacked Blacknail’s base! The alpha snarled as it led its pack mates in a charge towards the hobgoblin warrior. The beast’s eyes shone with mad hunger.

“Nope, bye,” Blacknail exclaimed as he dropped his sword.

The hobgoblin then turned and leaped towards the closest branch on the tree behind him. There was no way he was going to fight so many wolves by himself. As he grabbed the branch and began pulling himself up, one of the wolves jumped after him.

“Ah, my butt! I need that,” Blacknail screeched as a set of teeth grazed his ass and tore through his pants.

The hanging hobgoblin flinched and quickly threw himself up out of the way. He landed on top of a solid branch, and then immediately jumped up to the next one, just in case. Only then did he stop and take a second to glance at the seat of his pants. There was a long gash through them, although the skin beneath had only been scratched. The wound hurt, though. His butt was a tender area, and the damage to his trousers annoyed Blacknail. He didn’t have a lot of spare pairs of pants. They were difficult to loot unless you didn’t mind them smelling really bad. In battle, humans leaked quite a few different fluids, none of which were fragrant.

Beneath him, the alpha wolf leaped up onto the side of the tree and began scrambling up the bark. It growled as its jaws snapped on empty air. Up on his branch, Blacknail flinched again and leaned back away. However, the huge beast quickly lost its grip. It slipped back down to the ground and landed on all fours.

“Ha, you’re just a stupid mutt without any hands. Grow some thumbs, loser,” Blacknail laughed as he stuck his tongue out.

The alpha stared up at the hobgoblin. Its yellow eyes were narrowed hatefully. Blacknail spat down at it, but his wet projectile missed completely, and the alpha growled again.

“Just wait, I got a present for you!” Blacknail said as he rummaged around in his pouches for his sling.

The wolf seemed to recognize the weapon, because as Blacknail began loading it, the beast let out a quick howl and then darted off back into the bushes. Its companions followed it, leaving Blacknail up the tree with nothing to shoot at. Several minutes passed.

“Are they gone?” Blacknail muttered darkly to himself as he tried to peer through the undergrowth below.

The wolves weren’t visible, but that didn’t mean they were really gone. They might be laying in ambush, waiting for Blacknail to come down so they could tear him to bits. The alpha had seemed like a cunning beast with a twisty mind. It wasn’t truly intelligent, of course, but it was the next best thing, sort of like a human.

Everything was quiet for several more minutes as Blacknail waited up in the tree. The longer he waited the more frustrated he grew. This was not how a great hobgoblin chieftain was supposed to spend his time. He was a hunter without equal, not a squirrel. He should be doing hobgoblin chieftain things, like um… sitting on a pile of skulls? Why didn’t he have a pile of skulls? That sounded amazing.

Wait, that was a problem for another time. He should focus on the situation at hand, the wolves. Blacknail thought over his options. He really only had two. Sit in the tree or climb down.

“They are probably gone. The dumb mutts probably lost interest and went to find something less dangerous to attack,” Blacknail reassured himself before jumping down to the lower branch.

He then carefully studied the nearby bushes before making the last leap down to the ground. When no slavering wolves jumped out at him he picked his sword off the ground and resumed heading down the trail that led him back towards Shelter. It wasn’t like he had much choice.

Before he had gone more than a few feet, a loud crash and a squeal echoed through the trees. He tensed, but it sounded like it was coming from far away. Was it the wolves?

After stopping and listening, Blacknail decided to check it out. If the wolves were really making all the noise he wanted to know what they were doing. He might be losing a chance to put some distance between himself and the beasts, but he much preferred being the hunter over the hunted. He wasn’t about to let a bunch of arrogant dogs chase him all the way home.

There was another loud squeal. Blacknail turned and began creeping towards the sound. He kept low and skulked through the bushes as he moved. His long green ears were erect as they listened for even the slightest sound. The tiniest warning could save him if this was a trick.

Blacknail soon found what he was looking for. As he peered out from behind a tree, the hobgoblin saw an unfolding battle. There was a steep rocky cliff up ahead. At the base of the hill, the alpha wolf and several of its pack mates were circling around a herd of boars.

One of the boars was a gigantic beast. It had dark brown fur with subtle black stripes and long pointy tusks. The giant towered over even the alpha wolf by two or three feet. The normal wolves looked small and harmless next to its huge girth. Around half a dozen smaller pigs were hiding behind their larger companion. They looked to be sticking close to a small crevice in the side of the hill and trying to keep out of the fight.

With the support of his pack mates, the alpha was darting in to bite at the large boar’s heels and exposed flank. It was smaller than its prey but its speed and strength were unnatural. The alpha was having no trouble getting past the boars’ defenses. It showed no fear, and its teeth were already wet with blood.

Since no one and nothing was looking in his direction, Blacknail decided to circle around and get a better view. He headed up towards the hill. That seemed like a defensible spot and he would definitely get a good view up there. The sounds of battle continued behind him as he moved.

There were several large rocks on top of the hill. Blacknail crept up behind the one closest to the edge and looked down. At the bottom of the rocky ridge, one of the smaller wolves dove into the melee. It lunged at the back of one of the boars as the alpha distracted it, but it was too slow. The boar turned and head-butted the wolf before it could pull back. The wolf whined in pain as it was sent flying and hit a tree.

This enraged the alpha wolf. It growled angrily, jumped on the boar’s back, and sank its long sharp teeth into the beast’s neck. Another loud squeal filled the air as the boar bucked and tried to shake itself free. The other wolves took the opportunity to jump in and began harassing the smaller pigs. A ragged din of high-pitched squealing and hungry growls quickly filled the air.

As Blacknail watched all this, he weighed his options. It certainly seemed like the wolves were going to win, and that wasn’t good for him. They had already attacked both him and his tribe. Briefly, he considered stringing his bow and taking a shot at the alpha, but it would probably take more than an arrow or two to hurt a mutant like that.

Blacknail’s attention was drawn back to the fight, when the boar finally managed to dislodge its attacker. It spun itself around in tight circle and the alpha came loose and hit the ground. The wolf rolled a few times before getting back to its feet, but the boar was already charging. The wolf tried to jump out of the way, but the huge pig managed to graze its foe. Its tusks cut into the wolf’s side and drew blood.

However, the now bloodied mutant was far from out of the fight. It calmly landed and began circling the boar again. Its yellow eyes were alive with excitement, not pain. The boar was the one that seemed to be on its last legs. It was huffing and puffing fitfully as it limped around. It looked ready to collapse at any second.

Up above, Blacknail frowned to himself. The alpha was wounded and its pack mates were hurt and distracted. Blacknail knew he would likely never have a better chance than this to even the score. He needed to come up with a plan, one that would actually work.

The rock Blacknail was leaning on suddenly shifted ever so slightly, and a new idea occurred to the hobgoblin. He grinned maliciously to himself as he looked around for a branch. He quickly found one he could use, so he jammed it under the large rock and began pushing. There was a low crack as the boulder came loose and began rolling down the hill. It hit several smaller stones on the way down and a small rockslide formed.

The wave of jagged rock hurtled downwards at the beasts below. Blacknail laughed joyfully at the sight and rubbed his hands together in glee. Down below, the alpha finally looked up and away from his lagging foe. The noise from all the fighting animals had been drowning out the sound of the rocks until they got closer. Blacknail was sure he saw a terrified expression appear on the wolf’s face for a moment, before it howled fearfully and turned to run away.

“Too late! You’re going to get smooshed flat,” Blacknail yelled down at the mutant. There was a savage victorious grin on his face. No dog was ever going to get away with hurting him!

That grin faltered though, when the ground beneath Blacknail’s feet suddenly shifted. He lost his balance. There was a loud grinding noise from below, and then the part of the hill Blacknail was standing on began to come apart and slide down the slope.

“Ah, harpy shit,” the hobgoblin cursed as he fell.











IEO 8












Small stones bounced through the air all around Blacknail as he slid down the side of the hill. He desperately fought to keep his balance, but the rocks beneath his feet kept moving. All he could do was to try not to hit anything on the way down. A large rock rose before him, so the hobgoblin jumped to the side. After landing, he had to reach down and catch himself, but he barely managed to keep from falling on his ass as he slid down the slope.

At the bottom of the hill, the first wave of stones reached the beasts fighting down below. Most of the shards were small and harmless, but there were some larger ones, including the original boulder Blacknail had knocked free. That huge rock was rolling right towards the alpha wolf.

The mutant wolf had turned and fled from his fight with the huge boar a few moments ago, when it had noticed the incoming rockslide. The injured boar was too exhausted to escape, and it knew it. Instead of running, it turned to face the rocks and hunkered down. The other wolves and pigs were fleeing in all directions.

The wave of stones washed over the huge boar and then rushed past it without slowing. Wolves and pigs were thrown in every direction and crushed by rock. The alpha wolf dodged to the side to avoid the huge boulder, but then a smaller rock smashed into its head. The mutant canine was sent rolling across the ground and was then hit by a shower of smaller stones.

Blacknail would have cheered but he was too busy trying to keep himself in one piece. The hobgoblin was still sliding down the slope amidst a wave of dust and rock. Most the large rocks were in front of him but that didn’t mean he was safe. There was a lot of momentum carrying him down the hill, and even a small rock could crack open his skull.

A few moments and some near misses later, the hobgoblin reached the bottom of the hill. He leaped over a pile of rocks and then kept running as he weaved his way forward past all the obstacles. As he ran, Blacknail tried to backpedal and slow himself down, but his momentum was too strong. Then he stepped on a small round stone.

“Oh no,” the hobgoblin said as he tripped and his foot flew up into the air. This was going to hurt.

It did. Blacknail hit the uneven ground hard. More than a few sharp stones dug into the flesh of his back. He gasped painfully as he started rolling. Even more pointy objects stabbed into him as he rolled. When he finally came to stop, a cloud of gravel fell on top of him.

“Ouch,” Blacknail groaned as he picked himself up. He then spat to one side. His mouth was full of dust. It tasted like he’d tried to chew rocks.

The hobgoblin looked around. There were several large dust clouds hanging low close to the ground but they were already beginning to blow away. Loose rocks were strewn about everywhere, but Blacknail saw no immediate threats, so he took a second to check his body for injuries. He had quite a few new tender areas, but nothing seemed broken. It would take more than a mere rockslide to defeat Blacknail!

With his checkup done, Blacknail went looking for the alpha wolf. The creature had definitely been hit by the rockslide and it had already been wounded. This was far too good of a chance to pass off. The wolf was probably already dead, but if it wasn’t, Blacknail was going to finish it off. This was his territory and no mutant was going to get away with attacking him!

The pile of rocks covering his target wasn’t that far away, so Blacknail headed over towards it. He smacked the side of his head a few times to get the rocks out of his ears as he walked. He had no idea how they had gotten in there.

The fallen body of the giant boar was off to one side. It looked even bigger from up close, but it also looked very dead. Large bleeding gashes had been torn in it sides and it was breathlessly still. Since it wasn’t a concern, unless he got hungry, Blacknail turned away from the boar and focused on the wolf up ahead.

As Blacknail walked, he drew his sword. The alpha wolf had been hit by a wave of rock so it was probably long dead, but Blacknail wasn’t about to underestimate a mutant. They could be freakishly tough. He might have to stick it a few time to finish it off. He hoped he would; that sounded like fun.

“I’m going to make me a wolf fur blanket and a maybe a pretty tooth necklace too,” the hobgoblin bragged as he smiled confidently.

The hobgoblin approached the buried alpha wolf, and kicked a stone away. He couldn’t see much of the wolf beneath the rock, only a few patches of fur. Suddenly, the entire mound shuddered and began to rise. Rocks fell away to reveal the back of a huge furry shape. Blacknail took a step back. He didn’t like where this was going.

The creature then turned and looked at the hobgoblin. It was without a doubt the alpha wolf, and it looked mad. Its yellow eyes were narrowed hatefully at Blacknail. A few bits stripes of blood decorated its fur but it didn’t seem all that wounded. As the hobgoblin watched, the creature’s fur seemed to darken and go flat. The sudden change made it obvious the wolf’s fur had been weirdly fluffy and shiny a moment ago.

The wolf shook itself to remove some of the dust and dirt that covered its body, and then it snarled menacingly. Its lips rose up to reveal the many sharp teeth in its maw as the menacing sound reached Blacknail’s ears.

“Cheater,” Blacknail remarked resentfully. He then reached into a padded pocket in his shirt and pulled out a thick glass vial. It was his last vial of Elixir. He hurriedly popped the cork and downed the pink contents. He had a feeling he was going to need it. The alpha had obviously used some sort of weird power to protect itself.

The wolf was still fairly dirty and it shook itself again. Blacknail didn’t waste the opportunity. A hot flash of energy went through his body as he burned Elixir and lunged forward. His sword whirred around into a downward slash that was aimed right at his opponent’s neck.

Blacknail moved with incredible speed, but the wolf didn’t even try to dodge. Instead, it held its ground and growled. The fur all along its body instantly puffed out and grew shinier. It almost looked like crystalline spikes.

The sword hit the fur and was violently repelled. The force of the blow recoiled up Blacknail’s arm. The sword vibrated in his hand for an instant and then it shattered. Bits of metal flew away as the blade was snapped in half.

“Not good,” Blacknail hissed at he stared at his now completely destroyed weapon. This wasn’t going the way he had planned. He hated magic.

A moment later, the wolf’s fur softened and went flat again, and it lunged at the hobgoblin. Its jaws opened wide to reveal jagged yellow teeth, black gums, and a long slimy tongue. Blacknail immediately threw himself out of the way. The mutant’s teeth snapped shut on the empty air where his head had been a brief moment ago, and a drop of warm drool splashed against his neck.

As panic caused his heart to speed up, Blacknail threw his broken sword down and drew a long dagger. He was just in time, the wolf attacked again. It came in low to snap at his feet, but Blacknail managed to twist to the side and slash at the creature’s head. The power of the Elixir was already seeping into his body and lightening his movements, and this time his blade cut through the fur and drew blood. However, the glancing blow only left a shallow scratch.

Both combatants stepped back and eyed each other. Blacknail knew he was in danger but trying to flee never even occurred to him. He was face to face with another predator. Backing down would only put him at a disadvantage. He had to win no matter what the cost.

The potent energy from the Elixir was rushing through Blacknail’s body. It threw his mind into overdrive. His first attack had been completely ineffective, but the second had worked. It seemed like the beast’s fur was only tough when it was shiny. The wolf also moved slower then, so it transformed its hair only as a last ditch defense. Blacknail could use that, somehow.

The wolf let out a deep growl as it began to circle around the hobgoblin. Its every step brought it slightly closer, and Blacknail had to continue turning to keep his eyes locked on it. Before he got dizzy, Blacknail snarled and slashed at the wolf. It was only a feint, but the beast jumped back out of the way.

Sensing an opportunity, Blacknail drew another dagger and whipped it at the mutant’s head. The knife spun as it whirred through the air, and then it sailed right over the wolf’s head and hit a tree. The blade didn’t even sink into the wood; it bounced off into a nearby bush.

“Ya, I never really learned how to do that right,” Blacknail muttered to himself in disappointment. It had looked really cool when he saw bandits do it, though.

The throw wasn’t a complete waste. The startled wolf ducked low and its fur went spiky again for second, but then it realized the hobgoblin had missed, and it growled at him again. Blacknail growled back and raised his dagger menacingly. He was feeling confident. The Elixir was flowing through his body and strengthening it. He felt no pain or weariness. So what if the wolf was a mutant? He was Blacknail, the greatest hobgoblin warrior in the history of ever! He had no equal.

Blacknail lunged forward to attack again. He slashed at his opponent’s eyes. The wolf tried to twist around the attack and get at Blacknail, but the hobgoblin was ready. He reversed the direction of his slash and drove the beast off.

The wolf’s yellow eyes focused on Blacknail as it hunched down, and an instant later the wolf leapt up. It jumped straight for the hobgoblin’s chest. Blacknail grinned in bloody anticipation as he aimed his dagger at the creature’s exposed throat, but then its fur rose up again and hardened.

At the last moment, the hobgoblin was forced to throw himself down. He rolled across the ground and away from the wolf. Unfortunately, the mutant landed and spun around before he could get back up. With a victorious growl, it charged. Blacknail raised an arm to shield his head, and the wolf’s jaws closed down on it. Teeth sank through his heavy leather coat and into his arm.

“Bloody gods and piss everywhere,” Blacknail gasped as the pain hit him.

Instead of flinching though, he channeled his pain into anger. With lightening-like speed he stabbed at one of the wolf’s eyes with the dagger in his other hand. His mind wasn’t muddled by fear or pain, but focused by them instead. The here and now was all that mattered. He had to win.

The dagger’s tip headed right for the wolf’s iris, and the wolf reacted immediately. Instead of letting go, it dropped its weight and pulled Blacknail off balance. The hobgoblin stumbled and clenched his jaw as the beast’s teeth dug deeper into his flesh. Blacknail’s attack missed, but he didn’t waste any time. He growled as he slashed at the wolf’s eyes again.

This time, the beast twisted around and let go of his arm. The action caught Blacknail by surprise. He was thrown violently to the side and flew through the air until he hit the ground and started rolling. Disorientated, his body knocked aside loose rocks. He reached with his hands and tried to grab something, but then a solid object smashed into the back of his head. There was a loud crack. Blacknail’s head jerked forward and his neck twisted. For a moment, everything seemed fine. It was just another minor wound. The fight was still going on, and he couldn’t back down. Blacknail growled as he tried to stand up, but then his body suddenly went limp. As he fell, his vision went black.

…

Blacknail was sinking into cold nothingness. Like chains, the darkness held him down. It was so cold that even thinking was hard. What was going on? Who was he?

A ring of stones rose up into sight. The darkness rippled away from them like black water. Crude symbols decorated the weathered grey monoliths. Their lines and whirls were hypnotic even though they held no meaning to Blacknail. He remembered seeing something like them once…

Then there was light. At first it was a pin prick, but it grew until a blazing sun hung overhead. A giant appeared in the light. The blaze behind it obscured its features, but it was looking down at Blacknail. The hobgoblin could feel it studying him with unseen eyes that pierced everything. He felt acceptance instead of judgment, but that didn’t matter to him. He didn’t care what anyone else thought. Actions were what mattered.

Suddenly, one of the stones began to topple. As it fell, it hit the next one in line, and that stone began to fall. Soon the entire ring would collapse. All the commotion energized Blacknail. He began to struggle against the cold waters dragging him down. He couldn’t afford to stay here. He had plans! He had no idea what those plans were, but he remembered having them!

The giant noticed the flailing. It reached down with one dark hand and grabbed Blacknail. There was a sucking sound as it dragged him out of the cold water. Then, just as the third stone was beginning to fall, the giant took the hobgoblin and wedged him beneath the stone so that it stopped falling. Blacknail felt a heavy weight push down on him. He couldn’t see his own body but he felt it shift and deform under the pressure ever so slightly. There was a popping sound, and he opened his eyes.
…
Blacknail was lying on his back. Fragmented flashes of some sort of vision or dream ran through his mind. Had he fallen unconscious for a second? There was a rock poking painfully into his side, and a huge mutant wolf jumping at his face. Normally that would mean he had but a few scant moments to live, but everything seemed to be moving very slowly, like he was underwater. The wolf hung suspended in the air. Blacknail could clearly see its grey fur, yellow teeth, and long claws.

The hobgoblin knew his body was too battered and bruised to react properly. He wouldn’t be able to avoid the wolf’s attack in time. Death seemed certain, but Blacknail wasn’t about to give up. Purpose filled him. Vengeance still smoldered within his heart, but it was more than that. He would live! He would conquer! If his body wasn’t up to the task then he would simply find another way.

Time continued to pass, even if it was at a slower rate. The wolf was closer now. Soon it would land atop Blacknail and its jaws would close down on his neck. The Elixir was still coursing through the hobgoblin’s body. Blacknail could feel its energy empowering every fiber of his being. With no other option, he drew on every bit of it he could gather up. It burned within him with nowhere to go.

The energy was too much. His muscles couldn’t burn it nearly fast enough. The pressure built up and began to rip the hobgoblin apart from the inside. Just when Blacknail was sure he was about to burst, the energy found an escape. The power surged into Blacknail’s head and then exploded outward. There was a path for it there that had only ever seen a trickle, but now it was being flooded.

Invisible energy struck towards the wolf and ripped into it. Time sped back up.

Birds exploded out of all the nearby trees and flew up into the sky. The wolf yelped in surprise and began to writhe in midair. Instead of landing on Blacknail, it hit the ground next to him on an awkward angle. There was loud thud as its back slammed into the ground. Its fur was standing up so straight that it looked sharp in places.

Blacknail was already moving. He threw himself atop the writhing wolf without any care for his own safety. Rage drove him. This place was his, and he was the strongest!

A claw scraped against Blacknail’s chest but he twisted around it so he could get in closer. The wolf seemed to recover from whatever had confused it. It tried to push away from the hobgoblin and get back on its feet, but its thick fur slowed it down and restricted its movements.

As the last remnants of Elixir burned up within him, Blacknail grabbed a tuff of fur on the wolf’s neck, pulled himself over, and then stabbed at the creature’s closest eye with the dagger in his hand. There was no oddly tough fur there. The blade sank into the fleshy orb, and then Blacknail twisted the blade in deeper. Blood poured out of the wound, and the wolf yelped.

The beast’s hind legs hit Blacknail hips and knocked him aside. He lost his grip on his weapon, and he landed off to one side of the wolf. The furious hobgoblin immediately tried to get back up, but his muscles suddenly gave out on him. He stumbled before managing to get back on his feet.

Meanwhile, the wolf flailed about. It seemed to try to scratch the sky for several seconds, but then it let out a deep wheezing breath and flopped down onto its side. Blacknail drew another dagger from within his coat and stared at the beast for several long seconds, but it lay still.

“Ha, now you’re dead. Stupid mutt,” the hobgoblin exclaimed viciously.

He then spat a mixture of blood and mucus to the side and collapsed into a sitting position on the ground. He was really tired all of a sudden. It had been a long day.









IEO 9











The sound of his own deep breathing filled Blacknail’s ears as he sat among the loose rocks from the landslide. The corpse of the huge boar lay behind him and in front of him was the fallen body of the mutant wolf. The bloody beast was finally dead. Blacknail had killed it.

Not that the outcome had ever been in question. Sure, the monster had been tough, but Blacknail was a master ranger and swordsman. He could beat anything.

Now, Blacknail was taking a quick break. The energy from the fight and the Elixir were starting to wear off. Pain was beginning to flare up as Blacknail lost the numbness caused by his rage, and he had more than a few injuries. The wolf had gotten in several good blows and had bitten Blacknail’s arm quite hard. The hobgoblin had also fallen down a hill and hit the back of his head against a rock so hard he lost consciousness. He was probably going to need to stitch himself up.

It was a good thing he’d managed to stun the wolf with that thingy… Wait, had he just used Elixir to do some sort of special magic?

“I’m magic!” Blacknail remarked in excitement as he perked up. Ow, the sudden motion had hurt his neck.

All Vessels were technically magic users. That’s why they had increased strength and speed, but real magic was flashier than that. What was the point unless you could do something impressive like breath fire?

“Now I’m the greatest magic hobgoblin warrior ever!” Blacknail announced proudly to the empty air. “And I’m the leader.”

What exactly had he done, though? The wolf had seemed to spasm and panic. The hobgoblin hadn’t shot fire out of his eyes or zapped it with magic death beams, but whatever he had done had also scared the nearby birds in flight. Scared…. Was that it? Had he simply used magic to terrify the wolf into running away?

That sort of sucked. He wanted to shoot fire out of his eyes. Well, at least he was alive and could brag about having real magic. He might even be able to use it to finally get Khita to leave him alone.

Hmm, maybe his power wasn’t so bad, even if it wasn’t fancy looking. There were probably a lot of great and terrible things he could accomplish with such a power, like jumping out at people to scare them silly.  He couldn’t wait to see the faces of some of his human minions!

“Oh, wait,” Blacknail suddenly muttered to himself. He had a problem. He was out of Elixir now. He had used his entire last vial to fight the wolf, and Blacknail had no idea where to find more. He couldn’t ask Mahedium.

The sun overhead was heating up Blacknail’s clothes, so he got up and shuffled under a nearby tree. Once there, he pulled off his torn clothes and took out some supplies. His wounds needed looking after. Blacknail gritted his teeth as he applied stinging ointment to himself and sowed up the deeper cuts. When that was done, he took a seat on a large root that jutted out from the bottom of the tree, leaned back, and closed his eyes. He needed a quick break.

No strange dreams overcame him as he rested in the cool shade. The birds resumed their chirping and a breeze blew through the trees. The tired hobgoblin nodded off.

Time passed. A shuffling sound intruded into Blacknail’s sleepy mind. He lazily opened one eye and looked around for the source. There was movement a few feet away, over where he’d dropped his bag. Someone was going through it. Was that Scamp? Blacknail stared at the hobgoblin. It was Scamp!

As Blacknail watched, Scamp finished rummaging through the bag. The other hobgoblin pulled a knife out of the sack and then causally ambled over towards Blacknail. He was still holding the knife up, as if he had plans to use it.

“What are you doing here?” Blacknail hissed angrily as he opened his eyes. He wasn’t sure what Scamp was planning, and because he was a hobgoblin he was untrustworthy.

“Oh, you’re awake,” Scamp remarked in surprise as he hid the knife he was holding behind his back.

“Answer the question.”

“You were making a lot of noise. Rocks go boom and stuff. We could hear you at base, so Gob made me come here and check it out. I’ve been hunting a lot lately. Sometimes Gob doesn’t let me back inside the camp unless I bring meat back with me. He’s mean.”

“And why were going through my bag?”

“Um, in case there was something dangerous in there?” Scamp replied uncertainly. “You never know.”

Blacknail rolled his eyes. He may be injured and tired, but he could still beat up Scamp without any real problems. The only reason he didn’t was because he wanted someone to carry his gear. Scamp couldn’t do that with a broken limb or two.

“Give me my dagger back,” Blacknail said as he climbed to his feet and held out his hand.

Scamp smiled sheepishly and did as he was told. As Blacknail was tucking the blade away, three goblins approached the hobgoblins. They were from the camp and had clearly come with Scamp.

“Come look, little beasts!” the leader of the group announced excitedly as he threw his hands up above his head.

Neither Blacknail nor Scamp had any idea what he was talking about, so they followed the energetic goblin over to the base of the hill. There were rocks everywhere now, but Blacknail recognized the spot that the boars had been protecting. Another goblin was standing just outside of the small fissure there. Blacknail pushed the others aside and peered inside. He immediately spotted what the goblin had been talking about.

There were nine small piglets tucked away in the back of the hole. They were all piled on top of each other for warmth and their little pink snouts stuck out from the mass of their brown striped fur.

“I’m taking these,” Blacknail announced as he reached in and pulled one of the critters out. The little thing squinted up at the hobgoblin and then let out an unimpressed grunt.

“Why?” Scamp asked.

“They look tasty and since they aren’t dead yet they will stay fresh for a while.”

“You’re the boss.”

“Yep, that’s me,” Blacknail agreed as he put the piglet back with the others.

There was no point sticking around. Blacknail had recovered somewhat from his fight with the wolf. Whatever Elixir had been left in his system had all been used up to help him heal. He was in far from perfect shape but he wasn’t about to collapse either. His wounds remained but they were no longer bleeding or limiting his movements.

At Blacknail’s command, goblins rounded up the piglets and the corpse of the alpha wolf. They hung the large carcass from a long pole so that four goblins could all carry it together. It was very heavy but there was no way Blacknail was going to leave his trophy behind. He planned on shoving it in everyone’s faces. They all had to know how great he was. This meant that they had to leave a lot of good meat behind, but since they were only a short journey from camp, Blacknail planned on sending some of his minions back to grab them later.

The group’s journey back to the goblins’ camp took a while because they were burdened by their cargo. Blacknail led the way – because he was the leader - and he didn’t set a fast pace. The constant stops were for safety and not because he was tired or weak in any way. Anyone who suggested that would have instantly regretted making such a slanderous insinuation.

The last stop Blacknail made was right at the edge of the forest that bordered the clearing which contained the goblin base. The sight of his camp surprised him. It had changed a lot while its glorious leader had been away.

The most obvious difference was the wall. Except for the gap that served as the entrance, the wall completely blocked the way into the base. The tall barrier of wooden stakes looked crude, but it was still imposing. Dangerous animals would have a much tougher time attacking the goblin camp now, which was good because Blacknail had to live there, and he’d dealt with enough of those for now.

It looked like Gob had managed to keep everyone busy while Blacknail had been gone. Past the wall, two more longhouses were being built among the hills. That meant the base would soon have four of the long wooden structures. There were also some smaller constructions that Blacknail didn’t recognize, and the entire camp was a hive of activity. Goblins were running around everywhere.

There were even four goblins standing outside the break in the wall. Blacknail couldn’t tell if they were on guard or just hanging around there. They had spears, but they seemed to be zoning out or talking amongst themselves, because none of them had spotted the approaching group of goblins and hobgoblins yet. Suddenly, two of the goblins turned on each other and began fighting. They hissed furiously as they wrestled across the ground. Blacknail made a mental note to make sure he posted a hobgoblin or human on watch duty in the future if there was any real looming threat.

The goblins on watch were so focused on fighting or watching the fighters in their midst that they didn’t see Blacknail’s party they were right in front of them.

“Get out of the way, you stupid runts. I’m the leader!” Blacknail hissed back as he walked over. The fighting goblins were blocking the entrance.

The goblins immediately sprang into action. The two fighters separated and all the goblins lined up to stand at attention. It was way too late for them to look even remotely competent. Scamp chuckled at them but shut up when Blacknail threw him a glare. As if he was any better.

After entering the camp, Blacknail ordered the goblins carrying his trophy to deposit over by the larder. He then dismissed Scamp and headed over to his cave. The idea of taking another nap on his comfy sleeping roll sounded really nice.

However, on the way there he noticed something odd. Blacknail studied a group of seven goblins that were hanging out in the shade under a rock. The little green critters were wearing crude clothing made from small tanned hides that had been sewed together. Two of them had stone axes and three of them were sipping water from clay cups, or at least Blacknail assumed it was water. Looking around, Blacknail spotted several other groups just like it. That was a lot of goblins, way more than he had seen before. Since entering the camp he must have seen over two hundred goblins, and very few of them looked like new arrivals. Most of them had tools and clothes.

Blacknail was thinking this over when he arrived at the entrance to his cave. He immediately noticed that Gob was waiting for him there. The hobgoblin lieutenant looked much the same, although he was now wearing a human shirt and ripped human pants. The sword Blacknail had given him was hanging at his side, which reminded Blacknail that he had to replace his own broken blade.

“I rejoice at your return, great one. I saw the corpse of the wolf you laid low. Your warrior might is beyond belief!” Gob exclaimed happily when Blacknail got close.

“Ya, I’m amazing. I want to sleep now, though. You can compliment me later.”

“You’re hurt! Was it the wolf?” Gob remarked in surprise after studying Blacknail for a second.

“I’m fine! I just need some rest.”

“Yes, boss! If you desire anything then just say so. I will do it.”

“Well, you seem to be doing a good job. Keep it up,” Blacknail told him. Gob was one of his most useful minions.

“Whenever I have a problem I just ask myself what a great leader such as you would do!”

“That sounds like the best thing you could do. You’re very smart to have figured that out yourself,” Blacknail told him. “Did anything important happen while I was gone?”

“The four new hobgoblins woke up and five more goblins fell asleep. You should probably meet them,” Gob answered.

Five new goblins were transforming? That was more than Blacknail had expected so soon. His plan only called for around a dozen. At this rate he was going to end up with far more than he could easily control.

“That is important, but so is napping. They’ve waited a few days already so they can wait one more,” Blacknail remarked thoughtfully. “Also, I was wondering about all these goblins. Why are there so many new ones around?”

Gob shrugged before replying. “They just showed up after the wall was built. Every night they come in from the forest. I made sure to put them to work, as I thought you would wish.”

“Lazy good for nothings,” Blacknail hissed.

The goblins must have realized how much safer it was inside the wall and were taking advantage of all the hard work he had put into making it! He hadn’t built it so every little green pest in the forest could relax inside at his expense. There wasn’t anything he could do about it now, though.

“I will make sure all the goblins work hard to serve you, chief!” Gob replied enthusiastically. Blacknail hadn’t actually been asking him to do anything, but whatever.

“Khita isn’t around, is she?”

“No, the loud human female went to Shelter when you left.”

“Okay, good,” Blacknail replied before yawning. He didn’t want the pest interrupting his sleep.

Since there wasn’t anything else pressing to talk about, Blacknail shooed Gob away and pushed aside the hide covering the entrance to his cave. He then entered and went to sleep on his bed. With the soft cloth beneath him, he was unconscious as soon as he had closed his eyes.

Sunlight was streaming in through the cave entrance when Blacknail woke up the next morning. He yawned and stretched as he opened his eyes and looked around. His wounds felt much better. They had scabbed over and were a little stiff but they didn’t hurt at all.

The sound of quiet breathing drew Blacknail’s attention. He instinctively focused on it and looked for the source, in case it was prey. It wasn’t; it was Khita. She was sleeping in her bed on the other side of the cave. Blacknail stared at her in incomprehension for several long seconds, before throwing his blankets aside and walking over to her. She was supposed to be at Shelter! There was no way she could have travelled to the goblin camp over night.

“Wake up!” Blacknail growled as he shook her shoulder.

“Oh, Blacknail you’re finally awake,” Khita told him as she sat up and blinked the sleep from her eyes.

“What are you doing here? I was told you were at Shelter.”

“I came as soon as I heard you were back. It’s been so boring here without you. You’re the only person here who isn’t an idiot or a coward, but when I got here you just slept for two whole days.”

Blacknail groaned. It wasn’t the next morning at all! He had wasted so much time.

The hobgoblin quickly left Khita behind and ran out of the cave to find Gob. He had things to do. His plan was already in motion and wouldn’t wait for him. Once he had found Gob, Blacknail had his minion take him to see the new hobgoblins. They had been receiving some training from Gob but only Blacknail could do it right. They wouldn’t properly fear him unless he was the one beating them.

None of the new hobgoblin looked or smelled familiar to Blacknail. They hadn’t stood out as goblins. All four of them were dressed the same and wearing loincloths.  Gob had probably ordered them to make the clothing themselves. Despite the similarity in their dress though, they were easy to tell apart.

The first two hobgoblins were very similar to each other. They both had long lanky builds and short fuzzy hair on the top of their heads. One had brown hair while the other had grey hair, though. They eyed Blacknail with suspicion as they studied their chieftain with fresh eyes. The pair could probably be trained to obey, though.

The third hobgoblin was a bit shorter and still had some meat on his bones. He also had a small pot belly and was bald like Blacknail. The hobgoblin’s pudgy form was unusual since the hobgoblin transformation normally consumed all of a goblin’s fat. He must have been quite large before his transformation. His expression was guarded but not unfriendly. He seemed to have some measure of self-control already, which Blacknail approved of.

The last new hobgoblin was also a little short but his body was thin instead of fat. He had thick black hair that was long enough it got in his eyes. There was a creepily excited grin on his face as he returned Blacknail’s stare. He didn’t know what to make of it. Was this another goblin with a weird obsession, like Ferrar?

Blacknail then looked down at the hobgoblin’s body. He froze in surprise. Were those breasts? They were. This hobgoblin had a pair of small but noticeable breasts. Understanding dawned on Blacknail as he stared at the naked tits for an uncomfortably long time. This hobgoblin was a female!










IEO 10












It took a few seconds for Blacknail’s brain to start working again. During that time he continued to stare at the female hobgoblin in front of him. She was standing in line with the other three new hobgoblins.

“Ah, I see,” Blacknail mused to himself to fill the awkward silence. He had been planning on acting tough in front of the new recruits, but he had been thrown off track.

Why was this such a surprise anyway? It wasn’t like Blacknail hadn’t considered the idea of female hobgoblins before. He had. It was just that he’d grown used to all of the new hobgoblins being male. Why now had one finally appeared now? There were as many female goblins as there were male ones.

“So, you’re a female,” he told her.

“Yes, I am,” she replied. The female hobgoblin’s eyes shone with excitement as she stared directly at Blacknail. Her intensity was a little unnerving.

“Good...” Blacknail mused aloud. He knew he sounded stupid, but he couldn’t help himself. “Why are you a hobgoblin?”

“Don’t know. I just follow you around everywhere and watch you all the time, and eventually I became like you,” she answered him.

“Huh, I don’t remember you…” Blacknail replied uncertainly.

“No reason a great one such as you should. I was small and unworthy. I stayed back. I avoided other goblins that would distract me.”

“Ah, that makes sense,” Blacknail told her while he forced a smile. That didn’t make sense. He was getting a weird vibe from this female.

The hobgoblin chieftain coughed and took a step back so he could see all the new hobgoblins. He shouldn’t focus on just one of them.

“I’m going to give you all names now,” he told them.

“We have names already,” one of the two lanky hobgoblins remarked as he looked at the other.

“You do? Goblins don’t usually give themselves names,” Blacknail replied. He was more than a little surprised.

Normally, Blacknail only named hobgoblins because no one else did. If they wanted to name themselves that was fine with him. Coming up with good names that everyone had to use forever was sort of annoying anyway. It was too bad he couldn’t just name them all Gob. That was a great name for a hobgoblin.

“No, we gave each other names,” the second lanky hobgoblin explained. “I call him Twig Arms.”

“And I call him Bone Face” the other added with a smile.

Were they being serious? Blacknail scowled at both of them. Why would they insult themselves? This had better not be a joke at his expense, or they were going to get it.

His look didn’t go unnoticed. Bone Face quickly spoke up to explain. “We fight and insult each other a lot.”

“Well, those names are still too annoying to say. You’re Bones and Twig now,” Blacknail told them before turning to the third hobgoblin.

“Do you have a name?” he asked him.

“No.”

“Then now you’re Rolly, because you’re almost as fat as a human,” Blacknail told him.

“Sure,” the chubby hobgoblin replied as he shrugged. He didn’t seem to care all that much.

“What about me? You’re giving me a name, right? It will be a connection between us, forever,” the female goblin asked.

“Er, how about you name yourself?” Blacknail suggested. He didn’t know what to call her. His mind kept going back to Tits, but he didn’t think that would work well.

“You should name me,” she insisted.

Since he apparently didn’t have a choice, Blacknail racked his mind for a name that wasn’t Tits.

“I think I’ll have to name you later. It’s hard,” he told her. He wasn’t coming up with anything. The weird way she was staring at him wasn’t helping him think either.

“Because it’s so important to you?”

“Sure.”

This made her smile fiercely enough that Blacknail grew uncomfortable again. He looked away and addressed the entire group. He ordered them to remain loyal to him and explained that he would be taking over their swordsmanship training.

“…and if you disobey then I will make your skulls into cups,” Blacknail said as he finished up his motivational speech. It had been one of his better ones. “Any questions?”

The other hobgoblins wisely remained silent, except for the female.

“Wanna sex?” she asked him.

“Er… right now?” Blacknail replied uncertainly. Her sudden question had caught him off guard.

“Yep.”

“I’m busy. Maybe later,” Blacknail told her.

He had a feeling that he shouldn’t commit to anything. It could end badly. He needed to think things over first. Her weird behavior made him more than a little suspicious. She might simply be planning on getting close to him so she could kill him and take his place as leader. Also, she reminded Blacknail of Khita. That was a huge turn off.

With his speech complete, the hobgoblin chieftain then made a break for it. He wanted to get some advice so he went to find Gob. He was the only hobgoblin Blacknail could trust, and they came from very different backgrounds. Maybe he would have some wisdom to share.

“What do you think of the new hobgoblins,” Blacknail asked when he found Gob over by his longhouse.

“They will serve you or die,” Gob replied seriously

“Well, of course, but one of them stands out, don’t you think?”

“True, it's weird how he is still fat. Is he going to get even bigger if he eats?” Gob replied thoughtfully.

“No, the female!” Blacknail hissed. “Why is she the only female to transform?”

“I don’t know. I haven’t thought much about it, because you haven’t ordered me to.”

“Fine, what do you think about her, as a female?” Blacknail asked him. This was obviously one of those times he had to be very specific with Gob.

“Umm, she looks a little thin, because she just transformed, but she will probably thicken up and become attractive after a while.” Gob replied uncertainly.

“Do you have any advice for dealing with her?”

“Well, she is a hobgoblin, so try not to get killed?”

It was obvious that Gob wasn’t an expert on female hobgoblins, and that he really wasn’t understanding what Blacknail was trying to get at. He had been hoping Gob would have knowledge to share since he had come from a wild tribe that had been ruled by a hobgoblin. With a disappointed sigh, Blacknail headed off towards his cave.

Was he just over thinking things? Gob seemed fine with her. Maybe some form of human stupidity had rubbed off on him. Their mating rituals were weird and complex. Females and sex had never bothered Blacknail before. He had mated with quite a few female goblins in his life, but he had mostly lost interest in them over the past year.

Was he attracted to the female hobgoblin? He wasn’t sure. She was a lot more human-like than a goblin. That was both a turn on and a turn off. In particular, memories of his experiences with one human in Daggerpoint kept popping into his head, Luphera. Thinking about her always set Blacknail on-edge. Actually, it had been after Luphera had ambushed him that he had started to lose interest in female goblins… No, that was just a coincidence. There was no way he found humans attractive, not even the ones with big breasts like Luphera. Er…

Was it too late to leave this village and find a new one?

“La la la,” Blacknail hummed loudly to himself as he headed for his cave. He was trying to drown out his own obnoxious thoughts. It was even sort of working.

“What are you doing?” Khita asked from where she was standing outside the cave. “That’s some of the worst singing I’ve ever heard. Barking dogs sound better when they’re in heat.”

Her voice made Blacknail stop and look up. Khita wasn’t someone he would usually go to for advice but maybe she might have an idea about naming the female goblin. She was technically a female as well.

“Shut up and listen,” the hobgoblin told her before explaining his problem to her. He left anything even remotely connected to sex, though. He didn’t want to confuse her simple brain.

“Oh, there are female hobgoblins? I can’t wait to meet her!” Khita replied as she grinned and looked around. There were no female hobgoblins in sight so she turned back to Blacknail.

“Of course there are, you idiot,” he told her.

“Ah, I was beginning to wonder since all of you were male, but then I thought it might just be because of you,”

“Because of me?”

“Ya, I was thinking maybe hobgoblin women were avoiding you.”

This statement earned her an annoyed glare from Blacknail. Why would anyone avoid him? Female goblins had thrown themselves at him. He was both strong and incredibly handsome. His nose had a perfect pointy tip.

“Stick to the name, stupid. What should I call her?” he told Khita.

“I don’t know. A lot of women are named after flowers, especially ones from romantic plays, not that I’ve ever watched anything dumb like a play. I um… spend all my time fighting and shit.”

Since he had no idea what she was on about, Blacknail ignored the later part of what Khita had said. It didn’t sound important anyway.

“Hmm, flowers…” Blacknail mused to himself as he began walking away from Khita. She called after him but he ignored it. He was done talking to her.

Saeter had taught Blacknail the names of quite a few flowers, like Goat’s Beard or Stinging Creeper. Stinging Creeper sounded like a good fit for the female hobgoblin. Hmm, it wouldn’t hurt to get more input first, though. Geralhd might be worth talking to.

With the mutant wolf dead and his pack scattered, Blacknail was probably safe making the journey to Shelter by himself. It would take a while for other creatures to move into the wolf’s old territory. However, Blacknail didn’t feel like walking all the way there. He had just gotten back and his feet sort of hurt.

Maybe he would just take a stroll around the camp instead. He still hadn’t seen everything that had changed, and it wouldn’t be a bad idea to check in on Imp and Ferrar. Who knew what they had gotten up to?

They didn’t disappoint him. After crossing the camp, Blacknail found Ferrar over by the clay firing pits. The little goblin wasn’t alone. Imp was right beside him, and they were both studying a furnace.

The sight of the huge oven surprised Blacknail. It was a long structure with an entrance at the front and a chimney at the back that was taller than him. It wasn’t made from just clay either. The walls and roof had been reinforced with countless bricks. The roof even looked to have been made from a brick arch.

“What in the deepest Green is this for?” Blacknail asked as he walked over.

“Making bricks,” Imp replied.

“But you already have bricks… and you needed them to make this,” Blacknail pointed out.

“We used a smaller kiln to make the bricks for this so we could make even more bricks,” Imp explained.

Looking around, Blacknail saw the other kilns. There was the small one Ferrar had created first. It looked like one big lump of clay the size of a goblin. Beside that, there was also another kiln that was about three times as large as the first. It was bee hive shaped and it looked like it had been created using crude bricks that had been plastered with clay. Three tall pots could be seen cooling down inside of it.

“Why do we need to make so many bricks?” Blacknail asked.

“To burn more interesting things!” Ferrar replied cheerfully.

“So we can build important things, like even bigger kilns,” Imp added.

Blacknail sighed. “Why do you want a bigger kiln?”

“Magic!” Imp explained as he raised both his arms dramatically. “I need better tools. I need to tame the flames. Crystals must have steady heat to grow.”

That was probably the best answer Blacknail was going to get. He had no idea what Imp got up to when he was doing his magic stuff. It wasn’t like Blacknail couldn’t see a few ways to use the bricks himself. He was just surprised Imp and Ferrar had gone to such lengths. They had obviously worked hard on this since Blacknail had left, and that thankfully meant that they had been too busy to get into trouble.

“Alright, whatever,” Blacknail told his minions before turning and starting to walk away.

Now that he’d met with all the hobgoblins, Blacknail decided to see what had happened to the body of the fallen wolf. He’d brought it back with him to camp, but he hadn’t seen it since. He wanted to keep its hide as trophy and its teeth would also make an interesting necklace. Anyone that saw Blacknail wearing that would instantly know how big of a deal he was.

What was left of the mutant’s corpse was hanging up on the drying rack. Someone had skinned the beast and hung the hide up to dry.

Blacknail walked over to the wolf’s pelt and gave it a sniff. He smelled brains. It seemed like it was being prepared correctly, but it wasn’t done yet. It would be a few more days until it had dried out. Out of curiosity, Blacknail ran a hand across the grey fur that covered one side of the hide. The hairs prickled his skin and pushed back against him. They were much tougher and springier than normal hair, even if they weren’t as hard as when the wolf had used them to defend itself. Still, the hide was probably strong enough to make a useful cloak that would turn a blow or two.

Blacknail’s thoughts were suddenly interrupted by someone yelling “Hello, boss!”

He turned around to see Scamp headed his way.

“What are you doing here?” Blacknail asked. Scamp usually skulked around so that no one could find him and force him to work.

“Gob ordered me to tan all these hides. I catch most the big beasts, and that’s a lot of work, but he still gets mad if I let any of their skins rot,” Scamp replied. He sounded annoyed about it.

“Good for him,” Blacknail huffed. It sounded like Gob was doing an excellent job.

“It isn’t fair! Why do I need to do everything?”

“What happened to the rest of the wolf?” Blacknail asked. He didn’t feel the need to respond to Scamp’s sniveling.

“The meat smelled funny and went bad right away. The bones are in the cold cave there, and Imp took the crystal thing that was in its skull,” Scamp answered.

“What crystal?”

“The mutant’s horn, it was a magic stone that went into its head. Imp took it.”

“Huh,” Blacknail remarked to himself. He would have to talk to Imp about that later. “What about the little piggies? I remember claiming those. No one ate them yet, did they?”

“No one would dare, boss. The piggies are all in a cage.”

“Good. Have you been feeding them? I want them nice and fat! Pig meat is so juicy. I can’t wait!”

“They’ve been getting food scraps,” Scamp answered.

There were things that goblins wouldn’t eat? Blacknail couldn’t picture that. “Who exactly has been looking after them?”

“Khita was doing it but she stopped. The piggies don’t mind goblins, but every time she tried to pet them they squealed and bit at her. They really don’t like her much.”

“I’m keeping them, forever,” Blacknail exclaimed gleefully.  He had finally found the means to keep the annoying redhead away. All he had to do was train the pigs to follow him around and then they would chase her away every time she bothered him.

“Um, boss. Are you going to talk to Gob about getting someone else to tan the hides?” Scamp asked tentatively.

“Sure, no problem,” Blacknail replied.

“Really?”

“Ya, all you have to do is find another hobgoblin and get them to take your place. Feel free to beat them up until they agree.”

“Oh,” Scamp exclaimed disappointment. He didn’t sound too optimistic about his chances. Blacknail wasn’t either.

“Now get back to work,” Blacknail told him before starting to walk away.

All the distractions had been nice, but now it was time for him to train the new hobgoblins. That meant he had to decide on a name for the female hobgoblin. He couldn’t put it off anymore.

Screw all this thinking. It was annoying. He was just going to go with the first thing on his mind. There was no point getting worked up over the name of a hobgoblin just because she was female.

After crossing the camp, Blacknail met up with the new hobgoblins at the training ground. They were waiting for him with training blades in their hands. Blacknail appraised them and gave the female a particularly long look before approaching them.

Their features and attitude hadn’t changed but the female was now wearing one of Khita’s shirts. The redhead must have tracked her down and given it to her.  That or she had stolen it. No, that couldn’t have happened. She wouldn’t have dared steal anything from Blacknail’s cave.

Blacknail stopped in front of the female goblin and studied her for a second before speaking up. “Your name is Herah.”

She had already been smiling as she stared at Blacknail, but the grin on the female hobgoblin’s face widened considerably as she listened.

“What does it mean?” she asked eagerly.

Blacknail snorted. Names didn’t have to mean anything. He made most them up on the spot, and most the humans had nonsense for names. Although in this case he had chosen hers for a reason.

“It’s based on the name of someone I used to know. She was angry all the time and killed lots of people before she died.”

“Wow! I love it so much,” the hobgoblin exclaimed breathlessly. Her eyes were practically shinning with joy.

Blacknail was sure that Herad would have approved of her name inspiring that of a hobgoblin. The bandit chieftain had always been very hobgoblin-like herself: ruthless, cunning, and quick. Blacknail was unsure about her opinion on cheese, though.

“Now listen you rats. If you think Gob was hard on you then you were wrong! I’m going to really train you,” Blacknail announced as he stepped back and addressed all the hobgoblins.

A grin appeared on Blacknail’s lips as he picked up a training blade and held it up. He would probably feel better about Herah after he had beaten her up a few times. That was how he’d grown to accept the presence of all the other hobgoblins.









INT: NFAM











The clatter of dice filled the room as the small cubes hit the wooden table and rolled across it. It was a quiet noise but the previously rowdy tavern had suddenly gone silent a moment before. A dozen eyes watched with complete focus as the two dice finally came to stop.

“It’s demon’s eyes. You rolled a two, and that means you lose,” a rough looking man observed in carefully neutral tone.

That was the signal for everyone else in the tavern to let their breath out and start moving again. The room suddenly filled up with background noise. The watchers sat back and began talking to themselves as the barmaid wandered away with a tray full of dirty dishes.

“Shit, I was so close! Everything was falling into place,” Elyias swore in disappointment. “I just needed another good roll to finish off the straight set.”

The young man was standing at one end up the table and he punched its wooden surface in anger. The impact shook the table only slightly. It hadn’t been a strong blow.

“Well, that’s definitely the end of your little lucky streak. You just lost everything you had won and then some,” a portly man in the fine clothes of a merchant told him.

“You win some and you lose some. The gods have no favorites among men. The fates they weave suit them; not the likes of us,” another man laughed. He sitting on a chair and leaning back with his boots resting on the table, and he grinned cheekily when Elyias threw him a sour look.

“Bah, I will get a lucky break eventually. My bad fortune can’t last forever,” Elyias muttered to himself.

His remark just caused the man that looked like a merchant to chuckle. He then scooped up the pile of coins Elyias had placed on the counter earlier. It wasn’t a small heap. Several of the coins glinted with the sheen of gold. Elyias had just lost a fair bit of money.

“I wish you nothing but good luck with that, unless of course you decide to come back here and bet with me again, and then I’ll gladly take more of your coin,” the merchant replied happily.

“I think I’ll find another den to place my wagers at. I don’t think place is good luck for me,” Elyias said as he stepped away from the table.

“Suit yourself, lad. Personally, I don’t think you’re going to be finding luck like that anywhere,” the seated man told him.

Elyias just frowned to himself and headed for the door. He didn’t see the point in staying here, since he had no more coins on hand. He’d spent them on drinks and lost them gambling.

“I was so bloody damn close this time,” he muttered to himself as he pushed the tavern door open and stepped outside.

Outside, the cloudy sky overhead was growing dark. It was late in the afternoon and well after supper. Elyias looked up at the sky as he walked back to the inn he was staying at. The clouds were gray and heavy looking. There was a good chance it would rain.

After eating supper Elyias had gone out to find a new gambling spot. That was what he had done every night since arriving in town. After parting with Blacknail, he had headed East until he’d found a fair sized town. The walled settlements that were left in the North were hardly thriving but it was easy enough to find a place to sleep as well as a good place to play some games of chance. Having a lot of gold helped.

Elyias had quickly sold one of the larger chunks of gold that Blacknail had given him. That had given him more than enough to spend several days in luxury. The best wine and women in town had been his. Tonight he didn’t feel like celebrating much, though. He just wanted to get to bed early. Tomorrow was a new day, which would wipe his slate clean.

It probably wasn’t a great idea to keep spending so much money in one place. It would attract attention. However, Elyias wasn’t ready to leave town just yet. Travelling was a pain, and wanted to win some money back here first. He couldn’t leave without getting one good lucky break at dice or cards. That would leave a bad taste in his mouth. Leaving on a high note was important.

There wasn’t very many people in sight as Elyias made his to the inn. Those people he did pass kept walking without doing more than glancing in his direction. It was getting late so people wanted off the streets. Elyias passed a single guardsman with a truncheon who was leaning up against a wall, but the uniformed man barely glanced his way. He didn’t seem to be paying much attention to his surroundings. The guards in towns like these were usually lazy and corrupt.

A minute later, the guardsman was behind Elyias and out of sight, and the entrance to the inn he was staying at lay before him. As he walked, a group of three men exited an alley and headed his way. The men were dressed as common laborers and weren’t suspicious in any real way, but Elyias was suddenly nervous.

Every since he had escaped that crazy hobgoblin that had entrapped him he should have been feeling ecstatic. He was finally free and he had more money than ever before! However, a lingering sense of dread had remained within him. Instead of fading it had grown steadily stronger over time. Elyias had tried taking a hot bath and scrubbing himself clean but that hadn’t helped. Getting completely smashed on hard liquor had also proven to be but a temporary reprieve, with foul consequences of its own.

Under no circumstances was Elyias planning to do the things Blackail had told him to. He was quite happy to spend the gold he had in peace. Getting in touch with Werrick’s men or any other bandits sounded dangerous and stupid. No, he would just head East away from the cursed hobgoblin. If Blacknail ever did manage to track him down – unlikely - then Elyias was sure he could come up with a good excuse, like that the gold had been stolen before he could show anyone.

“Oh, pardon me,” one of the three passing laborers said as he looked up and gave Elyias a friendly grin.

“No problem, thank you,” Elyias replied as the group of three men stepped to the side and walked past him.

A sigh of relief escaped Elyias’ lips. It had really been foolish of him to worry about some random people on the street. Once he was safely at the inn he would order a nice cup of wine and hit the sack.

That was when someone grabbed the back of Elyias’ shirt and pulled him backward. Elyias yelped, went stiff with surprise, and then froze in terror as he felt something thin and cold press itself against his neck. It was knife.

“Actually I just remembered that we have some business with you,” someone said as Elyais was pulled off the street and into another alley.

Once there, he was spun around and confronted by the three laborers. They grinned maliciously at him.

“What do you want?” Elyias gasped.

“You’ve been flashing a lot of coin around lately, newcomer,” one of the men replied.

“You can have it!” Elyias hurriedly told his assailants. “I don’t have much on me but I have some more in my room at the inn.”

“Oh, we know. We’ve already gone and taken a look around that room of yours,” one of the men chuckled as he held up a familiar looking sac.

Elyias’s hopes fell. That was the bag where kept all the raw gold he had been given. He had nothing else of value.
“Then what do you want from me?”

“It’s not often you quality find rocks like this around here, and you don’t seem like a miner to me. We want to know where you got it. Information like that could be very lucrative.”

Several different responses flashed through Elyias’ mind. He quickly chose the one that gave his assailants the least reason to kill him and leave his body in the alley to rot.

“I found it in a cave! There’s lots more gold there, and I can take you to it!”

“Huh, that is indeed promising. Personally, that doesn’t sound like something I’d be interested in going out to find – I’m a city man, myself – but I’m sure we can find someone who would be interested.”

“Ya, Derial’s band is in town. This sounds like something they could profit from. They’ve done a fair bit of raiding for Werrick.”

Elyias chocked down a sob. It seemed like he was heading back to Shelter after all. Why was his luck always so terrible?












OOD 1











A strong wind was blowing in from the North. The thick greenery of the forest kept most of its force away from the earth but the wind that did reach the ground was cold and dry, and it made a lot of noise as it blew through the treetops overhead. The loud rustling of leaves filled the forest. It almost sounded like the whispers of the seashore. Beneath the sound of the wind, the next loudest noise was the slap of footsteps on the forest floor. A hunting party was heading home.

The hunters numbered eight. They moved through the greenery with both confident ease and respectful caution. The savage dangers of the Green didn’t scare them, since most of them had been born and raised in the forest. They were all hobgoblins. Their green skin, sharp features, and long pointy ears made this obvious even if they were wearing a mix of savage looking fur and scavenged human garments. Two of the hunters were carrying a deer between them.

A human observer would have been startled by the sight and probably terrified as well. Hobgoblins simply didn’t form up into groups this large. They were notoriously violent and anti-social. It had been hundreds of years since any human had encountered anything like this hunting party. A single lone hobgoblin was dangerous enough, and it would take a fearsome and powerful leader to bind so many of them together. Even the forest seemed unsure of what to make of them. The calls of animals seemed unusually subdued and wary. There was an expectant feel to the air.

As the hobgoblins stalked forward, the leader glanced over his shoulder at his followers. His eyes quickly glanced over each individual as if he was judging them. Unexpectedly, he suddenly came to halt as he saw something that disturbed him.

“Wait, where did Bones go?” Blacknail asked his minions. In response, all the other hobgoblins threw each other surprised and befuddled looks for a few moments before one of them eventually spoke up.

“Oh, there was a cliff back there. I pushed him off it,” Twig explained helpfully. He was standing at the back of the pack.

“Again? Stop doing that! It’s annoying and we’re supposed to working together,” Blacknail hissed angrily as he glared at the other hobgoblin.

“I had to get him back. He did it to me earlier today,” Twig whined. He was looking down at the ground as if he knew he had done something wrong.

“Just stop! If you hurt a tribemate during a mission again I will throw you off a cliff, headfirst onto jagged rocks while you are tied up. You will not survive!”

“Right. Sorry, boss” Twig muttered sullenly.

“Do you want to go back for him?” another hobgoblin asked.

“No, he can catch up. I’m sure he is fine,” Blacknail replied as he started walking again.

Twig and Bones were constantly fighting and playing tricks on each other. As unlikely as it seemed, neither of them had been seriously harmed yet. Even the incident with the pot full of poisonous snakes had failed to do any lasting harm.

However, it had been made very clear to both the hobgoblins that if one of them actually did manage to kill or maim the other then he would be severely punished. Blacknail didn’t want to condone violence between hobgoblins. He was the only one allowed to kill anyone. Everyone else had to ask permission first.

By the time the party reached the camp, Bones had caught up with them. He seemed no worse for wear except for some dirt on his clothes and some twigs stuck in his hair. All together, the hunting party exited the forest with their prize. The goblins that were guarding the break in the wall quickly got out of their way. Beyond the wall was the goblin encampment. There were now six completed longhouses and various other smaller huts and tents. A plethora of tanned animal hides served as roofs, doors, and decorations. Now that there were several trained hobgoblin hunters in the camp lots of larger animals were being brought in.

The expedition that Blacknail had just led had mostly been to help train several of the new hobgoblins that had only recently transformed. The extra food was nice but it was just a bonus. Blacknail had plans, plans that required hobgoblin minions that could hold their own in a fight, so he could murder people.

Blacknail looked over the hobgoblins behind him. Most of them looked vicious and savage in their scavenged clothes. As they scanned the forest and each other , their eyes were focused in a way that humans’ weren’t. Their gazes glimmered with hunger and focused cunning. They seemed to be living in the moment in a way most human’s couldn’t.

There was no doubt that hobgoblins were dangerous, but they also had serious weaknesses. Their main problem was their size. Hobgoblins were usually shorter and thinner than humans. This meant they were at a disadvantage in a head to head fight. Then there was their age. All the hobgoblins under Blacknail’s command couldn’t hope to match the experience and skill of human fighters. They had only begun to learn how to use a sword. Blacknail’s hobgoblins would be destroyed in anything like a fair fight.

However, this fact didn’t stop a vicious grin from appearing on Blacknail’s lips. Hobgoblins didn’t fight fair, and for every weakness they had they possessed two strengths. Hunting and stalking came naturally to them. They were also fast, agile, and completely without mercy. That was why Blacknail was focusing on teaching them how to fight in the forest and use bows. Proper use of instinct and cunning would allow his hobgoblins to defeat any clumsy humans they encountered, and they were learning fast. Blacknail would soon have his two dozen skirmishers. If only dozens of other problems weren’t constantly popping up to distract him.

As they reached the drying racks one of the new hobgoblins turned towards Blacknail and asked a question. “Do humans really taste that bad?”

“Yes, they do,” Blacknail answered as he motioned for the hobgoblins carrying the deer to put it down by the racks. “So you can’t eat them, even if they are enemies, unless it’s an emergency.”

This was a question he got quite frequently from the new hobgoblins.

“Hmm, but what exactly do they taste like?” the hobgoblin enquired.

“Humans sort of taste like squirrel meat that has been out in the sun for a few days,” Blacknail told him.

The young hobgoblin made a disgusted face and Blacknail nodded in agreement. Humans did taste pretty bad, but Blacknail wanted to make sure none of the new hobgoblins did any experimenting on their own. That might ruin his plans.

“Hey, boss,” Rolly announced as he stepped out of the cave that served as the camp’s larder. “I will take that deer and make sure it gets chopped up properly.”

“Alright,” Blacknail replied.

Rolly had somehow ended up in charge of the larder and the drying rack. Blacknail wasn’t entirely sure how that had happened, but he was too busy to question it. The chubby hobgoblin seemed to be doing an alright job anyway. He had put on a few more pounds, but the amount of food being stolen had actually gone down.

There were a lot of things that needed Blacknail’s attention so he turned and started to walk away, but Rolly stopped him.

“Ah, boss, I need to talk to you about something,” The pot bellied hobgoblin said.

“What?” Blacknail asked sourly. This already sounded like it was going to be more work for him. He hated working.

“We’re getting short on food. The goblins are bringing in less and more of them keep showing up. We need more food.”

“Just round up some goblins and send them out to forage,” Blacknail replied as he gestured vaguely in the direction of the trees.

“I’m doing that. It’s not enough. We have too many goblins and the forest around the camp is being stripped clean,” Rolly explained.

Blacknail sighed. He hadn’t planned on gathering so many goblins. They had begun showing up on their own after the wall had been completed. He didn’t want so many of the pesky runts but if he chased them away they would just come back. Maybe he could round a whole bunch of them up and slaughter them? No, that would ruin morale…

“Fine, leave it to me. I’ll solve it somehow,” Blacknail muttered as he turned to leave again. Sometimes being the leader was a pain. It was his minions’ fault. They weren’t smart enough to solve their own problems so Blacknail had to do it for them. He really needed to find some smarter minions.

After grabbing something to eat, Blacknail still hadn’t found an answer to the food shortage, so he decided to ask a human for advice. They usually had a solution to most problems, if only because they caused so many. Since Khita was the only human nearby he went to find her.

The young redhead was over at the field that was used as a training ground. Several hobgoblins were watching as Khita showed them a sword technique. Khita wasn’t a great swordsman but she had solid basics and that was more than the hobgoblins knew. There was also no one else more skilled available.

“Have any of them tried to kill you yet?” Blacknail asked as he walked up to Khita. It was only a matter of time until someone got fed up with her.

“No, but I’ve been keeping my eyes open,” Khita replied cheerfully. “A few of them have been glancing at me out of the corner of their eye when they think I’m not paying attention.”

“You should probably beat one up as an example.”

“I’ve been considering it. These hobgoblin aren’t so different from the street scum that used to run in my old gang. Once they know who the boss is they will behave.”

“That’s me; I’m the boss,” Blacknail reminded her sternly. No one must ever be allowed to forget that.

“But I’m one of your most trusted lieutenants!” Khita told him.

“No, you’re not,” Blacknail replied as he stuck out his tongue at her.

However, Khita had already turned away and gave no sign of having heard him. She was watching her students with her chest puffed up proudly. Blacknail sighed and decided to get to the point. It was annoying just being around Khita.

“I have a question. What did you use to do when you ran out of food?” he asked her after making sure she was paying attention.

“Steal something and then sell it,” Khita automatically replied.

That wasn’t a terrible idea in general, but it didn’t really help him right now. There weren’t many people he could steal from. Even Shelter was low on food, and there was no one to sell to either.

“That’s a dumb idea. You humans have thousands of people in your cities; how do you feed them all?”

“Farming, I guess?”

“That’s that thing were you dig in the ground a lot?” Blacknail asked skeptically. He liked mud as much as the next hobgoblin but he didn’t see how all that digging would be useful.

“Pretty much. You plant seeds and harvest the plants later,” Khita explained.

“Ah, I see. Goblins could do that… but it would take a while and it is probably more complicated than it sounds,” Blacknail mused. Everything humans did was unnecessarily complicated.

“Probably, I don’t know anything. Mucking about in the dirt is for country bumpkins like the villagers at Shelter.”

“That’s it. They have fields outside Shelter! I’ll convince them to take in some more goblins and use them for farming. Goblins can dig and plant things!”

“They still won’t produce food anytime soon,” Khita remarked doubtfully.

“Yes, but while they are there I won’t have to feed them,” Blacknail replied smugly.

“Well, if you’re going back there I want to go with you. I’m done here and I’ve got some things to do at the village.”

“Whatever,” Blacknail replied.

“I need to grab some gear. Give me a minute,” Khita said. She then dismissed the hobgoblins that she had been teaching and started walking toward the cave she shared with Blacknail.

Most of her hobgoblin students immediately began leaving, but one of them stayed behind. It was Herah, and as Khita turned her back she threw Blacknail a meaningful look and gestured toward one of the other hobgoblins that was leaving. It was one of the latest batch, who Blacknail had named Lumpy. He was a very average looking hobgoblin, except for the bump on his nose that gave him his name.

After studying Lumpy for a moment, Blacknail turned back to Herah and gave her an affirmative nod. He then headed over to his cave via a circuitous route that led him around the other side of a lodge and away from everyone else. Once out of sight, Blacknail stopped walking and began to jog. He dropped his head down and surveyed his surroundings as he stalked forward at a quicker pace. There were a few goblins by the side of the lodge but they ignored him.

Soon Blacknail had circled around and gotten ahead of Khita. From the shadows at the base of a rocky outcropping he studied the nearby hills and buildings. There was practically no one around this part of the camp. Everyone tended to avoid it since it was so close to Blacknail’s cave and he was sometimes cranky in the mornings, so when Blacknail detected movement atop one of the hills he zeroed in on it.

It was Lumpy. The hobgoblin was peering over the edge of the hill as if he was waiting for someone, and there was a large rock in his hands. Blacknail found that to be highly suspicious.

In a few short moments Khita would be directly beside the hill. She was very predictable and almost always followed the same paths when she moved to different parts of the base. Lumpy had undoubtedly noticed this and taken advantage of it. He was planning on throwing the rock from out of sight and then running away. His scent would be hard to distinguish among all the other goblins and there were ways to hide it. If it hit, a stone that size would cave in Khita’s skull.

Ever so slowly, Lumpy raised the rock he was holding up above his head. He was preparing to strike. Blacknail dashed forward. He zoomed across the open ground and a series of quick leaps carried him up the hill. The noise drew Lumpy’s attention. He began to turn. Before he realized what was happening, Blacknail had grabbed the back of his shirt and stabbed him. His knife slid up under the other hobgoblin’s ribs and into his soft internal organs.

“You’re too stupid and ugly to live,” Blacknail told the dying hobgoblin. Lumpy’s plan had not only been treacherous but also ill-conceived. There was no way Blacknail wouldn’t have been able to trace it back to him. There was no room in the tribe for a stupid hobgoblin with poor self-control. Also, Blacknail had never liked the hobgoblin’s face. He was better off dead.

Lumpy gasped but Blacknail just sneered and threw him off of the hill. His body bounced as it hit all the rocks on the way down, and it left a trail of blood on the rocks before coming to a stop in front of a very surprised Khita.

“What? What in all the hells did he do?” Khita asked when she looked up and saw Blacknail perched above her.

“He was going to kill you, you idiot,” Blacknail hissed. Killing always made him angry and excited.

“Oh,” Khita exclaimed in surprise. She looked stunned for a moment.

“Well, you didn’t need to kill him! I could have handled it myself,” she added defensively a second later. It seemed like she had recovered her wits, even if they weren’t very good wits.

“Just go get your stuff,” Blacknail told her dismissively. “I’m leaving without you if you take too long.”

After a moment of hesitation, Khita did as she had been asked. The young redhead pulled her gaze away from the dead hobgoblin and began jogging over to the cave. Blacknail watched her go until he heard a soft whish of movement from behind himself. Unsurprised, he turned to see Herah standing there.

“See, I told you earlier that stupid Lumpy was going to try and hurt the human,” she announced as she leaned in close to Blacknail. The female hobgoblin was grinning in her usual overexcited way, and Blacknail had to fight the urge to take a step back from her.

“You did,” Blacknail replied neutrally. He had been very suspicious when she had first approached him.

Herah was hard to read and even harder to predict. Blacknail had no idea what was going on behind her creepy smile. If anyone was going to try and kill someone he had thought it would be her.

“I’m surprised you’re so concerned about Khita,” he told Herah as he studied her face. He had noticed the female hobgoblin staring at Khita with a sour expression on her face more than once. It was little wonder that she had noticed that Lumpy was going to try something.

“If she dies who else would I learn all about you from? We talk a lot. Also, she is one of my glorious boss’ possessions. Of course I would protect her,” Herah explained as she continued to grin.

“She’s um… not really mine…” Blacknail muttered in reply. “She just kind of hangs around, like a swarm of mosquitoes.”

“But I did good, yes?”

“You did. No one is allowed to kill anyone else without my permission,” Blacknail replied as he met her eyes and stared into them.

After a few more minutes of awkward conversation Blacknail dismissed Herah. He still had no idea what he was going to do with her, but she didn’t seem like an immediate threat. He was tempted to give in to her advances, it had been a while and she wasn’t bad looking, but he couldn’t shake the feeling that she was dangerous. Letting another hobgoblin get so close might end badly for him. Her teeth were rather sharp…

Also, Blacknail was fairly certain that she had goaded Lumpy into making the attempt on Khita’s life, and that she had set him up to fail. She was definitely dangerous.
















OOD 2










Blacknail was walking through the forest. He had left the goblin settlement behind him and was headed to Shelter. There were things he had to talk to the humans about and he wanted to get some distance from the other hobgoblins. He had mostly gotten used to having them around but they still made him a little uneasy. It was nice to get away and relax sometimes. When he had first come up with the idea to create a small group of hobgoblin minions to help keep his human ones in line he’d failed to realize how complicated dealing with them would be. He had just planned on killing a few as an example. Herah alone caused him quite a bit of anxiety.

As he followed the thin dirt trail, Blacknail ducked under a leafy branch and jumped over a muddy puddle. He was almost to the village now. Suddenly, the hobgoblin noticed something out of the corner of his eye. There was a track in the mud, and it belonged to a wolf. Suspiciously, Blacknail leaned over and brushed aside a few nearby plant leaves as he scanned the ground for any more signs. However, after sniffing the ground and only detecting one unique scent he decided that there was only one wolf nearby. It was probably a survivor from the pack of the mutant he had slain in glorious battle. The track was fresh but a single wolf wasn’t much of a threat – Blacknail had easily defeated the Alpha after all - so he continued on his way. He wanted to reach Shelter before too long.

A few more minutes passed. Blacknail was just about to reach the edge of the forest when he heard a noise from off in the distance. The hobgoblin looked around but didn’t see anything. Had another hobgoblin followed him? If they had then they were going to get smacked aside the head.

Blacknail still didn’t see anyone so he listened carefully. It sounded like someone was talking off in the forest, so he stepped off the path and headed over to find the source. If there was something going on he wanted to know about it. Hunters sometimes left Shelter but the hobgoblin never had a problem detecting and avoiding them.

Carefully, Blacknail peeked out from behind a tree. He quickly spotted the source of the noise. It was one of the human children from the village, the unimportant young male with brown hair. Aris was his name. He was leaning against a tall tree with rough bark and there was a frustrated scowl on his face.

Blacknail’s first instinct was to sneak up, knock him over the head, and see if he had any items worth claiming, but that was beneath him now. He was a great leader! If he wanted something he just ordered his minions to hand it over. His second instinct was to leave the human alone, but there was a wolf around. Bringing the stupid human back with him seemed like a good way to earn some good will. The hobgoblin pulled his hood up and wrapped his scarf around his face. His frighteningly handsome face and green skin were now completely concealed.

“She didn’t have to turn me down so quickly,” Aris muttered to himself before kicking a rock into a clump of bushes. “Stupid girls. Why am I always the one left out?”

Blacknail took the opportunity to step out from behind the tree and call out to the human. “You shouldn’t be out here by yourself. Something might decide you look tasty.”

The hobgoblin’s voice startled the young man. He jumped and spun around to see who had spoken. His eyes went wide with fear when he spotted Blacknail but then he calmed down as he realized who the hooded figure had to be.

“Ah, how much of that did you hear?” Aris asked Blacknail tentatively. His cheeks had turned more than a little red from embarrassment.

“Um, less than all of it but more than nothing,” Blacknail remarked as he stepped closer and scratched the side of his head through his hood. What kind of dumb human question was that?

“Anyway, you’re not the boss of me, so you can’t tell me what to do,” Aris replied surly.

“I’m the boss everyone I say I am, and I can tell you what to do because you’re dumber than me. If you had any smarts at all then you wouldn’t be out here alone. It’s dangerous for a useless person like you.”

“It’s not that dangerous and I’m not useless.”

“Saying that just proves how useless you are. The Green is always dangerous. That was the first thing my master taught me, that and how to braid twine. I spent a lot of time making rope…”

“This part of the forest is as safe as it gets. That’s all I meant. You’re the newcomer here. I’ve lived here my entire life, asshole,” Aris huffed in reply.

“So you know there are hungry wolves about? I just found some fresh tracks, but if you think it’s safe you can stay here, youngling,” Blacknail countered. If the annoying little human wanted to die then Blacknail wasn’t going to go out of his way to save him.

“I, um…”

“Just follow me. I will take you back to Shelter,” Blacknail told him as he stopped in front of the young man and motioned in the direction of the village. The sooner he got this young idiot back to the village the less he would have to listen to his drivel.

“Fine, but how much of what I said earlier did you hear?”

“You were whining about girls,” Blacknail replied without interest as he turned and started walking again. Aris winced and reddened again at Blacknail’s blunt response but he didn’t deny it.

“It’s just that Joan hasn’t had any time to do anything with me for the past while. She’s always busy doing some stupid pottery stuff or getting up to the gods know what with Khita,” the young man explained.

“I didn’t ask.”

“I’ve barely seen her for days. We grew up together and Khita is just a newcomer, a total stranger!” Aris continued as if Blacknail hadn’t said anything.

“Why do you people keep telling me these things?” Blacknail asked. He seriously wanted to know. He had no interest in the minutia of human existence but they kept telling him about it.

“I guess you just seem like a good listener. You’re very laidback and quiet. You also seem to always know what you are doing.”

Blacknail sighed to himself in resignation before responding. If Aris was going to keep asking these questions then he might as well give his honest opinion. “Do you have a real question?”

“I was just wondering if you have any advice on girls.”

After thinking about the question for a few moments Blacknail voiced his thoughts on the matter. “They are trouble. You need to watch them carefully so that they can’t stab you in the back.”

“Ya, I think I see what you mean. Joan really shouldn’t be ditching me like this,” Aris replied with obvious frustration. The pair then walked in silence for a few brief moments. Blacknail didn’t think Aris had really understood what he’d meant.

“So um…Blacknail, I’d like to go with you,” the young man asked after a few all too brief seconds.

“Probably, getting back to the village will be much safer with me.”

“No, I mean when you leave the Shelter.”

“You want to go to my camp?”

“No, when you leave the village for good! I want to accompany you and your friends when you go South. I know you will be leaving eventually.”

“Sure.”

“Really?”

“Ya, I could always use another human minion.”

“Why did you just mention the fact that I’m human?”

“Because you are?

“I guess that’s true… but you’re still weird. Also, you’re not supposed to agree with me. You’re supposed to tell me to stay in the village and do as the elders tell me.”

“Why would I do that? Will the elders kill either of us if we disobey them?”

“Um, no. They will probably just scold me and give me chores.”

“Then what they want doesn’t matter. You should do whatever helps me the most.” Blacknail would kill people who disobeyed him.

“You’re very honest.”

“Always. I was taught that lying to people you don’t intend to kill is a bad idea. It makes you look bad,” Blacknail explained as he nodded sagely. The other trick was lying in such a way that you never got caught. Blacknail was an expert at that.

When they reached the village gate Blacknail parted with the Aris and went to find Tannin. As he was walking through the village, he spotted a goblin sitting on a barrel. It was right out in the open and appeared to simply be resting as it leisurely looked around. An older village woman passed it by and didn’t give it a second glance. It seemed like the goblins had already been completely accepted by the villagers. That was good. It would make talking to Tannin much easier.

It only took Blacknail a few minutes to find Tannin. The village elder was talking to some men in the village center. Blacknail waited for them to leave before approaching. Much to Blacknail’s surprise, it didn’t take much effort to convince Tannin to try using the goblins as farm laborers. Tannin seemed impressed by what the goblins had managed so far.

“You know, that’s a clever idea you got there. I’ve been trying to figure out how to get some of the old worked lands productive again,” Tannin explained enthusiastically. “The fact that year after year the fields have been getting smaller has been weighing down on me like a fat sow. We just haven’t had the manpower we need to keep the forest back.”

“Goblins can definitely help you there. Being forced to do simple repetitive things is their specialty. They can also dig well.”

“The labor is nice but it’s the increased safety that really intrigues me.” Tannin explained. “We can’t afford to lose any villagers to the dangers of the forest, but if we use goblins to do most the dangerous work…”

“Exactly, they’re also great that way. There are always more goblins!” Blacknail agreed.

“Yes, I think this is a great idea with lots of potential,” Tannin replied as he nodded along happily. “Thank you for suggesting it; it sounds so crazy that I would have never come up with it myself. However, the goblins you got us have proven so useful as pest control already. There hasn’t been a single loss of stores since they settled in. Some people are even teaching them tricks.”

“Goblins can do a lot. They even use them to clean sewers in some places. I know a lot about that.”

“I thought you said your master was the one who started training goblins.”

“He was, but I’m from the South and I’ve seen them work there.”

“Oh, where exactly do you hail from?”

Blacknail stiffened. He had been telling the truth. He really did come from a city in the South. He had spent most of his life there, but he had no idea what it was called. Names hadn’t mattered much to him back then.

“…Southmantown?” he suggested.

“I’ve never heard of it,” Tannin replied dryly.

“Well, they have big sewers there and they use goblins to clean them. They keep the rats out. Rats are tasty… if you’re a goblin, which I’m not.”

“Er.. right,” Tannin replied uncertainly. There was an awkward silence as Blacknail and him stared at each other for a few moments.

“Hey, Blacknail! There you are,” someone suddenly yelled from off to one side. The hobgoblin turned to see Geralhd and another bandit coming down the street towards him. Looking closer, Blacknail realized that the second man was Beardy, he had simply trimmed his beard so that it was much smaller now.

“We need to talk to you,” Geralhd announced as he walked over.

“I’ll just leave you fellows alone then. I got business of my own I need to get to,” Tannin remarked before nodding politely and wandering off.

That left Blacknail alone until the other two bandits got to him. He considered running off for a second, but swiftly discarded that idea. He had a good idea of what Geralhd wanted, and it wouldn’t be problem. Blacknail’s plan was already in motion.

“Hello, friends,” Blacknail said as he waved at the newcomers.

“It’s about time you showed up,” Beardy growled. “We’ve been waiting around here forever.”

“I’ve been busy. Surviving in the Green is hard. You need to do a lot of difficult hunting and stuff,” Blacknail replied as he shrugged indifferently.

“Still, it was beginning to look like you were avoiding us,” Geralhd told him. “We’ve been wanting to talk to you, but when you do enter the village you always slip away without contacting me or any of the others.”

“You could just ask Khita.”

“We’re not going to have a serious conversation by passing messages through that maniac. Every new dawn that sees her still alive is a minor marvel,” Beardy commented as he glowered.

“This is serious, is it?” Blacknail asked innocently. This caused Beardy’s frown to deepen, but that had been the point. It was fun to needle him.

“It’s serious enough. You’re our band’s ranger and an important part of our group. We need to be able to reach you,” Geralhd told him.

“I’m the leader, so that’s very true. Now what do you want, my faithful minions?”

Geralhd rubbed his forehead and looked down for a second. Beardy just grunted in annoyance. Their reactions continued to amuse the hobgoblin. He had to stifle a smile. Humans could be so predictable. They always thought they were smarter than him. A moment later, Beardy threw Geralhd a meaningful look that seemed to say that the other man should do the talking.

“We’ve been here in this little backwater village long enough. It’s time to leave. We’ve managed to repair our gear and gather supplies so there is no reason to stick around any longer,” Geralhd said.

“Exactly. It’s time to hit the road,” Beardy interjected.

“Right now?” Blacknail asked with fake confusion.

“No, in a day or two. We just need to make sure you’re ready to guide us… and lead us.”

“And don’t tell anyone about this. We plan on slipping away at the crack of dawn when the village is asleep. They might get upset if they find out, and there is no reason to upset them,” Beardy added.

“Alright, if that’s what you want. I’m tired of this place as well. I want to go somewhere with a better selection of cheese, and I’m sick of staying out in the forest where I have to hunt. Ugh, camping is so much work,” Blacknail told them as he scowled in distaste and kicked the ground for extra effect.

He was fine with the bandits’ plan. They had said exactly what he thought they were going to say and he had already accounted for their actions. The third phase – or was it the fourth? - of Blacknail’s ingenious plan would probably kick in before the date of departure, and if not then Blacknail could just stall them. It wasn’t like they could go anywhere without him. It might be amusing to fake an injury or something…

“I’m glad you agree with our unworthy idea, wise leader,” Beardy remarked as he rolled his eyes. Blacknail suspected he was being sarcastic.

“Hmm, it’s nice to finally have a plan in place,” Geralhd said as he smiled cheerfully. “I was afraid I was never going to feel the sweet taste of fine wine on the tip of my tongue ever again.”

“Yes, it is nice to have a plan. You can accomplish anything, and kill anyone, if you have a good plan, no matter how long it takes,” Blacknail replied as he pulled down his scarf and gave the bandits a vicious smile that revealed all his teeth. He couldn’t help but gloat a little. He had been bottling in his feelings for so long. He wanted to kill!

This statement didn’t appear to please either of the bandits. Geralhd grinned back uncertainly and Beardy’s face went carefully neutral. He seemed to be thinking something over.

“Blacknail, what is it that you actually want? I just realized that I don’t know?” Geralhd asked a second later.

“I just want to help you!” the hobgoblin answered as he spread his hands out in a friendly manner. His humans just didn’t know what they really needed. It was lucky for them that their leader did.

“That is incredibly unlikely,” Beardy muttered to himself sourly.

Suddenly, there was bout of yelling from the direction of the village gate. It was swiftly followed by the sound of a horn. The long bellow echoed out over the roofs of the village, and immediately drew everyone’s attention. They all turned to look toward the gate.

“What was that?” Geralhd asked.

Since neither of his companions knew, the trio quickly decided to head for the gate and find out. No one blew a horn like that for no reason. Before they got to their destination they encountered Tannin. He was huddled with a dozen other men from the village. They all looked uneasy and upset.

“What’s going on?” Geralhd asked them as they jogged over.

“That was our warning horn. There is a large group of armed men crossing the field, and they look about as friendly as a troll with an arrow up its ass,” Tannin cursed. His face was uncharacteristically pale and there was a fearful tremor to his voice.

Oh, hey! The enemy was early. Blacknail stepped behind Beardy and did a little happy dance. Elyias must have done a good job. That man deserved a reward. Blacknail hoped he was still alive.













OOD 3

















The long bellowing sound of the warning horn rang out over the village of Shelter. Its unusual cadence seemed to vibrate in people’s bones and put them on edge. Geralhd, Beardy, and Blacknail followed Tannin and the other villagers over to the town gate. Everyone was talking to each other as they strode purposely forward. The air was thick with tension and everyone looked fearful and nervous. Blacknail was at the very back and there was a cheerful spring in his step as he skipped along after the humans. This was going to be great fun!

“I’ve already called up the town militia,” Tannin was explaining to Geralhd. “I’d like you to arm your own men and join us. The stronger and steadier we look the less likely this situation is to fall to bloodshed.”

“What? We can’t trust them!” another villager protested. He was a middle-aged man with a balding head. “They’re probably the reason these outsiders are here. It can’t be a coincidence that we get one group of intruders right after the other.”

“Could they be after you? When you first came here, you did mention that you were looking to escape from some enemies that you had made,” Tannin asked as he turned to face Geralhd.

“It’s highly bloody unlikely,” Geralhd quickly responded in an offended tone. “We had rivals we were avoiding but the timing for this makes no sense. They have no reason to search the Green for a full month in the slim hope of catching us! They would gain absolutely nothing from that, and our trail is beyond cold and dead. How could they possibly know where we are?”

As he frowned thoughtfully, Tannin considered this answer. After a moment, he nodded and turned back to the man who had spoken. “I have to agree with Geralhd. They’ve been here too long for this to be someone looking for their tracks. That means that this isn’t directly related to them, so we need to trust our guests for now. We’re all in this mess together.”

“We’ll know who the newcomers are soon enough, I guess. I have a feeling we're not going to like it, though,” the balding man replied as he stared off toward the gate.

“I fear you’re right,” Tannin agreed. He sounded apprehensive. While they were talking, Gerahld sent Beardy off to gather up the remaining members of their band. 

Nothing more of much importance was said until they reached the gates. When they got there, Tannin climbed up the ladder that led to the watch platform, as the others peered through the gaps in the log walls. Blacknail jumped up and pulled his head over the wall so he could see. His display of agility got him a few looks but everyone had more important things to worry about than him.

“Damnation, there are a lot of the bastards,” Tannin cursed as he studied the approaching group. Blacknail agreed with him.

Across the field, the hobgoblin could see a large mob of humans. They definitely looked like bandits to Blacknail, and he was an expert. They were wearing dirty, rough clothing and they were armed to the teeth. Blacknail could see a plethora of weapons such as swords and axes. However, most telling of all, they were walking with an arrogant swagger that promised violence at the drop of a hat. Blacknail knew it well.

“Ya, these ruffians look like trouble,” Geralhd commented to no one in particular.

Blacknail began counting, but then got frustrated and stopped. They kept moving around, but he figured there were just over a hundred intruders. That was more than Blacknail had been planning on dealing with. Stupid Elyias couldn’t do anything right. Hmmm, this was a bit of a problem. He would have to make sure the village didn’t get damaged too much. It was full of resources he wanted under his control. Still, the enemy were just humans. They had no idea what was waiting for them out here in the Green. This was Blacknail’s territory.

As the people at the gate were talking among themselves and trying to come up with a plan, more villagers began to arrive. Those that weren’t already armed were quickly handed weapons such as axes or improvised spears. Soon, there were dozens of them, and they were joined by Beardy and the other bandits. Even Khita was there. All of them were armed and Beardy led them right over to Geralhd. Their swords, leather armor, and confident posture made them easily distinguishable from the villagers.

“Huh, it’s been a while since we were all together like this,” Beardy commented as he looked Blacknail’s way.

“Let’s hope it’s not the last,” another bandit replied.

“Don’t be such a downer,” Khita said as she punched the man in the shoulder. “After all we’ve been through this will be easy, like picking the pocket of a drunken housewife.”

“Stealing is bad. Don’t be a thief!” Blacknail interjected as he threw Khita a disgusted scowl.

“Is Blacknail aware of what bandits do? We were all bandits,” Beardy asked Geralhd as he leaned his way.

“Now is not the time,” Geralhd answered. “Let’s focus on the situation at hand, please. We need to figure out what we should be doing.”

“I thought that would be obvious. I have no problem with helping these folk negotiate from a position of strength, but the second things get dicey we should leave. I’m not dying to defend this hole in the mud.”

“And where would we go, exactly? The last time I checked, we were still out here in the middle of nowhere.”

“Blacknail’s with us now. We can leave at any time,” Beardy replied matter-of-factly.

“Shelter has been good to us. I don’t want to leave these people to die,” an uncertain sounding bandit added.

This immediately caused all the bandits to start arguing among themselves. Khita was uncharacteristically silent. She seemed unsure of herself and torn. Blacknail just snorted and looked away. It didn’t matter what any of the humans said. Everything was going as he had planned. He hadn’t left them any choice but to do what he wanted.

“Quiet, all of you. This isn’t useful,” Geralhd eventually told them all. “We obviously don’t know enough right now. We will see what these people want before we make any plans.”

There was some grumbling in response, but no one spoke up against Geralhd directly, so he nodded to himself and then walked over to talk to Tannin. Blacknail followed him. They joined the village chief just in time. Most of the new arrivals came to a stop before they got to close to the gate of the village, but one man detached himself from the crowd and approached alone. Blacknail peered through a gap in the wall to get a good look at him.

“Hail, the settlement! I’ve come to parley!” the man yelled. He was a tall man with black hair and a grizzled appearance that screamed bandit.

“We hear you. Who are you, stranger?” Tannin yelled back.

“Greetings, goodmen. My name is Orvit. I’m the leader of the scavenger crew you see before you.”

“Scavengers? I know thieves and marauders when I see them. What does someone like you want out here? You’re a long way from anything worth scavenging.”

“I’ll be blunt. We’ve come for the gold. Tell us where it is and then no one will get hurt.”

“We don’t have any bloody gold here, stranger. You’re confused.”

“Don’t lie to me, old man. I’ve seen the nuggets myself, and this is right where it is supposed to be.”

There was silence from Tannin for a few moments. He looked confused and he took a while to think before replying. “Give me a minute. I need to discuss this with some others.”

“Fine, but we’re not going anywhere until we get the location of that gold mine. We will storm your pathetic little village if we have to. Don’t think we won’t!”

Tannin immediately called over a pair of villagers and Geralhd.  “Does anyone here have any idea what these idiots are talking about? They mentioned a gold mine.”

“If any of my band knew where a gold mine was we would have left ages ago and be living it up in a city somewhere,” Geralhd told him.

“Wait, maybe that’s why the others left…” Beardy guessed.

“You think they found gold and decided they didn’t want to share it?”

“Maybe, and then they ran into these bastards.”

“I told you these outsiders were the cause of all this trouble!” the angry villager from before interjected.

“That doesn’t matter right now,” Tannin told the man in calm soothing voice. “Even if there is gold around these parts, none of us know where it is, so we can’t exactly give it to anyone.”

“These scavengers aren’t going to like that,” Geralhd pointed out.

“Which means this is most likely going to end in violence,” Beardy remarked dryly.

“Not necessarily. If we present a strong front we could still scare them away. All men are afraid of dying,” Tannin told them.

“You’re underestimating the siren call of gold to people like them. If they don’t dare attack us directly then they will simply try something else. They won’t just leave,” Geralhd replied.

“It would be bothersome if they just sit outside our walls and look for a way in. We can’t stay in here forever, and if they manage to slip inside during the night they could do a lot of damage,” Tannin mused aloud.

“Can we take them in straight up fight? That might be our best option,” one of the village militiamen asked.

“Charging them would be a rather large tactical mistake,” Geralhd said. “It looks like your militia and the men with me are about equal in numbers to Orvit’s force, but they are better armed and trained than your militia. We’d take heavy casualties if we managed to win the day at all. Defending the wall greatly increases our odds.”

This topic was actually something Blacknail cared about, so he spoke up. “You’d be slaughtered. Don’t go out there.”

“But we can’t make them attack us when we want them to. I can’t have the militia on duty forever,” Tannin countered.

“So what do you want to do?” the militia man asked.

“I’m going to have to try and talk to them again. Maybe I can convince them that we don’t have any gold.”

“That’s a terrible idea,” Beardy told him as he rolled his eyes disdainfully.

“It’s also stupid. They might kill you,” Blacknail added. He didn’t want Tannin talking to the scavengers too much, he might learn more than he was supposed to. That would be awkward.

“Nonetheless, I have to at least try to resolve this peacefully. The cost of violence would be too high for Shelter to survive,” Tannin replied. “We need every man and woman alive.”

Several villagers tried to talk him out of it, but they were unsuccessful. Blacknail scowled, as Tannin ordered the gates opened a crack and stepped out to talk to Orvit again. Geralhd also volunteered to go with him and represent the former bandits.

“You need someone who can actually fight,” Blacknail remarked as he stepped out after them. He wanted to be close in case he had to intervene or steer the conversation.

Orvit and two of his lieutenants met them halfway. They were about fifty feet from both the gate and the rest of the scavengers. They were on a path of hardened dirt and sparse grass that ran through the village’s fields.

“Have you decided to stop holding out on me?” Orvit asked them.

“I wasn’t holding out on you. No one in my village knows anything about any gold,” Tannin tried to explain calmly.

“That’s not what I heard,” Orvit replied as he reached into a pouch and pulled out a small golden nugget.  “My source says that the village chief knows about the mine, and he’s been right about everything else so far.”

Blacknail smiled to himself. He remembered telling Elyias to say that. It had been a smart idea, not that he had any other kind.

“Attacking us won’t gain you anything,” Tannin told Orvit.

“Maybe I don’t need to attack your precious village,” Orvit replied as he suddenly drew his blade. “You’re the one who supposedly has the answers I need. Why don’t I just get them out of you?”

Geralhd and Tannin were both caught by surprise. They flinched back away from the naked blade. However, Blacknail responded differently. The moment Orvit had touched his weapon Blacknail had started drawing his own, and he was faster. There was a faint whistling sound as the blade sliced through the air.

“Try anything stupid and I’ll cut you deep,” Blacknail hissed as he pressed the tip of his sword into Orvit’s exposed side. Orvit’s two guards cursed but couldn’t do anything. Blacknail had reacted too quickly for them.

“Blacknail, we need…” Geralhd began to say.

“No, enough talk. We’re leaving. Run back to the gate, now,” the hobgoblin told him.

As Orvit stared at them malevolently, Tannin and Geralhd turned to flee back to the village. Blacknail didn’t immediately join them.

“I have a question for you, thief,” he told Orvit as he poked him in the side.

“Agh, what is it, you creepy fiend?” the man replied as he glared hatefully at Blacknail. He had his sword out but there was no way he could use it before Blacknail could disembowel him, and he knew it.

“Do you work for Werrick?”

“I do. You’re more informed than an ignorant hick would be, not to mention surprisingly fast with that blade. That means you should know what happens to people who cross the Wolf. Let me go now and maybe I’ll show you mercy.”

Blacknail didn’t bother replying. He just smiled and kicked Orvit so that the man smashed into one of his guard’s and they both fell. Then Blacknail immediately dashed away. The remaining guard took a step after him but the hobgoblin was already halfway back to gate. He was a very fast runner.

“I’ll get my hands on that gold! Those shoddy walls of your won’t stop me,” Orvit yelled as Blacknail pushed Tannin and Geralhd through the gate and then followed them.

The gate thudded to a close behind them, and there was an uproar as all the villagers tried to talk at the same time. They sounded distressed and excited. Half of them seemed to want to run away or hide in their homes and the other half wanted to charge Orvit’s band. They were all stupid.

“I haven’t run like that in years,” Tannin remarked in between deep breaths. He was red in the face and looked exhausted.  “Thanks for having my back, Blacknail.”

“No problem. I couldn’t let you die,” the hobgoblin replied. It was a simple statement of fact.

“What do we do now?” one of the village militia leaders asked Tannin. He sounded more than a little fearful.

“Whatever we do, I don’t think we can reason with this Orvit fellow, so let’s keep these gates closed,” Geralhd said. There was more yelling from all the humans, until Tannin silenced them all.

“Quiet down, all of you. This is important. What are the scavengers doing now?” he asked the sentries atop the wall.”

“They aren’t advancing. Their leader rejoined the rest of his men and they seem to be organizing something,” the lookout answered him.

“Damnation, I almost wish they were attacking. We could get this over with,” Tannin cursed.

“What do we do now?” a villager asked.

“I don’t know,” Geralhd commented.

“There has to be some way to prevent Shelter from being destroyed,” Tannin exclaimed angrily. “We’ve spent too many years struggling to keep this place alive, through plague and famine. I’m not going to let some asshole who can’t accept the fact that we have no hidden caches of gold destroy it.”

“You’re the village elder, just tell us what you need,” a member of the militia replied.

“The militia needs to stay on guard in case of an attack,” Tannin told him. “We can probably repel a frontal assault with ease, but the wall around this village wasn’t meant to keep a determined human enemy out. Come nightfall, they will try to slip through it. I wish I had an answer for that, but I don’t. I’d do anything for a solution.”

Blacknail was really liking the aura of desperation most the humans had. It was so strong he could smell it. Yes, this would work wonderfully. Now was the time for him to propose his solution and take control of the situation. The hobgoblin coughed loudly enough to get everyone attention.

“Would you really do anything for a solution?” he asked Tannin as everyone turned to look his way.

“Yes…” the village elder replied hesitantly as he met Blacknail’s gaze. He seemed to have detected something off about the question because he looked slightly suspicious.

“Good, because I could kill Orvit and his men for you.”

“You could? There are a lot of them and only one of you,” Tannin replied as he tried to see past the hobgoblin’s disguise.

“I’m quite sneaky and I have some… minions I could ask for help. Don’t worry about that.”

“Blacknail, we really should discuss this…” Geralhd interjected nervously before Blacknail quieted him with a glare. He stuttered for a second and then shut up.

“If you pay my price I will save your people. Would you really do anything?” Blacknail asked as he turned back to Tannin.

“I would, but I still don’t see how you could possibly do what you say you can.”

“I can do it because of what I am,” the hobgoblin replied as he pulled his hood down and removed his scarf so that his face was visible.












OOD 4
















The brown cloth of Blacknail’s hood fell down to his shoulders. He then pulled off the scarf covering the front of his face. This meant the hobgoblin’s green visage was plain for everyone to see. His long pointy ears and nose were clearly inhuman, and there were two short horns rising from his bald head. He sure was handsome.

There were gasps of surprise and horror from some of the nearby residents of Shelter. The closest villagers stepped back and some of the militia raised their weapons defensively. Blacknail gave them his best friendly smile, but made an effort not to show his teeth. Some humans found them intimidating.

“What in the deepest of hells is this?” Tannin cursed. He looked shocked and more than a little angry.

“It’s my face,” Blacknail replied matter-of-factly.

“Why are you green?” one of the villagers asked. He sounded shocked.

“Ugh, Really? Stupid ignorant hicks,” one of the bandits with Geralhd mumbled.

“I’m a hobgoblin,” Blackanil explained for the people that didn’t get it. Humans sometimes needed a few moments for their brains to start working.

There were more murmurs now, and they sounded angrier. A lot of the villagers were glaring at him with hate in their eyes. That wasn’t good, but things were going the way Blacknail had expected them to. The sudden appearance of a hobgoblin in their midst had shocked and scared the villagers. They were reacting defensively and working themselves up into a state of uncontrolled anger and fear, not that there was much difference for humans. Luckily, Blacknail had a plan in action to counter this. Magic.

Before coming here, Blacknail had met with Imp and asked about making Elixir. The fight with the alpha had used up his supply. Imp couldn’t do it, however it turned out that the hobgoblin mage did have a vial of Blacknail’s Elixir on hand. He had taken it from Mahedium’s lair after Werrick’s attack. Blacknail had ingested a quarter of the vial on the spot. Thus, the hobgoblin squinted and focused his attention on Tannin and the villagers. He tried to recreate the feeling from his fight with the wolves. It was sort of a weird floaty feeling, like he was thinking about loosening some string, except mint flavored.

Since the arrival of the scavengers, Blacknail had been using his new found Vessel ability to tweak the emotions of the people around him. He could only affect their fear but that was still very useful. Fear seemed to affect everything humans did. When the raiders had arrived, Blacknail had played up the peoples’ fears to make them more desperate and open to suggestion. Now he was doing the opposite, stifling their fears so they would be more accepting. The slight headache meant it was working, that or he wasn’t getting enough air. Maybe he should focus more on breathing. 

“Did you know about this?” Tannin asked Geralhd in a sharp accusatory tone. “I can’t see how you couldn’t have.”

“I knew about it. Blacknail is my friend,” Khita interjected. The redhead had been standing behind Geralhd but now she stepped up beside Blacknail and put a hand on his shoulder. The hobgoblin had to suppress the urge to bite her fingers. Now was not the time for that, so instead he just kept smiling.

“Yes, we all knew,” Geralhd replied reluctantly. Meanwhile, Beardy took a step away from him and tried to look innocent and unrelated. He didn’t really blend in with the villagers, though.

“How can this be possible? Why would you travel with a hobgoblin?” Tannin asked. He was clearly upset.

Blacknail tried to focus his magic on the village elder’s mind for a moment. He wasn’t sure if it was working. He was very new at this and it was very weird. He couldn’t really sense peoples' thought or anything, but if he really concentrated, it felt he could feel their minds, or something. They were like piles of squirming worms. What Blacknail had to do was use his power to sort of calm the worms down or make them more agitated. It was actually much easier just to flare the Elixir and send out a wave of fear that hit everyone, like he had with the wolf. All this thinking about worms and brains was making him hungry.

“Umm, that’s a rather complicated tale,” Geralhd explained to Tannin. “When he was just a little goblin he was picked up and raised by one of our companions, Saeter. Since then he has never really done anything wrong and he has been rather helpful actually. We grew used to having him around.”

“See, I’m helpful and I’ve never done anything wrong. Nothing, ever,” Blacknail crowed proudly.

“Ya!” Khita agreed. “Just like me.” Everyone ignored her.

“Well, he has always obeyed orders, anyway,” Beardy clarified.

“They would have died so many times without my help, just like you right now,” Blacknail pointed out.

“You shouldn’t have let this creature inside our village without permission! He could have hurt someone,” Tannin yelled at Geralhd.

“They needed me to get home and I was their companion. They knew they could trust me, but they knew nothing about you,” Blacknail countered.

“Um, that’s actually a good point. You’re rather smart aren’t you?” Tannin admitted as he studied Blacknail again. He seemed to be rethinking some things and getting his thoughts in order now. The worms that made up his brain were flopping around less.

“We’ve talked over a dozen times. You know how smart I am,” Blacknail pointed out. He was the smartest person here, or maybe anywhere. He was also magic.

“Right… that’s also a good point,” Tannin replied before falling silent. He seemed momentarily at a loss for words.

“This is why I hid my face. I get asked so many dumb questions by angry people who know nothing,” Blacknail hissed. There were also a lot of other reasons. It certainly made sneaking up on people easier.

“Why are you talking to the beast? We need to drive it out of town now!” a member of the militia suddenly yelled. He was a pudgy man with a balding head.

“Shut your pie hole, Aster,” Tannin told the speaker as he spun to face him. “We can’t afford to lose our heads now.”

“Yes, if you try and chase me away then I won’t be able to help you,” Blacknail told them as he tried to magic their brains.

“You expect us to accept help from the likes of you? You’re a monster! Why would we ever do that?” the man yelled in defiance of Tannin. His brain worms were practically dancing about.

“Because you need me,” Blacknail replied in as soothing a voice as he could muster. It wasn’t very soothing. “I have never done anything but help you, and without my aid you and all your families will die, all of them. These invaders will slit their throats and burn you from your homes. I alone can save everything you hold dear.”

There was silence from all the nearby villagers now. They seemed unsure.

“Just what sort of price are you demanding?” Tannin asked. He sounded apprehensive, like he wasn’t sure he wanted to learn the answer.

Several nearby villagers began whispering among themselves and guessing. Blacknail heard people mention babies, human blood, and women. The hobgoblin had no idea what he’d do with two of those three, and eating the other would get him in trouble.

“I just want a few simple things. Nothing bad!” Blacknail said.

“Like what?” Tannin asked.

“First, I want to be your friend, to come and go from the village, as before. I want to trade with you so I can get supplies. This would help us both.”

“That sounds… fine,” Tannin answered reluctantly.  This led to angry muttering from some of the villagers so he added, “We can keep an eye on you easily enough.”

“Second, I want the stuff in your heads, your secret knowledge.”

“Our secret knowledge?”

“Yes, the way you make things. I want that. You will teach me the secret of making cheese!”

There was silence of a different kind from the villagers.

“Is that everything?” Tannin asked after moment.

“Yes.”

“Um, alright. You have a deal.”

“Huh,” Blacknail muttered to himself. He was beginning to think he should have asked for more. Well, whatever. He could always trade them some yellow rocks for whatever he wanted later.

“So how do you plan on dealing with our uninvited guests?” Tannin asked.

“I’ll kill them,” Blacknail responded.

“There are a lot of them.”

“I know that. It won’t matter. I have minions and magic. Come morning you will see how helpful I can be!”

“I don’t think we have much of a choice. If you do actually manage to save Shelter from the raiders then on my word as the village Elder we will welcome you back regardless of your um… skin color.”

“…and teeth, those things are horrifying,” one of the militiamen muttered under his breath. He and most the militia were still staring at Blacknail suspiciously but they no longer seemed like they were considering preemptive violence.

“Hey, Blacknail. Step over this way for a moment,” Geralhd quietly asked as he motioned for the hobgoblin to come closer.  Blacknail did as he was asked and walked over to Geralhd’s side. Several of the nearby former bandits leaned in closer as well so they could hear.

“I’m glad that you’ve managed to tell Tannin the truth, but are you sure this is the best idea?” Geralhd asked Blacknail quietly so that the villager’s couldn’t overhear. “The minions you were talking about are Gob and the goblins, right? I don’t think any of the old band are going to want to do anything too dangerous right now.”

“That’s alright. As your leader, I want you all right here where you can help protect the village, in case the raiders attack before night. I have enough hobgoblin minions for the rest,” Blacknail replied.

“Wait, you have more hobgoblins now? How? And how many are we talking about?” Beardy asked in shock.

“Pff, too many. It’s annoying. I don’t know what I’m going to do with them all. There are more every day,” Blacknail told him.

“That’s certainly an interesting bit of information,” Geralhd remarked.

“Red Dog was right about everything,” Beardy cursed. “We’ve doomed ourselves.”

“Stop being such a cry baby,” Khita told him. “How can a grown man be so pathetic? Are you going to go cry alone in a corner somewhere now? The new hobgoblins aren’t so bad. Scamp and Imp are two of them.”

“Of course, you must have known about this all along. You’ve been spending half your time out in the forest with Blacknail. Seriously, what is wrong with your mind? Did you get dropped on your head as a child? Why did you keep this from us?” Beardy shot back.

“You never asked. Goblins turn into hobgoblins, that’s what they do,” Khita replied with an indifferent shrug of her shoulders.  This remark made Beardy’s eyes bug out and his face grow red. He raised a clenched fist and started to open his mouth, but Blacknail smiled and placed a hand on his shoulder.

“We should all just get along. Getting mad can be very bad for a human’s health. I’ve seen it many times,” Blacknail told Beardy helpfully. Most the humans Blacknail had seen die had been rather upset before the end.

Beardy didn’t seem to know how to respond to this. He looked flustered and grunted sourly before shaking his head.

“See? That’s better!” Blacknail told him cheerfully.

There was wasn’t much more to say, so after answering a few more questions, Blacknail began his preparations to leave. A pair of militia men escorted the hobgoblin to the far side of the village, where Blacknail found a gap in the wall he could squeeze through. Khita had wanted to come too but Blacknail had quickly ditched her. Once outside, he made a dash for the forest. It didn’t seem likely that the scavengers had set up a ring of sentries yet, but it was better safe than sorry.

No enemies appeared at the edge of the forest to stop him, so Blacknail slipped into the trees without a problem. He immediately headed for the goblin settlement at a quick run. If he wanted to be ready before it got dark he needed to get things organized fast, and the upcoming fight was making him more than a little excited. This would be a hunt unlike any other.

He was out of breath by the time the walls of the goblin camp came into sight through the thick greenery of the forest, but he had made very good time. Blacknail slowed down to a walk as he stepped through the gate. He needed to recover so that he could do some screaming. That was the best way to get attention.

“To me! Gob, hobgoblins, your chief is calling you,” Blacknail yelled at the top of his lungs as he stomped into the camp. Goblins scattered before him and fled from the sound, in case he was angry or looking to assign them work.

Almost immediately, Gob came running. The senior hobgoblin ran out from behind a hill and practically fell at Blacknail’s feet as he kneeled submissively. Blacknail had to jerk back to prevent himself from tripping over the other hobgoblin. Gob could move surprisingly fast at the weirdest times.

“Great master of the tribe, I am yours to command,” Gob exclaimed proudly as he thumped his chest with a closed fist. “What is it you desire, warrior king?”

“Stand, war master. Our tribe is going to war!” Blacknail told him. The title had slipped off his tongue. Something about Gob's use of them was contagious.

“Who dares threaten our territory and challenge Blacknail the Undefeated?” Gob hissed furiously.

By this time, a few more hobgoblins had appeared. They were standing back a bit and watching with great interest. At the mention of war they grew visibly more excited. Their eyes began to shine with bloodlust and a few of them licked their lips. Blacknail saw Twig, Bones, and Herah among them.

“A tribe of humans from afar has come to claim our land. They want the shiny stones that lay beneath the ground here,” Blacknail shouted loudly enough for everyone to hear. “But they shall not have them. We shall rend the flesh from their bones and tear them limb from limb instead!”

“Yes, I will kill at your command with great joy,” Gob hissed as the other hobgoblins made excited noises.

“They won’t take our shinnies!” Bones yelled.

Blacknail cleared his throat and then raised his voice to an even higher volume. It was time to set the mood. “These humans are many but they are still prey. We shall hunt them through the dark and descend upon them unaware. We will slit their throats as they sleep and pull the ground out from beneath their feet. I will lead us to victory! There will be loot for us all, too much shiny human things for us to carry!”

The hobgoblins roared their approval and pumped their fists up into the air excitedly. There were around two dozen of them now, but Blacknail still saw some faces missing. The talk of loot had really got them going, which was good. Blacknail needed his minions to be brave, and that wasn’t what hobgoblins and goblins were known for. However, it didn’t seem like he would have to influence them using magic, yet.

“Now go my minions. Gather up your weapons, return here to obey War Master Gob, and then together we shall hunt!” Blacknail yelled. The cheering hobgoblins immediately roared their approval again and then dispersed to prepare.

As the hobgoblins ran off, Blacknail turned back to Gob and began filling him in. There were a lot of tasks that needed to be completed quickly. When the other hobgoblin knew what to do, Blacknail hurried off to find Imp. The hobgoblin shaman had been missing from the gathering and Blacknail needed to speak to him. It was time to find out exactly what the mage was capable of.

Predictably, Imp was in his hut. He was working away at some sort of project, and completely focused on a small glass beaker full of cloudy grey liquid. Blacknail noticed a few other oddities lying around that drew his interest as well.

“Imp, stop what you are doing. The tribe is going to war! I need you to prepare your magics for battle,” Blacknail told him.

The hobgoblin shaman looked up and blinked a few times in confusion before managing to focus on Blacknail. “This is very important. Maybe I should stay here?”

“What is it?” Blacknail asked. He normally didn’t appreciate disrespect or disobedience but he didn’t want to mess around with magic either.

“I don’t know, but it occasionally bubbles,” Imp replied as he turned back to stare at the beaker.

“You’re coming with us,” Blacknail ordered him coldly. What was it with some hobgoblins and weird obsessions?

“What do you expect me to do in a fight?” Imp asked.

“Magic. Make things explode, like boom and kablam!”

“I can do that. It’s the stopping the boom that is hard.”

“Great!” Blacknail replied as he grinned and rubbed his hands together gleefully. It had been too long since he had seen anything explode. Pottery and furnaces didn’t count.

“Also, one more thing. Why do you have two goblins in cages?” Blacknail asked as he turned to look at the wooden cages in question. They were made of lashed together branches that had been hardened in fire, and inside of them sat two small goblins who were watching the hobgoblins’ conversation with great interest.

“So I can use their blood. They have the magic in their blood. I cut them and extract it for my potions,” Imp explained.

“Can’t they get out of them?” Blacknail asked curiously. A goblin could easily escape from a wooden cage given time.

“Of course, but why would they want to?” Imp responded as he blinked in surprise.

“Nevermind,” Blacknail told him. He was too busy to think about this right now. He had a battle to win. Hopefully one where lots of things exploded.










OOD 5













The branches overhead creaked and swayed back and forth as the wind blew. The leaves rustled restlessly alongside them. It was a cool afternoon and the sun was just beginning to disappear behind the horizon. However, the shadowy canopy overhead blocked sight of the dusk sky and stifled the light it cast. There was an expectant feeling to the earthy smelling air, and for good reason. Dozens of silent hobgoblins waited in the shadows around Blacknail. Soon the hunt would commence.

There was a faint rustling noise as Scamp stepped out of the bushes and approached Blacknail. He stalked forward and gave the other hobgoblin a bow, which earned him a nod in return.

“I circled the human camp, boss. They have no watchers in the trees, and only a few men watching the fields around their tents,” Scamp quietly informed his chieftain.

“Then we move now. Follow me. I will lead the way,” Blacknail replied as he grinned in anticipation.

Blacknail shivered in delight. It had been too long since he had hunted his favorite prey, humans. Nothing else made him feel quite so fulfilled as taking down a thinking enemy that he had outplayed. The fact that these men worked for Werrick also added to his delight. When this hunt was done he would be one step closer to his vengeance.

With a wave of his hand, Blacknail signaled his minions and began creeping forward. Silently, the other hobgoblins followed after him. They barely made a sound as they slipped through the gloomy trees and bushes. Every hobgoblin was completely focused on the task ahead.

It didn’t take them long to reach the edge of the forest. Like Scamp had said, they encountered no scouts or any human at all until they reached the border. Blacknail crouched behind a bush and peered out into the fields. There were campfires burning there and they cast long shadows as men moved around them. The raider’s camp was made up of several clusters of tents, with a ring of watch fires set up around it to provide the sentries with light and ward off beasts from the forest.

The camp was situated between the forest and Shelter, and since it had been set up out of bow range from the village, that meant it was only about a hundred feet from Blacknail’s current position. After a few moments counting the shadows and studying the layout of the encampment, Blacknail turned back to minions and began issuing orders. He knew how to infiltrate this group of humans.

“Split into three groups. Gob, Scamp, and I will lead them. We will each aim for one of the closest fires and take out the scouts there. You will then leave behind imposters to replace the scouts and cover our exit, as the others move in deeper. Remember to withdraw when you hear the signal,” he told them.

There were murmurs and nods of acceptance from the listening hobgoblins. A few of them even bowed, including Gob. Blacknail had no idea where they had learned to do that, but he kind of liked it.

The hobgoblins then quickly organized themselves and began creeping out into the fields. The three groups of ten separated and headed for different targets. Each hobgoblin crept across the ground on all fours and kept their head down. It was slow going but they were patient. When the shadows shifted and light from the fires shone out in their direction, the nearby hobgoblins froze and waited until it passed.

When each group was in position they signaled their readiness with a birdcall. At the sound of the third call, they made their move. Hobgoblins with bows sighted their targets as others with drawn blades rose up and dashed closer. Blacknail led the way. He drew two long daggers and lunged out of the darkness. In a blur of motion, he hit the exposed back of one of the sentries. The man was looking in the wrong direction, and before he could even turn around, Blacknail had cut his throat. That done, Blacknail spun around to face the next target, but there was no need for him to do anything. Another hobgoblin had already stabbed the man, and his sword was sunk deep into victim’s chest. In fact, there were no sentries left standing. The last one coughed quietly and collapsed onto the ground with an arrow in side. All three of the sentries had been taken out before they could raise the alarm.

Blacknail quickly looked towards the other two campfires he’d ordered attacked. He saw some quick flashes of movement as the hobgoblin there finished up, but he didn’t hear any loud noises that would alert the enemy. Most of Blacknail’s minions had received only the most basic of training, but they had succeeded in their task. Blacknail had been more than little worried. So many things could have gone wrong. He had never tried to lead so many hobgoblins in such a complicated manner before. It was a good thing that hunting such as this came naturally to hobgoblins. They knew what to do. They just obeyed their instincts.

Smiling to himself, Blacknail picked out three hobgoblins and ordered them to replace the sentries around the fire. They quickly looted some human clothes and complied. If anyone looked they would be indistinguishable from humans at a distance. Blacknail then joined in the looting of the bodies and pocketed a dagger and some coins. There was no way the other hobgoblins weren’t doing it, so he might as well join in.

“Enough, we need to move,” Blacknail hissed after he’d finished searching the body of the man he had killed. His minions reluctantly did as they were told. Unlike Blacknail, they had never seen such riches before.

The sounds of human activity from deeper within the encampment were much clearer now. Among the tents, people were walking around and talking amongst themselves. Black listened for a moment before motioning for his minions to follow him deeper in. Going in further was risky because it became much harder to keep an eye on all his minions, but it was still too early to head back.

The hobgoblins hanging back away from campfires slipped into the dark space between the lights and joined their companions in a dash towards the enemy camp. A few humans looked in their direction but they were taken down by archers before they could figure out what was happening. Then the hobgoblins hit the tents. The savage killers dispersed to wreak as much chaos as they could.

As the firelight flickered behind him, Blacknail charged ahead. He crouched low as he ran past a pair of empty tents. There were two raiders walking together off to his right. One of them had a hand raised and was pointing in the general direction of some of Blacknail’s minions. They had noticed movement in the darkness but they had no idea what it was yet. Blacknail decided to make sure they didn’t ever find out. He circled around another tent and then dashed out behind them. With his sword raised high, Blacknail lunged forward and attacked. Elixir burned through his blood as his first slash whipped through the air and tore into the neck of his target. The man never even saw the blade coming. As the body crumpled, the second man flinched and turned around. Blacknail didn’t waste a second. He shifted his body weight, stepped forward, and stabbed his second target right through the stomach. The man gasped and coughed. Flecks of bloody spittle flew out of his mouth, and then Blacknail withdrew his blade. The raider collapsed onto the ground and went still, but Blacknail was already running off to find a new target.

For a while, there was only an occasional scuffle or surprised gasp as hobgoblins jumped on unsuspecting raiders or slipped into tents to kill their sleeping occupants, but then a ear shattering scream of pain rent the air and everything changed. Blacknail froze as he was about to cut open a tent that looked occupied. Around him, raiders began yelling and drawing weapons. The attackers had been discovered. Blacknail grunted sourly and stepped back. He hesitated a moment about whether to call the retreat, but then a blinding white light appeared in the center of the camp. He squinted and turned away, as the light illuminated all the tents and cast away the darkness. It revealed the shadowy figures of the raiders and the hobgoblins, and Blacknail knew it was time to go. That was mage light. If he ever figured out which hobgoblin had messed up he was going to get such a kicking.

It was somewhat unnecessary at this point, but Blacknail took a moment to scream the retreat signal. The harsh wordless yell echoed over the raiders' camp and then was repeated by other hobgoblins that heard it. The violent screams sounded more like the bloodthirsty call of a beast than a signal to retreat, but that was sort of the point. Now that the hobgoblins had been discovered it was time to spread fear and confusion.

Partially revealed by the mage light, shadowy hobgoblins began pulling back away from the tents. They headed towards the periphery campfires they had seized on their way in, but it was not an orderly retreat. Many hobgoblins were still looting or had been engaged in combat. Blacknail quickly dashed towards the closest fight. He needed to buy his minions some time.

In front of him, two hobgoblins were struggling to fight off two raiders. Without the advantage of surprise they were having a hard time just defending themselves. Humans were larger and stronger than hobgoblins and they were almost always better trained. The blades of the raiders were hammering down against the hobgoblin’s weapons and pushing them back. Then one of hobgoblins was knocked backwards after an awkward block. The raider facing him stepped forward to finish him off, but Blacknail intervened. He charged in and parried the man’s downwards swing. There was a metallic clang as the blades met, and then Blacknail twisted around and launched an attack of his own that forced the man back.

“Retreat. I got this,” Blacknail hissed at his minions as he took a swipe at the second man. Both hobgoblins immediately jumped back and ran away, which annoyed Blacknail a little. They could have at least thanked him.

Blacknail’s sour thoughts were interrupted when his opponents attacked again. He parried one slash and sidestepped the other. There were more and more raiders appearing, so Blacknail knew he had to hurry. He would soon be swamped by angry humans.

Thus, Blacknail readied himself. The raider to his left slashed at his head while the other waited for an opening. Just as he blocked the blow, Blacknail met both the raider’s gazes and then blasted them with fear. He reached down into himself and pushed the burning power of Elixir out at them. Instantly, the raider’s minds trembled and they flinched. Fear was plain on their faces as they went stiff. That was all the opening Blacknail needed. He knocked away the blade of the man who had just attacked him and twisted his own sword around into a slash at the other raider. Caught off guard, the raider couldn’t stop the blade from slicing deep into his shoulder.

“Demon piss,” the man swore as he stumbled back and dropped his weapon.

The remaining raider raised his blade defensively to block a new attack by Blacknail. It was a clumsy maneuver. He still hadn’t recovered from the terror attack, so Blacknail had no problem using leverage to force the blade aside and stab the man in the chest. Blacknail then tugged his weapon loose and jumped on the fallen raider. A few savage chops later he was dead as well.

“There’s one of the intruders!” a deep voice yelled. Blacknail looked up to see a squad of heavily armed raiders bearing down on him. He quickly sheathed his sword and ran away. As the leader he was too important to risk, unless the situation seemed like fun.

Off to one side, a hobgoblin was dodging the wild sword slashes of a raider. It looked like the hobgoblin had a wound on his leg so he couldn’t run away. Blacknail took a brief moment to veer over and help. The raider saw him coming and slashed at him, but he dodged under the blow and kicked the man aside.

“Go,” he told the hobgoblin.

As the wounded hobgoblin obeyed, Blacknail looked around. It seemed like there weren’t any more of his minions in trouble. All of them were withdrawing towards the forest. However there were a few laggards. One unconscious hobgoblin was being carried by another and a few others were also moving slowly, either because of injuries or because they were loaded down by loot. Rolly was carrying an entire pile of pots, and was even wearing one on his head. Blacknail had no idea why.

To make sure his minions escaped, Blacknail ran over to guard their backs. There were dozens of armed raiders chasing them, and they were only about two dozen feet away.

“Don’t let the bloody fiends escape!” a taller man roared as he brandished a sword above his head and led the charge after the fleeing hobgoblins.

Sensing that he needed to do something, Blacknail turned and took a deep breath. His cloak whipped behind him as he faced the raiders that were trying to run him down, and then he screamed as loudly as he could. Hatred and hunger poured out from him.

“Humans, I am your death! I am Blacknail, the hunter of men. You serve the Wolf, but he cannot protect you from me. None of you will ever escape the Green. You have gone too deep, and now you are mine,” Blacknail yelled. He then let out a deep echoing laugh that was filled to the brim with bloodlust and malevolence, and flared Elixir. As the power rolled through him, he boiled it and blasted it outwards so that it slammed into the raiders.

The power hit them like a physical wave. Most the raiders slowed and visibly flinched away from Blacknail. A dozen or so jumped back and came to a complete stop, while several even tripped and fell. The entire group of charging raiders fell into chaos as they hit each other and stumbled, and that was when the arrows hit them. The retreating hobgoblins had reached the campfires, and the hobgoblins stationed there were taking the opportunity to cover their companions. Arrows whirred through the air and slammed into the raiders. There were shrieks of pain and half a dozen more of them fell.

“Gods damn it all. Keep moving!” the enemy leader roared. His words didn’t accomplish much. His subordinates had come to complete stop.

“You cowardly bitches! Come back here and fight like men,” the enraged raider then yelled at Blacknail.

“I am no man,” Blacknail laughed as he spun around and ran past the campfires. The darkness there engulfed him and he disappeared from sight.

The retreating hobgoblin chieftain soon caught up with his minions. They were waiting for him at the edge of the forest. Their slanted pupils shone as they reflected the distant firelight, and most of them had satisfied smiles on their faces. There was no sign of pursuit, although cursing and screams could still be heard from the raiders’ camp.

“It is done, great leader. We are victorious! All praise to you,” Gob said as he stepped out from behind a tree. He didn’t look any worse for wear, which was good. Gob was the one hobgoblin that Blacknail couldn’t easily replace.

“What he said, boss,” Scamp added with smile. He had a swollen eye that looked like it had been punched, but he was carrying a new sword and there was a sack slung over his shoulder.

All the familiar faces Blacknail remembered seemed to be there. Bones seemed to be unconscious but Twig was supporting him and he was still breathing. It seemed weird to Blacknail that Twig would go out of his way to help his rival, but whatever. Herah and Rolly were present, and both of them had grabbed quite a bit of loot. It didn’t seem like they had lost anyone. How many hobgoblins had they started with? That would have probably been a good thing to have learned beforehand.

“Did we lose anyone?” he asked his assembled minions.

“Maybe?” Scamp replied. He sounded uncertain.

“Maybe?” Blacknail enquired impatiently.

“One of ours died, but we grabbed his corpse, so he’s not really lost,” Scamp replied as he pointed to a body slumped up against a tree.

“Ah, good,” Blacknail exclaimed as he nodded in satisfaction. He had ordered them to retrieve any bodies.

Humans feared things they didn’t understand. If they had a corpse to examine, gloat over, or make into a trophy their fear would have diminished. Blacknail wanted these servants of Werrick’s stewing in their own terror as the darkness pressed in around them all night. He wanted to smell their fear on the wind. He wanted them to jump out of their skin every time they heard a twig crack and see hobgoblins in every shadow. Blacknail knew humans and he knew fear. Their terror would sap them of their strength and leave them ripe for plucking.

Since all the other stuff was out of the way, Blacknail asked the most important question next. “Now, did any of you find any cheese?”











OOD 6















The dusk raid on the raiders’ camp had only yielded one small piece of cheese. It hadn’t even tasted all that good, too plain. What was the point of cheese too weak to water your eyes or burn your nose? That seemed like a waste to Blacknail. All in all, the raid had been somewhat of a disappointment. That was more because of other factors, but the cheese thing was still disappointing.

It seemed like that after killing the sentries most the hobgoblins had avoided combat and focused on stealing everything that wasn’t nailed down, which had been everything but the tents, and even then an enterprising hobgoblin had found a way to grab one. That meant the raid had only resulted in the deaths of less than two dozen humans. They did however gain a whole bunch more weapons, a pile of pots, several sacks of food, and a lot of other random knickknacks.

“I found some new knives! I can’t wait to show Khita,” Herah exclaimed happily as she followed after Blacknail.

“Do you want one, boss?” she asked him. “I’ll give you one for a favor!”

“No, thanks,” Blacknail replied as he kept on walking. He was lost in thought.

“Are you sure? You might like it!”

Instead of replying, Blacknail picked up the pace a little. Being dragged into this conversation seemed like a bad idea.

The hobgoblins were headed back to the forward base they had set up. The main goblin encampment was too far away. Blacknail wanted to keep close to Shelter so he could keep an eye on things. The new camp was only about two minutes away from Shelter, but Blacknail was willing to bet the raiders wouldn’t be doing too much exploring now. The Green could be a terrifying and dangerous place even under normal circumstances.

“I got a whole bunch of human hair! It’s all mine now,” a bald hobgoblin announced as he proudly showed off the tufts of various colors that were in his hands.

“Why did you waste your time on hair? That’s useless. I got pants!” another hobgoblin responded as he held up his loot. He was currently wearing just a loincloth so Blacknail didn’t blame him for being so excited. 

As the group of hobgoblins walked through some bushes, their temporary camp came into sight. Some time ago, a huge tree had fallen over and slammed into another giant. This had resulted in a small clearing where there was no canopy overhead. The massive tree trunk’s fall had been broken by the other tree so now the entire thing lay on an angle. Near the base, there was enough room under it for hobgoblins to stand, and they had covered the open sides with long branches and green bushels of leaves to make walls.

After all the hobgoblins had taken a moment to pile their ill-gotten gains somewhere, Blacknail called them over for a meeting.

“You were all terrible. I did all the hard work,” Blacknail told his minions. “You didn’t kill enough people. That was the entire point of this attack!”

There was some assorted muttering from the assembled hobgoblins and they looked away from their chief, usually toward their loot. However, they didn’t seem all that remorseful.

“Scamp, take two other hobs and watch the enemy. Send me someone if they do anything,” Blacknail ordered his subordinate.

“I want to rest! I just finished fighting,” Scamp protested. “Send someone else less deserving!”

“There is no one else less deserving, anywhere,” Blacknail countered. “I’ll be sending replacements to find you after a while, and if you’re napping they will have orders to beat you silly.”

Since there was no way he could argue with Blacknail, Scamp picked out two other hobgoblins and headed back to watch the fields. Imp was standing off to one side of the main group of hobgoblins so Blacknail turned to face him.

“I didn’t see you doing anything. Why were there no big booms?” Blacknail asked him crossly. He had wanted some big booms.

“I saw no good targets. It’s hard to use magic stones,” Imp replied with a shrug. He had been one of the hobgoblins assigned to guard the campfires.

Blacknail sighed. He should have probably asked about this before. Why were all his minions such terrible subordinates? They needed to do better.

“What do your magics do, exactly?” he enquired of the mage. “Mahedium had staffs that shot fire and necklaces that sucked things up.”

Imp took a second to process the question. He titled his head to the side and licked his lips.

“I have rocks that give off glow and others that burn a lot,” he responded slowly as if unsure of himself.

“You can’t shoot fire or anything?”

“No, I have the magic fire but I don’t have a staff to push the flames away. After I set the crystal alight they explode after a few seconds,” Imp explained. Blacknail found these magics to be less than impressive.

“So how do you use them to fight?”

“I throw them.”

Blacknail sighed. “You don’t have anything else?”

“I do have some other stones that explode in other interesting ways. Some of them are green or make whistling noises! The problem is that they sometimes go boom in your hand, which is bad.”

“That is a problem,” Blacknail admitted. One hobgoblin mage throwing mana crystals that exploded into flame wasn’t going to be all that useful. He would have to think about this. He wanted magic, and if anyone could come up with a solution it would be him, the greatest hobgoblin genius ever.

After a little more conversation, the hobgoblin warband settled down and prepared to wait out the night. Hobgoblins had great low light vision, but even they couldn’t see through the black of night. They set up cots in the crude structure they had built under the fallen tree, and they even built a small fire off to one side where it was shielded from view. When he wasn’t dealing with complaints about who deserved what loot, Blacknail caught some sleep.

When morning was just beginning to spring to life, Blacknail was up and waiting for it. In the dark of early dawn, he led his warband back to Shelter. From atop a tall tree at the edge of the fields he surveyed the raiders’ camp. The leafy branch he was perched on swayed ever so slightly beneath him as he counted the tents and men. Blacknail wasn’t great at counting but he believed there were still around a hundred raiders left.

“That’s too many smelly humans,” Blacknail muttered to himself. He would have to work on cutting them down more.

The tree trembled a bit more as Blacknail climbed down and rejoined his minions. It was still dark out enough that hobgoblins would have the advantage. The sun hadn’t quite appeared on the horizon.

“It’s time to hunt again!” he excitedly informed his minions.

Another raid like their last would go a long way towards breaking their opponents, especially if the hobgoblins actually kept on task this time. Once the raiders realized that the hobgoblins could attack with impunity at any time they would be consumed by their terror and become easy prey.

At his command, Blacknail’s minions split into three groups and slipped out of the forest to launch a new attack.  Their targets were the groups of sentries that Blacknail had picked out from up above in the tree.  Carefully, the hobgoblins crept across the gloomy fields towards their prey.

This time however, things didn’t go to plan. Before any of the hobgoblins had reached the sentries, a cry of warning reverberated through the air. Blacknail froze where he was crouched down low against the earth. He looked up to see that the sentries ahead of him were alert and scanning the ground around him. The man beside him had a strung bow in his hands, and there was noise from deeper within the enemy camp.

“Reinforce the perimeter now! Secondary squads move into position,” a sentry yelled.

“Are the attackers human? You know what some of the others were saying,” another raider asked fearfully. The only answer he got was an order from his sergeant to shut up.

“Miserable slimy slugs,” Blacknail cursed. It seemed that the raiders had learned their lesson. They had been caught unaware the first time, but now they were ready for another sneak attack.

Frowning furiously, Blacknail signaled to the hobgoblin next to him. His minion nodded, rose up, nocked an arrow to his bow, and then took a shot at the sentry with the bow. The projectile flew straight and true. It whirred through the air and slammed into the archer’s chest, knocking him over. Blacknail could have totally made that shot if he had wanted to, but he didn’t need to, since he was the leader.

“Retreat!” Blacknail yelled as he rose to his feet. He didn’t need to worry about being shot now that the archer was down.

As more armed humans appeared to reinforce the sentries, Blacknail and his minions ran back to forest. An arrow flew past them and sank into the ground with a twang, but it missed by several feet. When Blacknail reached the trees he turned back to see that this time the enemy was giving chase. Eight armed and armored raiders were chasing him.

“Follow me,” Blacknail hissed at his minions as he picked up the pace and dove deeper into the forest.

The raiders stopped at the edge of the forest and didn’t follow, but Blacknail kept going. The humans soon disappeared from sight, and Blacknail veered off towards the base camp. Once he got there, he began pacing back and forth furiously as he waited for the other squads to return. The other hobgoblins avoided him. This mission had not gone well. After a few minutes had passed, Scamp and Gob finally showed up with their minions in tow. One of them was visibly wounded and bleeding from a gash on his arm.

“What happened?” Blacknail hissed as he stomped over to Scamp’s side. He highly suspected that if anyone had messed up that it would be Scamp.

“They saw Fingers coming and shot him, not my fault,” Scamp replied warily. He wouldn’t meet Blacknail’s eyes.

“And then they shot me,” the wounded hobgoblin added.

“Where is Fingers?” Blacknail asked.

“He dead,” Scamp answered matter-of-factly.

A sigh escaped Blacknail’s lips. Of course he was. The raid had gone even worse than he had thought. They had only killed one human and they lost a hobgoblin. To make matters worse, it was clear that sneak attacks weren’t going to work anymore. Blacknail was going to have to come up with an entirely new plan. He really needed to find a subordinate to do this type of thinking for him. He was the leader, so it was beneath him.

After helping sew the wounded hobgoblin’s cut shut and applying some herbs to prevent infection – that was another thing he needed to find a competent minion to do - Blacknail sent scouts back to watch the enemy camp. He then took a seat up on top of the huge fallen tree they were camping under. Once up there, he brooded and tried to come up with some ideas. He had promised to take care of the raiders, but it was proving harder than he had thought it would be. When you wanted humans alive they got themselves killed doing something stupid, and when you wanted them dead they defended themselves. It was frustrating.

The problem had to be the quality of his minions. The entire point of them was so that Blacknail didn’t have to do everything himself, and yet here he was, basically doing everything himself.

The sky overhead grew brighter quickly as an hour passed, and then the bushes rustled as one of the scouts returned.

“Boss, the enemy tribe is moving!” the hobgoblin scout shouted as he ran to below Blacknail’s perch.

The hobgoblin chieftain immediately dropped down and landed on the ground. He shouted out a quick series of orders, grabbed his weapons, and then dashed back over to the fields around Shelter. His minions followed right behind him.

When he reached the fields he was greeted by the sight of fighting. The enemy had copied Blacknail’s idea. They had split into three and attacked Shelter early in the morning before most people got up. Three different sections of the wall around Shelter were under attack by groups of twenty to thirty heavily armed men. Men with axes were trying to chop their way inside through the wooden palisade while their companions covered them. It looked like they weren’t meeting all that much resistance and would soon get inside.

“Quick, which spot seems weakest?” Blacknail asked Scamp.

“Um, that one?” the other hobgoblin replied uncertainly as he pointed to the closest squad of enemies. Blacknail took moment to study his choice. The men with the axes there had already cut through one post and were in the process of pulling it out of the way so they could climb inside.

“Alright, you better not be wrong,” Blacknail said as he motioned for his minions to form up around him. It was time for Blacknail to save the day, again.

“What is it you wish, wise leader?” Gob asked as he stepped up beside him.

“We’re going to run down those outside humans.”

“But it’s bright out and they will see us coming. You told us not to fight humans unless we could ambush them,” Bones pointed out.

“The rules change! This will be an entirely new type of surprise. They won’t suspect that we will charge right at them,” Blacknail replied

There were murmurs of conversation as the hobgoblins thought this over. They didn’t sound convinced or enthusiastic.

“If you don’t fight them then you will have to fight me,” Blacknail said as he gave his minions a harsh glare. He was the leader; other people’s opinions didn’t matter.

“And me!” Gob added in support.

“Now charge!” Blacknail yelled as he drew his sword and pointed it towards Shelter.

The hobgoblins hesitated for a moment, but then they all broke out into a run. Blacknail waited a second and then followed after them. He wanted to keep an eye on them so he stuck to the back, where he could motivate them to run faster.

The mob of hobgoblins raced across he fields towards the walls of Shelter. Ahead of them, the raiders had hacked their way through the palisade and were starting to climb through. The attackers were slightly outnumbered by the hobgoblins, but Blacknail still didn’t consider that great odds for his side.

The enemy wasn’t looking behind themselves. They were focused on getting inside the wall, so they didn’t see the hobgoblins coming until the last second. One larger man who was waiting his turn happened to look over his shoulder.

“Bloody shits, we’ve got incoming,” he yelled in a panic. His nearby companions turned as well, spotted the hobgoblins, and raised their weapons.

“Demon spawn! They’re real,” another man babbled.

Right before the two groups met, Blacknail sped up and dashed to the front of his minions. With inhuman speed, he lunged at the enemy before they were ready. His sword sliced into a man’s belly as he ducked under a hurried blow. Another man swung at him. Blacknail parried the blow and kicked the man in the knee. There was a crunch as the limb gave out. Still reeling from Blacknail’s assault, the other raiders were unprepared for the wave of hobgoblins behind him, and the hobgoblins knew it. They grinned and growled fiercely as they pounced on the raiders.

“Form up on me!” a bearded man with blonde hair yelled as he swung at a hobgoblin with an axe. In response to his voice, the raiders still facing the wall turned and stepped into position next to their compatriots. Together they formed a tight defensive line and began pushing the hobgoblins back.

A sword sliced through the air next to Blacknail’s head. He twisted around and slashed at the face of the sword’s wielder. The man jumped back but the edge of the sword grazed his cheek and drew blood as he fell over backward. That was when Blacknail saw one of the raiders stumble out of the hole in the wall. As Blacknail unleashed a flurry of blows at another raider that had been about to strike down a hobgoblin, the man hurried over to the blonde raider’s side.

“We’re being pushed out of the village, captain,” the raider yelled at his commander as another man popped through the wall. “The fighting here made too much noise and the peasants swamped us before we were ready for them.”

“Then we’re retreating,” the commander replied. He raised his voice and ordered his men to fall back. All together, the raiders stepped back while keeping their defensive line strong.

Seeing this, Blacknail instantly yelled for his own minions to let them go. Within seconds, the two sides were completely disentangled and the raiders began falling back. They kept close to the wall as they headed to meet up with the other raider squads.

“Do we have dead or wounded?” Blacknail asked as he watched the humans go.

“Two dead and several wounded,” Gob replied.

“Anyone important?”

“No.”

“Good,” Blacknail said as he thought about his next move.

“I’m still alive!” Scamp added, in case anyone cared.

The raiders disappeared around the curve in the wall so Blacknail decided that now was a good time for his force to leave. Trying to enter the village and helping out there would probably be a bad idea, and he’d lost enough minions for one day. They were replaceable but annoying to train. Blacknail was just about to order the withdrawal when he heard a familiar voice.

“Blacknail, over here,” Geralhd yelled as he leaned out of the hole the raiders had knocked in the wall.

“Oh, hello,” Blacknail replied as he blinked in surprise.

“Is this one of those humans we’re not supposed to kill?” Bones asked as he looked between the sword in his hand and Geralhd.

“Yes, that one belongs to our chief,” Gob told him.

“He has snacks!” Scamp added.

“Thank the gods I found you!” Geralhd continued yelling. “When the raiders attacked we had no idea what was going on and if anything had happened to you. Also, by all that is divine, those are a lot of hobgoblins.”

“It’s me, Scamp,” Scamp explained as he walked over to Gerahld. “Do you have any food?”

“Wow, you sure have grown,” Geralhd remarked in surprise. “You’re barely recognizable after your metamorphosis.”

“We need to leave,” Blacknail interjected. The last thing he wanted to do was listen to Scamp and Geralhd catch up. He could only take so much stupid. “The enemy could show up at any second, but don’t worry. I have a great plan and everything is going the way I expected it to.”

“Do you mind filling me in quickly?” Geralhd asked.

“Sorry, I got to go!” Blacknail told him as he motioned for his minions to head back to the forest. He then took off and joined them. Scamp was obviously reluctant to move, but Gob gave him a shove.

Geralhd called after them but Blacknail didn’t stop. He had lied. He had no plan, and he needed to come up with a new one, quick. The raiders had seen what Blacknail had done and countered it. He needed to counter their counter without getting countered in return, simple. It shouldn’t be that hard. Humans were nothing but predictable. Unfortunately, one mistake could ruin everything, and he didn’t have much time. Eventually the raiders would find their way inside Shelter or call for reinforcements. Blacknail had to deal with them quickly or his plans to avenge Saeter would fall apart. He couldn’t let that happen. Now that his master was dead and he was alone, vengeance was everything. Nothing else gave him purpose.









OOD 7












What would Saeter do? As Blacknail led the retreat back to his forward base, he pondered this question. There was a rather large group of humans he had to get rid of and he couldn’t quite figure out how. His first raid had killed over twenty of them, but that still left almost a hundred. Some more had probably died attacking Shelter, but the fighting there hadn’t looked too bloody. Before leaving, Blacknail had stuck around to watch the battle, and the enemy had been driven off before they could get past the walls. However, they had cut some holes in it, which meant the villagers had to watch several new vulnerable areas. Next time, the raiders might get through, especially if they were prepared for Blacknail’s hobgoblins to counterattack from the forest.

Blacknail grunted and scratched his nose. Maybe if a surprise attack wouldn’t work he could use an ambush instead? Yes, that idea had potential. Saeter had mentioned something about hobgoblins and ambushes before. A flash of excitement invigorated Blacknail, as the pieces began falling into place within his mind. This would work, but he was going to need to go back to the main goblin encampment and prepare.

When the hobgoblins arrived at the base they had made under the fallen tree, Blacknail began giving out orders. He wanted most the hobgoblins to stay and keep a watch on things, but Gob had to come with him. Gob was skilled at rounding up workers and keeping them in line. Imp was also needed because he was their only mage.

“Scamp is in charge while I’m gone,” Blacknail reluctantly told his subordinates. Was that seriously his best option? He really needed better minions.

“I’m the boss!” Scamp exclaimed happily to the hobgoblin next to him. No one else was excited about it. The other hobgoblins looked bored or irritated by the prospect of serving under him.

“Only until I get back. Just watch the enemy and don’t do anything stupid,” Blacknail told Scamp as he grimaced sourly. This was going to work, right?

With everything in order, Blacknail and a few of his helpers headed back to the main goblin encampment. Their run through the deep forest was uneventful and they made good time. Once there, it took a while for them to round up all the help and supplies they needed. Blacknail even had an idea about how to use Imp’s magic stones, without getting lots of hobgoblins maimed or killed. By the time they got back to the forward base it was starting to get dark outside. Scamp was napping atop the fallen tree but he quickly hopped down when Blacknail returned.

“The enemy humans attacked the village again, but the cowards quickly retreated when a big fight started,” Scamp reported to Blacknail. He seemed to be pretending he hadn’t just been asleep, even though everyone had obviously seen him. 

“And you just watched and didn’t do anything stupid?”  Blacknail asked as he eyed Scamp carefully. He had a bad feeling.

“Um, I shot at some humans with my bow,” Scamp admitted. “Then the no good cheaters shot back and I had to run away.”

Blacknail was just glad no one had died. One stupid attack was no big deal. He snorted and hit the top of Scamp’s with his closed fist. The other hobgoblin just took the blow, scowled, and rubbed his now sore head.

“So, great chieftain, what is your new plan?” Gob asked.

“We’re going to split into three groups and attack their sentries!” Blacknail explained as he grinned proudly.

“Um, this meager hobgoblin doesn’t understand how that’s any different from before...”

“Just trust me! I’m way smarter than you,” Blacknail responded jovially.

“I like that plan!” Khita added excitedly.

Very slowly, Blacknail turned to stare at her. His eyes narrowed as he took in the sight of her annoying face. The young redhead was grinning happily at him. Her eyes were practically shinning with excitement.

“What are you doing here?” he asked her.

“She was wandering around in the forest looking for you,” Scamp explained.

“And you invited her here?” Blacknail asked in disbelief.

“She had snacks,” Scamp replied with a shrug.

This sort of thing was exactly the sort of stupid stuff Blacknail had been worried about. The hobgoblin chieftain turned and smacked Scamp again. What was he supposed to do with Khita now?

“I have some snacks for you too, Blacknail,” Khita told him.

“You can’t bribe me with food, right now. I’m not hungry,” Blacknail replied contemptibly. How simple did she think he was?

Since there was no getting rid of her now, Blacknail agreed to let Khita join his force. She could serve as a human shield. If he did save the entire village of Shelter they would probably forgive him the death of one idiot. Still, she might slow him down so she would have to sit out the first attack and stay back with Imp and the others. They needed to hang back and make some preparations.

When he’d marshaled his forces and distracted Khita by giving her a meaningless job, Blacknail led his force around the edge of the forest until they arrived at the staging ground he had selected. There, a large tree-studded hill rose up right where the fields ended. The uneven ground also meant that the border between the clearing and the forest was irregular. Only the flat earth had been cleared. Off to the left of the hill, there was a ridge where the trees and bushes jutted out into the clearing by almost thirty feet.

“Perfect, this will work great,” Blacknail laughed as he looked around from atop the hill.

“The tribe is ready, clever leader,” Gob told him. He sounded unusually unsure about the last part.

“Good, just remember to retreat back here when I give the signal,” Blacknail responded as he gave Scamp a meaningful look.

“I’m great at retreating,” Scamp bragged. The only response from Blacknail was a non-committal grunt.

It was just starting to grow dark as Blacknail led his squad of hobgoblins out into the fields and towards the raiders’ camp. As before, there were groups of sentries posted all around the perimeter. However, now it was light out enough out that they wouldn’t have much problem seeing. Still, the hobgoblins kept low to the ground and attempted to sneak up on the sentries. They moved with great care but only made it about halfway across the fields before they were discovered.

“The savages are attacking again!” someone suddenly yelled at the top of their lungs. It was quickly followed by other shouts from deeper within the enemy camp.

Surprisingly, Blacknail found their choice of words to be fitting. He was both a savage fighter and savagely good looking. Maybe he would show them mercy.

“Charge, tear the invaders apart and take all their possessions. You keep what you kill!” Blacknail roared as he stood tall and pointed his blade towards the sentries. On second thought, mercy took a lot of effort.

Immediately, the hobgoblins rose and sprung into action. Half of them charged forward to attack the grossly outnumbered sentries, while the others drew their bows and began shooting arrows across the field.

“I get that hat!” Twig yelled as he dashed forward.

One of the sentries went down as an arrow caught him in the chest, and then the charging hobgoblins overran the other two. The mob of seven hobgoblins instantly surrounded their victims and pulled them down. There were pained screams as Blacknail’s minions ripped into the men with their claws, and then silence. Apparently, they had taken his order to tear them apart literally.

By this time the rest of the raider camp had come alive. A dozen armed men were already running towards Blacknail’s minions, and there were more behind them.

“Slow them down,” Blacknail ordered his archers as he pointed towards the raiders’ lead element.

A small flock of arrows immediately took flight and flew towards the charging raiders. Most of them missed but they did slow the targets down. This gave Blacknail time to signal the retreat.

“Run, back to the forest. The humans are too many!” he yelled.

At his command, the hobgoblins that were still looting the sentry post quickly started running away from the charging humans and back towards the archers. There was only about a dozen feet between the hobgoblins and pursuing humans now, but Blacknail’s minions managed to pull ahead a bit and keep their distance. They were quick on their feet and rather motivated.

When the runners raced past Blacknail’s position they were joined in their retreat by the archers. All together, the entire group headed back to the hill. This scene was repeated by the other two hobgoblin squads led by Gob and Scamp. Fifty feet from the edge of the forest all three squads met and converged.  Unfortunately, this meant that all the raiders converged as well. Blacknail looked over his shoulder to see dozens of armed thugs in hot pursuit. Why did humans have to be so big?

“They’re chasing me!” Scamp yelped as he ran up beside Blacknail.

“They’re chasing all of us,” Blacknail hissed back.

Although Blacknail was beginning to doubt the wisdom of his own plan, he couldn’t just abandon it now.

“Turn and fight!” Blacknail roared as he drew his sword.

As they had been instructed earlier, the hobgoblins stopped running and turned to face their pursuers. They didn’t seem very happy about it, though. It took mere seconds for the raiders to close the distance between them. The humans drew their weapons and roared in rage. The hobgoblins were silent and grim looking, however none of them fled. Blacknail had been very clear about what would happen to any cowards, and he was much harder to escape than a clueless blundering human.

Blades flashed through the air as the two sides formed a violent melee. Hobgoblins and humans hacked at each other and dodged blows aimed their way as they fought to survive and cut down their enemies.  That discipline didn’t last long, though. Within a few seconds the first hobgoblin was cut down. He was soon joined by another, and then the others broke. Outnumbered and outmuscled, the hobgoblins stood no chance in a head to head confrontation, and they knew it. They dashed towards the forest, as another one of their number was cut down from behind.

However, not every hobgoblin was running blindly. Blacknail kept fighting as he backed away from the humans. His blade forced the raiders around him away, but he kept having to retreat in a hurry to avoid being surrounded. Raiders were pressing in at him from every side. It was only after most Blacknail’s minions had gained a fair bit of distance, that he ducked under a wild swing and began sprinting away at full speed. He didn’t have to go far. They were at the edge of the forest now. In their haste to chase down their foes, the raiders had followed them all the way to the very edge of the greenery.

The lead element of the raiders stepped into the bushes and under the shade cast by the trees of the forest. Blacknail lured them in closer. As he stepped around a tree trunk to avoid a slash aimed at his face, he blasted the humans with his power. However, he didn’t make them more afraid, instead he did the opposite. With his power he stifled their fear and emboldened the minds of the raiders. The writhing worms that formed their minds were drained of energy and kept calm.

However, even while under Blacknail’s influence, the humans didn’t lose all sense of caution. Like the last time they had pursued the hobgoblins, the raider stopped their counterattack at the edge of the forest. Only their lead elements followed the hobgoblins into the bushes, the rest were called back their leaders and came to stop. That was alright, though. Blacknail had been expecting it.

As the ranks of enemy raiders came to halt and hobgoblins dashed behind bushes and trees, well over a hundred goblins rose from out of hiding. Their dirty green skin allowed them to camouflage right in with the face of the hill that started right were the fields ended.

“Attack! Kill them from afar! Show them our power!” Blacknail yelled as he leaned out from behind a tree. It was safe there.

The goblins immediately sprang into action. Each and every one of them was carrying a loaded sling, and at Blacknail’s command they began to twirl them. Sharp whipping sounds rang out as the swarm of goblins launched a barrage of rocks. The stony projectiles zipped through the air and slammed into the surprised raiders.

“Form up! Protect your heads!” a raider sergeant yelled as he pulled another man back away from a bush.

All the raiders could do was try to shield themselves. Waves of rocks were pummeling their ranks and one by one they began to fall. Blacknail didn’t waste the chance to make their situation worse either. At his command, the hobgoblins that had retreated to behind cover popped back out with bows in their hands. They began picking off targets among the raiders.

This new assault was more than the humans could take. Their formation broke as raiders began to turn and run in a selfish attempt to save themselves. However, this didn’t prevent more raiders from dropping as rocks smashed into their now exposed backs. The entire group quickly fell apart, leaving their dead and injured. While this was happening, Imp and Khita reached Blacknail’s side. Imp was accompanied by two other hobgoblins that had been assigned to help him.

“Have we won?” Khita asked as grinned excitedly.

“You haven’t done anything,” Blacknail pointed out as he watched the enemy carefully.

“Should I join the battle now, warchief?” Imp asked. He was carrying a large backpack that was full of equipment and supplies.

“Not yet,” Blacknail replied. They were already winning and he knew it was important to hold something back, in case he needed a good surprise to counter something his enemy did. He had learned this lesson from watching Herad lead battles. Basically everything he knew about war he had learned from her.

Suddenly, the retreating raiders stopped in their tracks. A new group of reinforcements had joined them and stiffened their spines. As Blacknail watched, the raiders parted to let one of the newcomers approach the front. It was a woman. She was protected by two men with shields who blocked the rocks and arrows that flew his way. The new arrival raised a hand, and there was a loud boom as a blast of rippling force shot forth. The explosion rose into the air and knocked most of the incoming rocks and arrows harmlessly aside.

She was a mage! Blacknail had suspected that the raiders had one when he had seen the magelight during his attack on their camp. It looked like this was a serious magic wielder, a combat mage. That wasn’t good. Blacknail had seen what mages like Mahedium could do. They were dangerous beyond belief. Since magic was so expensive and hard to control, the raiders must have been holding the woman in reserve.

Down below, the enemy mage raised her staff and pointed it at the hillside before her. The tip of the arcane weapon began to glow.

“Get down!” Blacknail yelled as he grabbed Khita and pulled her down in front of himself.

A column of flame burst into being and rushed forward towards the forest. It hissed and roared as it flew through the air, and then there was a cataclysmic boom as it hit the earth. Everything shuddered. Dirt and bits of wood flew through the air all around Blacknail as he huddled down close to the earth. The smell of smoke and burnt flesh assaulted his nose. He looked up to see that the power of the blast had torn a long scar across the hill. It was only about two dozen feet from his own position.

Those goblins that weren’t frozen in shock were already screaming and fleeing off deeper in to the forest. Only a few of them had actually been killed or injured by the blast, but they were cowards.

“That’s taught these skinny savages their place!” one of the raiders yelled triumphantly. “Now let’s drive these green freaks away and show them what humans are made of!”

The battered ranks of raiders roared their approval and began to charge forward again. Very few goblins were still throwing rocks, although several hobgoblins shot arrows at the advancing humans. The hobgoblins were braver than mere goblins, and smart enough to know that running would expose them and make themselves targets. However, a few stones and arrows wouldn’t be enough to stop the human charge.

“Rot and ruin, what are we going to do now?” Khita asked as stared at the approaching wave of human brutes. “That’s some serious magecraft they’ve got!”

“Now you can use your magic! Return fire at the mage,” Blacknail ordered Imp, who was huddled next to him.

The hobgoblin mage nodded and stood up. His two followers quickly followed his example and pulled out two large slings. There were already red crystals loaded in the weapons. Imp pulled a small metal wand and touched it to both mana stones. As they burst into flames, the two hobgoblins began to spin and aim their weapons. Blacknail had selected the pair for their skill with slings.

There was a twang as the hobgoblins released their shots. The two crystals whistled and trailed flames as they flew up into the air. Blacknail held his breath as the flaming orbs began to arc down toward the center of the raiders' formation. What happened next would determine the course of the battle.










OOD 8














Smoke billowed out from the shallow trench the enemy mage’s blast had dug across the hillside. The haze made seeing difficult, but Blacknail peered past it as he observed the enemy. Around him, the goblins were in disarray but most of the hobgoblins were picking themselves off the ground or shooting at the humans that were now pushing their way through the bushes at the edge of the forest. Gob was leading the resistance down below. However, Blacknail was focused on the large formation of raiders that was staying out in the fields. That was where the enemy mage was, and where Imp’s magical projectiles were about to land. Even the most complicated trap could work if you lured the enemy to exactly where you wanted him and then trapped him there. 

The enemy mage had already turned away from the goblins' position and was issuing orders to the men around her. Another raider raised the alarm, and the mage spun around and looked up. Two blazing orbs were headed her way, and they left a tail of fire behind them as they fell. 

The mage hurriedly raised her hand up in a defensive gesture. She seemed to recognize that the small fireballs were dangerous. Another blast of invisible power burst forth from her amulet, and there was a loud boom as the resulting explosion met the falling balls of fire and knocked them aside. One of the flaming crystals was thrown safely off to the side. It hit the ground and exploded without hurting anyone. However, the other fireball was only nudged off-kilter a bit. It spiraled down and fell at the edge of the raiders’ formation, where it detonated. A blazing sphere the size of a small home engulfed over a dozen men, and the force of its birth threw a dozen more raiders aside. Screams of shock and pain filled the air. 

“Finally, a successful test!” Imp exclaimed happily as he smiled broadly and threw his hands up in excitement. “Boom! I’ve already learned so much. Look at them burn.” 

“Very nice,” Blacknail replied as the flames reflected in his eyes. “But you need to do it again. Most of them are still alive.”

Blacknail was really coming to like magic. It made everything so much easier, especially blowing people up. 

“Yeah, do it again, and hit the mage this time. That bitch has it coming,” Khita added as she climbed to her feet. She had apparently been unhurt by the mage’s attack but was feeling resentful. 

Imp and his two assistants immediately launched another set of fireballs. Just like the last ones, the new projectiles soared towards the enemy formation. However, before they could hit, they were blocked by another blast from the mage’s hand. Both the fireballs careened harmlessly off to the side. As Blacknail watched, the mage then turned and pointed the tip of her staff right in Blacknail’s direction. The hobgoblin’s eyes went wide and he tensed up. 

“Dodge!” Blacknail yelled as threw himself off to one side. 

He was just in time. Flames shot forth from the end of the weapon and blasted the hillside again. A wave of excruciating heat washed over Blacknail and he was sent rolling across the ground by the explosion. The air was knocked out of Blacknail’s lungs as he came to a sudden stop and his back slammed into the base of a tree. Pain flared through his ribs and spine, and his head hit the ground hard. Dizzily, he blinked and looked around. Burning leaves were falling all around him. The ground was torn and broken. The blast had dug a burning trench where he had been standing a few moments ago. Luckily, other than Imp and his assistants there hadn’t been many goblins or hobgoblins nearby. 

Everything looked blurry as Blacknail tried to gather his thoughts. He sat up but didn’t try to stand. His entire body hurt far too much for him to try and get up right now, maybe in a minute. He touched the side of his head and his fingers came away wet. He appeared to be bleeding. That wasn’t good. 

From what Blacknail could see, he was alone now. Imp and his aides were missing or incinerated. No more fireballs were being thrown at the raiders, and they were charging into the forest unimpeded. Blacknail could hear the raiders cheering. The hobgoblins were being pushed back or had been spooked by the mage’s attack and were already running away. There was chaos as the humans pressed their advantage. In their enthusiasm, their orderly lines broke apart as they reached the trees and separated. 

It seemed like Blacknail’s plan had failed. Stupid mages. Blacknail hated magic. It was unfair and impossible to predict. How was a hobgoblin supposed to kill a bunch of humans when they could blow up hillsides with magic fire? This was Imp’s fault, somehow. He should have been a better mage. Now it seemed like the only thing Blacknail could do was retreat and try to rebuild. He didn’t see any way of turning this disaster around, not while that mage was alive. Maybe he could sneak back later – after he had healed a bit - and try to kill the mage? 

Blacknail closed his eyes for a second so he could rest them, and his other senses expanded, including his magical ones. They felt stronger than usual. Instantly, Blacknail could sense the minds of the people around him. They were mostly just tiny glimmers off in the endless dark, but they were there. 

Oh, right. He had Elixir; that would probably make him feel better. Blacknail opened his eyes and reached down to pull out his vial of Elixir. Without a thought, he downed the entire container in one gulp. For some reason it tasted a little off. Well, it was probably nothing. 

The familiar cleansing burn of Elixir surged throughout Blacknail’s body and he pulled himself to his feet. New strength was already building within him. Suddenly, Blacknail felt his mental sense expand again. The glimmers of fear all around him grew brighter and came into focus. He could feel both the minds of the humans and of the hobgoblins. They were very different. At the current moment, most the hobgoblins were more afraid than the humans, but at the same time they were capable of less depth in their fear. 

“Ha, stupid humans,” Blacknail mumbled to himself. 

Just as Blacknail was about to try and help the remaining hobgoblins organize their retreat, a sudden sensation burst into his mind. Cold terror stabbed its way through his skull and he gasped from the unexpected pain. Ugh, what was this? Blacknail couldn’t figure out the source the pain. He stumbled as he tried to clear his mind. Wait, was the source outside of himself? Blacknail reached out and sensed a mind that was blazing with terror. It was human and nearby. 

Steadying himself, Blacknail scanned the forest for signs of the source. It didn’t feel that far away. Suddenly, he noticed a flash of red among the underbrush. For a second he didn’t recognize it, but then he did. It was Khita’s hair. The redhead was lying on the ground. The enemy mage’s blast must have thrown her there. As Blacknail watched, she shivered and moved ever so slightly. Until this moment, he had completely forgotten that she had joined his war party and been near the blast. He usually tuned her out. 

Grimacing in pain, Blacknail walked over to her. He didn’t have much time. There were raiders searching the bush nearby. They were moving carefully but they would reach him in seconds. Khita turned and looked his way as he shuffled over. 

“Hey, stupid. Stop being afraid, now!” Blacknail told her. His brain still felt like it was freezing over. It was uncomfortable and obviously Khita’s fault. 

“It doesn’t work that way,” Khita laughed ruefully. “I can’t walk. My knee is all busted up and so is my arm. I can’t even get up. I’m going to die here.”

Blacknail stared down at her. He didn’t know what to say to that. Goodbye, maybe?

“You need to leave me, Blacknail. Just promise me you will survive and get bloody vengeance for me,” Khita told him as she groaned in pain. “I want these fuckers to bleed.” 

“You’re terrified of dying,” Blacknail pointed out. He could feel it. Why was she pretending she wasn’t? 

“So what! Just get out of here,” Khita hissed at him. 

“I can’t leave you,” Blacknail replied angrily. This headache was seriously slowing him down. Trying to run with it would be risky. Also, leaving her to die felt wrong. She was a part of his tribe, sort of.

“Go! Everyone leaves everyone eventually. We’re all alone in the end. Even the bonds of family, gangs, and bands are just comforting lies,” Khita shot back as she clenched a fist angrily. “I only joined Herad’s band and then your tribe because I wanted to go out with a bang. At least I succeeded at that. Damn this bloody world! I’m happy to leave it behind.” 

“This is one of those annoying rants about your brother, isn’t it?” Blacknail replied. Khita tended go on about his death when she got emotional. 

“I thought you never paid attention to that!” the redhead hissed as she glared at Blacknail. 

“I don’t, but I have good hearing, and you never shut up about it.”

“Leave already, you ungrateful bastard!”

“Fine, stay here,” Blacknail replied angrily as he turned to stomp away. It was insulting that she wanted to sacrifice herself for him, as if it gave her value. It was such a dumb human thing to do. In fact, another human had done it for him before, Saeter…

Blacknail hissed as new emotions warred within him. This headache was infuriating. The connection to Khita was much worse than the pain. He took a deep breath and tried to stifle Khita’s fear. His power reached out and pressed down on her mind, but her inner turmoil didn’t seize. Blacknail’s cold headache continued, so instead he tried something different. Instead of fighting the feeling, he embraced it. Blacknail immediately regretted this decision. He went stiff as terror such as he had never known tore through his mind. It hurt worse than being punched in the brain. Worse of all, it felt permanent, like he was being scarred. Was this what Khita was feeling? Was this what humans felt? It sucked. No wonder they were such weaklings. 

New sensations clawed at Blacknail’s thoughts. He wanted it to stop! What was he doing? Stupid magic. He staggered again as he tried to reorient himself. Suddenly, he remembered something. There were raiders approaching. He felt them. Two of them had spotted him and were marching through the bushes toward him. Blacknail’s eyes narrowed. They were the problem. They wanted to take what was his. As annoying as she was, Khita was his. Blacknail growled, and the deep menacing sound echoed out into the forest. He flared his Elixir and the magic washed away his confusion. Suddenly everything was so clear. He had purpose and power. 

“Wait, something’s off about his hob,” one of the raiders stuttered. He was a big man but he suddenly looked nervous and unsure of himself. 

The other raider hesitated and looked at his companion. He must have sensed that something was wrong as well.

“It’s just a savage,” he replied. It was supposed to have been a reassuring comment but the man just sounded uncertain. 

Both the raiders had their weapons drawn and were keeping an eye on Blacknail, but that didn’t save them. The furiously invigorated hobgoblin lunged forward with startling speed and attacked with all the power of his rage. He didn’t bother with drawing his sword. He ducked under the man’s weapon and then reached up to tear his throat out with his claws. There was a crunching noise and blood sprayed from the wound, but Blacknail was already turning to face the other man. With a panicked yelp, the raider swung at Blacknail, but the hobgoblin sidestepped the blow and jumped on his opponent. They fell together and Blacknail landed on top of the man’s chest. There were screams as Blacknail’s claws started ripping into flesh, and then silence when Blacknail pushed the man’s flailing hands away and took a bite out of the side of his exposed neck. The hobgoblin spat bits of flesh away and then looked around for more raiders. The taste of blood filled his mouth and it dribbled down his chin. 

Ice and fire churned within Blacknail’s body. The Elixir burned through his blood as cold waves of alien terror washed over him. He couldn’t stand still. The pain was a minor thing now. He barely felt it. It had been numbed by the energy within him, and that wanted out. Blacknail screamed in rage. The chilling predatory sound echoed through the forest as he was propelled by momentum forward through the bushes. He had failed to save Saeter and Herad. Werrick had taken them. Blacknail would never see or learn from them ever again, but he wasn’t going to lose anyone else, not even a useless person like Khita. All of Werrick’s men had to die. He could think of nothing else. 

Three more swordsmen rushed forward to attack Blacknail from behind, but he sensed them coming. He jumped away from the raiders and drew his own blade. As one of the men lunged and slashed at him, Blacknail twisted out of the way and sliced the man’s hand. He yelped and dropped his weapon. The second raider’s blade zoomed toward Blacknail’s chest. He stepped into the blow and blocked it with his own sword. There was a metallic crack as the blades met. A quick shove then knocked the man off balance, and Blacknail stabbed him in the gut. The third enemy backed off and was quickly reinforced by two other men who had noticed all the activity.  

Blacknail eyed his opponents as they watched him in turn. They were prey and the world was his trap. Blacknail grinned as he took a moment to reach out with his power and clamp down on some of the minds he felt. There was a rustling from the bushes off to one side, and then three arrows zipped out and shot towards the raiders. Two of the whirring projectiles hit. One slammed into a raider’s arm and the other sank into a man’s chest. 

“Ah, shit,” the raider who had been shot in the arm cursed as he dropped his weapon and cradled his injury. 

There were still some hobgoblins hanging back to see what unfolded. The commotion Blacknail was causing was drawing them to him even as it caught the attention of the raiders as well. They had only needed a little encouragement in order to get over their caution and join the fray. Suppress one instinct and another would rise to take its place, bloodlust.  

As the raider with the arrow in his chest toppled over backward, Blacknail attacked. He charged in and swung at the uninjured raider. The man grunted and raised his blade to block the blow, but Blacknail was already spinning away. The hobgoblin lunged sideways and stabbed the raider with the injured arm. His blade cut into the man's side and bit deep before coming free. 

“You bloody bastard!” the last raider cursed as he backed away from Blacknail. 

The enraged hobgoblin met his gaze and growled. The raider quickly took another step back, and that was when an arrow pierced his thigh. As the man stumbled, Blacknail lunged forward and sliced his throat open. There was a thud as the body hit the ground, and Blacknail looked over his shoulder to see three hobgoblins with bows standing next to a tree. Blacknail grunted, turned away from them, and pressed on. Killing these grunts wasn’t good enough. He needed to eliminate the real threat, the mage. Only then would he be safe and satiated. Only then would the pain end. 

The edge of the forest lay just ahead, and Blacknail could sense what was beyond it. He picked up speed. As he ran, he gathered his power. The burning magic of the elixir continued to boil his blood as icy rage seeped into his bones. Behind him, terror reigned. The hobgoblins that had been in retreat were now counter attacking the disorganized and stunned humans. Arrows flew and green figures leapt out of bushes upon men driven mad by fear. Blacknail’s power was spread all throughout the trees and it pressed down upon the minds on his enemies, but it wasn’t enough. Raw alien emotion rushed through Blacknail, subsuming everything but his uncontrollable drive to lash out at his enemies, the people that hurt him, the people he feared. 

There was a whipping noise and an explosion of leaves as Blacknail burst out the bushes and into the clearing. Like a lightning bolt, he smashed into the force of raiders that were waiting there. He let loose a scream of rage and pushed out as much magic as he could. The power distorted the air around him. It rolled forth like an unrelenting wave of steam and enveloped everyone nearby. With it came terror and horror. 












OOD 9












Magic radiated out from Blacknail as he charged out of the forest. The dread power writhed like a frenzied snake and lashed out at the minds of the thirty or so raiders before him. They had been ready for an attack but not for what confronted them now. With startling speed, Blacknail crossed the ground between him and the raiders. He snarled as he swung his blade and leapt upon the first human that dared to stand in his way.

A raider cursed as Blacknail brutally slashed the face of his first victim. “By all that is divine, what is this thing! It’s not natural!”

“Oh, gods. It’s a demon from the deepest hells!” another man shouted as he flinched away from the violence.

Enemies that should have stood their ground stumbled and jerked away from the monster in their midst. A haze of raw magic streamed from Blacknail’s skin, distorting people’s vision, even as terror twisted their perceptions and dulled their wits. Blacknail’s blade flashed as he cut down everyone near him. He twisted and danced around the sluggish counterattacks of his enemies. There were over two dozen raiders facing Blacknail, but none of them had even managed to land a blow on him yet.

Blacknail flowed and fought with the savage abandon of Herad. Instinctively, he copied her style as best he could. Sword fighting was one of the many things Blacknail had been taught by Saeter, but he had also learned a thing or two from his old chieftain. She had been a Vessel, the fiercest fighter he had ever seen, and a ruthless leader worthy of his reverence.

“Don’t retreat! Surround the beast and don’t let it slip away,” a furious sergeant screamed.

Several raiders were too shocked or afraid to attack. They focused on protecting themselves and stood their ground or stepped back away from Blacknail when he advanced. This gave him space to maneuver and blocked other raiders from joining the fight. Blacknail ruthlessly used this advantage. He dodged to the side of an attack and then sliced the leg of a man to his left. The raider fell but was almost instantly replaced by another. This didn’t faze Blacknail. The odds didn’t matter. There was only the fight and the blood.

His master had believed in things. Blacknail had never really understood that until now. The liquid ice that was churning within him was bringing new thoughts with it. He felt bloated, but suddenly he knew what it was to be carried along by something greater than himself. Vengeance was personal. Bloodthirst was personal, but this wasn’t about him. He was going to kill these raiders because they were in the way of what he was building. He was part of something greater. Saeter would have approved.

“You useless toads, kill it!” someone screamed.

Annoyed, Blacknail took a moment to look for the speaker. As their eyes met, Blacknail’s magic ripped into the man’s mind. There was a gasp as the raider’s eyes went wide. He then convulsed and collapsed.

A sword sliced toward Blacknail’s side, but he easily parried the blow and then struck back. As the attacker fell, the hobgoblin vaulted over his body and pressed forward toward his goal. At the back of the squad of raiders was the enemy mage. She was staring at Blacknail and clenching her protective amulet tight.

Someone cursed as Blacknail cut another raider down. “Gods above, what is this thing?”

“It must be a mutant, cut it down!” the mage ordered her minions. 

There was an annoyed grunt from a bulky bandit with long black hair beside her. He had engaged Blacknail earlier but had taken a slash across his arm and been forced to retreat. “You’re our magic expert, you deal with it!”

“Anything strong enough to hurt it would splash back on us, but don’t worry. I’m sure you can take it down,” the mage replied. She herself was hanging back far away from the action.

At the command of their leader, several fresh raiders stepped forward to attack. Blacknail had already killed or disabled seven enemies, and wounded several more, but there were still over a dozen left, and the mage was keeping out of reach. Exhaustion was also finally starting to set in. Blacknail’s frantic pace was pushing him to his limit. The power within hadn’t diminished, but it felt like his body was starting to rebel and go numb.

Two raiders moved to attack Blacknail from opposite sides at the same time. He stepped forward to block one blow as he twisted out of the way of the other, but he didn’t quite manage it. The blade grazed his side and drew blood. It wasn’t a serious wound so Blacknail ignored it and kept fighting. He couldn’t even feel the wound beneath his pulsing rage.

Blacknail hissed as he launched a flurry of blows. “Die humans. All the Wolf’s men will die.”

A shorter raider jerked back away from Blacknail when he spoke. “The thing can talk!”

“Get out of the way, you coward!” the sergeant yelled as he pushed his way past the other raider. He was a big man with a scar under his left eye and a bit of flesh missing from the tip of his nose.

Blacknail was forced back when the ugly man took a swing at him. He had to scramble to catch his balance and avoid stumbling into an enemy. Reassured by their sergeant, other raiders were pressing in closer. Blacknail hissed and took a few swings at them to keep them away. He had lost his momentum and was now on the defensive. If he didn’t regain it then he would be overwhelmed.

Suddenly, a flock of arrows flew out of the forest and hit the edge of the raider formation. Several men screamed and fell as the projectiles drew blood or sank into soft flesh. In the nick of time, Blacknail’s minions had come to his aid. It seemed like the hobgoblins had retaken control of the forest and were regrouping, although they hadn’t worked up the courage or the numbers to rush to Blacknail’s side yet.

Blacknail dodged to the side of a swing by a distracted raider, and sent a blast of fear forward. As the magic pulse washed over them, the raiders in front of Blacknail froze or jumped back. One raider fell and clenched his chest before beginning to spasm on the ground.

Ignoring the wounded and the weak, Blacknail surged forward through the now open path before him with supernatural speed. He dodged around a surprised swordsman and then the mage stood before him. She was a tall woman with short blonde hair, and she had a hawkish look to her face because of her sharp nose and chin. Unlike most the other raiders, she was dressed in recognizable armor including a metal cap and breastplate. As Blacknail closed in, her face went white and her eyes widened in fear. Hurriedly, she raised a hand and thrust forth her amulet at the hobgoblin. Blacknail immediately reacted. He dove to the side and through the legs of a surprised raider, just as the wave of force exploded around him. Raiders were thrown backward as the mage’s spell hit her allies.

Low to the ground, Blacknail weathered the blast. A foot hit him in the back as a raider flew past him, but Blacknail grimaced and prepared himself. He flipped over and crouched on all fours. When the magic died down and there were no raiders still standing near him, Blacknail uncoiled and launched himself at the mage again. The woman yelped and swung her amulet around, but Blacknail caught her arm and pushed it up so that the blast was sent harmlessly up into the sky. A loud boom shook the air.

“You’re mine!” Blacknail growled as dust blew all around him.

“Monster!” the mage gibbered.

She dropped her staff as she tried to pull her arm free, but Blacknail held it firm. He growled as their eye met and the woman froze in terror. This gave Blacknail the chance to pull her closer and smash the back of her head with the pommel of his sword. There was a thud and she slid bonelessly to the ground.

“Ha, I win! No one can defeat me. I’m magic,” Blacknail crowed as he stood over her unconscious body. Mages were magic too… but that wasn’t important right now.

The hobgoblin’s reflection was interrupted by the sound of someone yelling. “Quick, get the creature before he finishes her off!”

Blacknail looked over to see several humans with wicked looking blades getting ready to attack him. Oh, right. Those guys. He had somehow forgotten about them. His head felt funny.

Now that the mage was down, Blacknail still had to deal with the dozen raiders that had picked themselves off the ground or were still standing. The hulking humans had him surrounded. Bereft of other options, Blacknail turned to face the nearest one and growled menacingly. The low throaty sound passed escaped past his teeth and out into the air. The raiders flinched. It had waned a little, but magic was still flowing through Blacknail’s body. However, the mysterious chill energy had begun to make him lightheaded. Wait, had he just charged the enemy alone? That didn’t sound like something he would do. Now wasn’t the time to question himself, though. He needed to keep killing.

Blacknail steadied himself and he shifted his grip on his sword as he brought it up into an aggressive position. The raiders spread out to surround him. A hint of fatigue began to sap Blacknail’s strength. Now that he had lost his momentum he didn’t feel quite so unstoppable. A tall raider with a red beard signaled to his fellows with a hand gesture and stepped forward. The other raiders advanced as well. Suddenly concerned, Blacknail looked for a way to escape their confinement. He wasn’t blade proof.

That was when a small fireball hit the ground off to one side. There was heavy thud as it landed and everyone looked over to see what it was. A moment later, the flaming crystal exploded. A wave of heat washed over Blacknail and the raiders. They all shielded their eyes and braced themselves, but the explosion wasn’t close enough to hurt any of them. However, it definitely got their attention.

“Ya, fuck this! I’m getting out of here,” a shorter raider with an axe cursed. “I don’t know what in damnation is going on here, but this place is crazy, and I don’t want to die fighting this thing.”

The man then threw his axe aside and began sprinting away. There was a moment of hesitation, and then was soon followed by the rest of his companions. As Blacknail watched, the raiders fled away from the forest. He was soon left standing alone at the edge of the field, except for the bodies of the fallen.

“Huh, I win for real this time,” he remarked to himself. He hadn’t meant to sound surprised but he had. He also felt kind of dizzy.

A rustling noise drew Blacknail’s attention, and he looked over to see the bushes at the edge of the forest shake. He hoped it wasn’t a troll. It had been one of those days. Much to Blacknail’s relief, it wasn’t a troll. Several hobgoblins stepped out onto the fields and began walking over toward him. All of them looked a little worse for wear. Their mismatched clothes were dirty and most of them had new cuts and bruises. Despite that, they looked proud of themselves and were carrying new weapons. It seemed like they had taken the time to loot some of the fallen raiders. One of the hobgoblins was even carrying a decapitated human head. He had it gripped by the hair and its mouth was hanging open as it dripped blood.

At the head of the group was Gob. Blacknail also noticed Herah, Imp, and Scamp among them. When the hobgoblins reached his side, they immediately dropped to their knees and began prostrating themselves. Blacknail watched numbly as they waved their hands up and down repetitively. They looked stupid.

“What’s this now?” he asked his collected minions.

Gob was the one to immediately reply. “Bless us with your presence, great one. You are as a god!”

“You defeated the humans almost all by yourself! You charged them and struck down their maker of magics. They fled before you!” Herah added as her eyes shone with wonder. She crawled forward to hug Blacknail's leg but he shook her off.

“Yes, I did do that…” Blacknail replied thoughtfully.

What would have Herad have thought of his actions? It was almost something she would have done. Saeter would have thought it was moronic, and Blacknail agreed. So why had he done it? He could have died a dozen times or more. Whatever his motivations, it didn’t change the fact that his head hurt a lot. Ouch.

The hobgoblins continued their bowing and adoration. Blacknail found it super annoying. He usually enjoyed being complimented and praised, but this naked worship was sort of creepy. It was also a waste of precious time, and it was distracting him when he was trying to think. He had a nagging feeling that there were important things he was forgetting.

“Get up! There are things that need done still,” Blacknail ordered his minions. They could worship his amazingness later, on their own time.

The enemy still had some forces left. The survivors from the battle would rejoin the raiders that had been left behind at their camp. Blacknail forgot the name of the raiders' leader, but he might also still be alive. If so, then there might be another battle in the near future. He had to round up the rest of his forces before they dispersed.

“Whatever you wish, it shall be done!” Gob exclaimed as all the hobgoblins got up.

Instead of answering right away, Blacknail took a few more moments to continue thinking. There was also the situation with Shelter. He had to make sure the talk with them went well. They needed to know that they owed him for saving them. They owed him a lot. Also, um… he should check on Khita. For some reason he had just charged a small army to keep her alive, so he would feel really stupid if she was lying dead back there in the forest.

“I want…” Blacknail began to reply before wavering and stopping. What did he want again?

His tongue felt thick and stiff all of a sudden. He blinked at Gob, who stared back expectantly.

“Make sure Khita gets help,” Blacknail managed to say.

The power of the Elixir suddenly stopped. Blacknail felt his body weaken as the fire within went out. Stabs of pain sliced through his body and he stumbled. The chill occupying his mind disappeared as well. He had a moment of clarity, and then his legs buckled and he began to fall over backward. The sky overhead was very blue. Blacknail stared at it until darkness rushed in to fill his vision. A second later, he hit the ground. There was a soft thud, but Blacknail didn’t feel a thing. He was already unconscious.

…

There was something sharp digging into the middle of his spine. Since his back was already sore in several places, he decided to do something about it. Blacknail opened his eyes, shifted his posture, and then grunted in satisfaction. With that done, he remembered who he was and everything that had happened. It was a lot to take in at once.

Quickly, Blacknail sat up and looked around. The movement hurt more than a little and a wave of dizziness washed over him, but that wasn’t important. What had happened to him while he had been out? It looked like someone had carried him back to the forward base. He was laying on a stretcher inside the makeshift structure under the tree, and he wasn’t alone. Scamp was sitting on the ground off to one side. The stupid hobgoblin was napping as he leaned back against a wall.

“Wake up, you dumb slug!” Blacknail yelled.

Jerkily, Scamp sat up and his now open eyes focused on Blacknail. “I wasn’t asleep. I was listening for danger, to keep you safe, boss.”

“How long have I been out and where are the others?”

“It has only been an hour or so. Some of the tribe are outside resting, or watching the enemy. Gob is out tracking down a lot of the tribe. Some cowardly hobgoblins fled into the forest, but not me! I’m brave and loyal, boss.”

Blacknail grunted. Scamp had probably been watching from a safe distance or something. “What are the raiders doing?”

“The humans that you have yet to kill have all gone back to their camp. It looks like they are packing up to flee away from your territory!”

A bit of Blacknail’s unease vanished upon hearing that. It sounded like nothing catastrophic had gone wrong while he was asleep. If the raiders were running then he had time to rest. Everything else could wait a bit. Of course, he still didn’t like the idea of being weak or unconscious near other hobgoblins. The very idea made his skin crawl. He was simply going to have to hope that he’d trained them sufficiently, and that they hated each other more than him.

“What happened to Khita?”

“She is alive, boss. We sent her to Shelter.”

“Oh, good,” Blacknail replied. He definitely didn’t want to be stuck in the same room with her as they both recovered. That would be terrible.

With all the pressing matters dealt with, Blacknail took a few moments to examine his own thoughts. He felt like himself again, mostly. He still felt light headed, but there were no more alien emotions or cold forces rushing through his mind, which was good. He had been doing some crazy shit lately. That was going to stop right now. He had minions for a reason.

A yawn suddenly escaped from Blacknail’s mouth. He still felt tired and sore. The dizziness was just getting worse, so he decided to rest for a while more.

“Wake me up if anything important happens,” Blacknail muttered as he lay back down and swiftly fell asleep. His tribe couldn’t do anything without him…








OOD 10












When Blacknail awoke again, it was the morning and he felt much better. Getting into another fight anytime soon would be a bad idea, but he could walk around. The first thing he did was carefully push Herah’s sleeping form out of the way and leave the makeshift shack. The female hobgoblin had cuddled up to him in the middle of the night. Blacknail shuddered at the thought of her getting so close to him while he was helpless. She was a hobgoblin so she couldn’t be trusted. The second thing he did was track down Gob. It wasn’t very hard. He was standing right outside the shelter, and it looked like he was standing guard. Obviously, he hadn’t done a very good job since Herah had managed to get in.

After a few minutes of praising everything about Blacknail, it didn’t take long for Gob to fill his chieftain in on everything that had happened. The raiders had packed up and left. There were scouts following their tracks and keeping an eye on them. Blacknail decided that they could wait, so he rounded up an honor guard of hobgoblins and headed for Shelter. He had them pick out some new – or at least sort of clean – clothes. Most the hobgoblins already had some that they had looted, which annoyed Blacknail. He had missed his chance to claim some trophies for himself. Blacknail was willing to bet that all the good loot had already been taken and squirreled away. Stupid useless minions, as the leader he was supposed to get the best pickings. He had done most the work!

Once the hobgoblins were dressed up in mismatched but mostly whole clothes, Blacknail led the way to Shelter. He wanted to impress his new friends there and get them used to seeing hobgoblins. The gates didn’t immediately open upon their arrival. Blacknail could hear an argument from the other side of the wall. It went on for several minutes before the gates swung open and Tannin stepped out.

Blacknail greeted him with a cheerful smile and a wave. “Hello there!”

Tannin stared at them unsurely for several seconds before responding. His gaze lingered over the hobgoblins standing beside Blacknail. “Greetings. I see you’ve done as you said you would, and have gotten rid of Orvit and his mob of scum.”

“Who?” Blacknail asked in confusion as he titled his head to the side and squinted.

“The leader of the bandits you just fought.”

“Oh, ya. That guy. He’s dead.” Blacknail had no idea if that was true, but it wasn’t important. He had forgotten the stupid human-face had existed until now.

“So, what are you here for?” Tannin asked.

“I came to see that you’re all right. You’re my friends, right? That’s a normal thing for someone to do for their friend.”

It took Tannin a few moments to come up with a reply to this. He stroked his grey beard thoughtfully. “Hmm, yes. Geralhd assures me that you make a much better friend than enemy.”

“I’m great as both! It’s just that my enemies don’t last long.”

“Right… so anyway, none of your companions from before have any wounds they won’t be able to walk off, except for young Khita. That lass should pull through, though. She’s a fighter.”

“Good then I can go talk to them.”

“Um, I can send someone to bring Geralhd here…”

Blacknail could see where this was headed, so he quickly cut the man off. “I feel like going inside Shelter to see them.”

“Why? What difference does it make to you? This is as good a place as any for a brief talk,” Tannin replied as he grimaced. He was obviously reluctant to let the hobgoblins inside his village.

“You said I could. I just fought a battle for you,” Blacknail hissed as he stared into Tannin’s eyes. “Now, I want to sit down and have some tea, but not the bitter kind. The sweet stuff is better. Snacks would also be nice. I’m kind of a hero.”

“I want tea too,” one of hobgoblin guards muttered. He shut up when Blacknail threw him a angry look. Guards weren’t supposed to talk.

Tannin sighed in defeat. “You will get your tea and snacks.”

“Thanks, friend!” Blacknail exclaimed happily as he stepped forward and put his hand on the man’s shoulder in a friendly gesture. Tannin managed not to flinch, which impressed Blacknail.

Since he didn’t have much of choice, the village elder led the hobgoblins through the gate and inside Shelter. The guards there were all armed and nervous looking, but after a nod from Tannin, they let Blacknail’s group inside without comment.

“My people are a bit jumpy right at the moment, because of the fighting and such. Just try to behave yourselves,” Tannin explained as they walked onto the main street.

At first there was no one in sight, but then two dozen armed militia stormed out of side street and cut them off. There was a bald man with a large gut leading the group. He threw Blacknail a horrified look and then turned to Tannin. “What are you doing? Have you lost your mind, old man! How could you bring those monsters here?

Tannin groaned and moved to confront the newcomers, but Blacknail acted first. He quickly hopped forward and addressed the leader of the group. “I’m here because I saved your village from the bad men, with my horde of murderous monsters, because I’m a nice guy who doesn’t have any reason to dislike you, yet.”

“Was that a threat? I’m not an idiot. I know a threat when I hear it!”

“Then why did you ask?” Humans could be very confusing.

“Shut up. Your little pack isn’t here, though. Is it? We could deal with you right now!” the fat man shot back. He was probably trying to sound tough, but Blacknail wasn’t impressed. He had met scarier spine toads.

“Silly human. Killing me won’t get rid of my minions. You want to be friends with me because I keep the others in line, Laytin.”

“Uh, how do you know my name?” the man asked as Blacknail’s remark caught him off guard.

Blacknail wiggled his fingers dramatically. “The wind and the shadows tell me many things. There are ears everywhere!” The truth was he’d heard someone say the man’s name a second ago when they had been marching over. It had been quiet, but Blacknail had very good hearing.”

Laytin stuttered for a moment, but Blacknail ignored him. The hobgoblin turned to Tannin instead. “Let’s go. I’m done talking to this person. If he gets in my way I will just kill him and all the people stupid enough to follow him.”

The village elder nodded and quickly led the hobgoblins away from the irate militia. There were no more interruptions - probably because all the villagers went out of their way to steer clear of the hobgoblins – so they soon reached their destination, Tannin’s home. Blacknail was ushered inside, sat down at the table, and given a cup of tea. It was even the sweet stuff.

Geralhd arrived soon after that. “Blacknail, it’s great to see you! I was dreading the thought of you disappearing into the forest again for who knows how long.”

After a happy greeting, the pair talked about the battle and what had happened. Tannin chimed in a few time as well. Blacknail spent quite a while going over everything he had done, and proudly describing the dozens of raiders he had personally slain. Unfortunately, he got the impression that they didn’t quite believe him, especially about dodging the magic fire and taking down the mage. Humans could be so silly.

“Well, I’m sure you came here to do more than brag about your heroic exploits,” Geralhd guessed when Blacknail finished his story.

“Yes…” Blacknail replied as he began trying to remember what he had wanted to talk about. Oh, right.

“I didn’t see any goblins around. Are you still using them to dig in the ground?”

“Yes, we are. The fighting scared the critters, that’s all. I’ve heard some muttering about them being spies for you, but no one with the common sense the gods gave simpletons thinks the goblins are smart enough for that, and they have been so useful for our planting that no one is seriously considering getting rid of them. They can be a handful and hard to keep on track, but no one wants to go back to doing all the planting and weeding ourselves.

“Good, do you want more? I have too many of the pests sitting around and not working.”

“We’re good for now. I swear that there are more goblins every time I look.”

He was probably right. Blacknail had noticed that the prospect of food and a safe place to sleep tended to attract wild goblins. The pests seemed to have their own ways of spreading information.

“Is there anything else you want from us?” Tannin asked the hobgoblin.

“Some of my minions will be coming to trade. You need to let them in.”

“What do you have that you think we want?”

“We can trade food. We hunt a lot and you grow things. We also have the tools we claimed from the raiders. I know you need steel.”

“You have a good point there. I can’t deny it. Our stock of good metal has been diminishing these last few years, and we could always use more venison. What would you want in return for this?”

Blacknail sat up and met Tannin’s gaze. “I want good human food, especially cheese. I get upset if I go without cheese for too long, and you wouldn’t like me when I’m upset.”

“Huh, well I’m sure we can work something out there.”

“I also will need some humans to teach my minions things, like how to make cheese or cooking. You have a lot of things that make life easier and I want those. Work sucks.”

“Again, that seems reasonable, and you’re not really giving us much of a choice, are you? You seem to have a small army out there in the Green.”

Blacknail shrugged. “I’m not making you do anything. We’re friends, and it’s up to you if we stay that way.” He had a feeling that Tannin would do as he was asked.

“That’s a two way street. I’ll make sure everyone in the village knows to treat you and yours respectfully, but you have to make sure your people don’t start anything. Hobgoblins aren’t exactly known for their good behavior.”

“I promise. None of my minions would dare to hurt a friend of mine. I wouldn’t like it.”

‘Then I think this will be a productive relationship,” Tannin said as he extended a hand.

Blacknail grabbed it and they shook hands. Tannin had large hands and a powerful grip that kind of hurt. After that, Blacknail said goodbye and he and Geralhd walked back out into the street.

As soon as they were out of range of anyone trying to overhear them, Geralhd leaned close and whispered to Blacknail. “You were talking like you were planning on sticking around this area for a while. I could have sworn that we had all agreed to leave at the first opportunity.”

Oh, ya... Blacknail had forgotten about that. He had told Geralhd and the others that he would guide them south.

“And we will leave soon, but we can’t go right now,” Blacknail quickly explained. “I need to rest, and we have wounded, like Khita. We can’t go anywhere without her – she is one of us! - and she might take a while to heal.”

It was almost a shame that Blacknail couldn’t just leave with Geralhd right now. The thought of leaving Khita behind greatly amused him. She would be stranded in the village with all the people that annoyed her and have no way of ever catching up with them. Tempting, but Blacknail wasn’t going to ruin all his plans just for that.

“I guess that’s true. We do need a bit of time to rest and recuperate from the cost of the fighting.”

“Yes, we do! But don’t worry. We will be going back south soon enough. I want to stay out here even less than you.”

“Ha, I doubt that! Gods,” Geralhd replied mirthfully. “I can’t wait to get back to the comfortable joys of civilization. It has been so long since I tasted good wine or took a nice perfumed bath. I wasn’t made for this rough and tumble life.”

“Ya, and the food out here is terrible. I want spicy meat pies and candied fruit,” Blacknail agreed. That was certainly one of the reasons he wanted to get back, but not the main one.

“Roast pork in honey sauce is what I crave,” Geralhd whispered passionately as he closed in his eyes for a second.

Now that Geralhd had been reassured that his group’s guide wasn’t going rogue, Blacknail was able to say his goodbyes and leave. His hobgoblin minions followed him as he left the village of Shelter and headed back to the goblin encampment within the woods. Instead of walking through the gates though, Blacknail veered off the path and climbed a hill at the edge of the settlement. When he reached the top, Blacknail looked down over the valley.

“Go get Gob and bring him here,” he instructed one of his minions. The hobgoblin immediately nodded and did as he was told.

The bushes behind Blacknail rustled as he looked down at the settlement he had created. It had been nothing more than a pile or rock before his conquest. Now it was so much more than that. The long wooden wall surrounded a dozen buildings. Half of those were longhouses that held almost fifty goblins each. Most the buildings were made of woven bark and bent saplings but there was a new one under construction that was being made from bricks. Below, smoke was rising into the air from several fires. Most were for smoking meat or cooking, but the largest column of smoke was coming from the source of the bricks. It was a huge furnace that that Ferar had built. The lumpy clay structure dwarfed even the last furnace that the goblin had made. It was taller than a hobgoblin and quite impressive looking.

Blacknail scowled. Everything was going well, so he should be happy. However, the strange power that had overtaken him during the battle had left a mark after all. He couldn’t deny it. Most of the time he felt completely normal and he could forget all about that annoying incident, but sometimes strange thoughts slipped into his head. All of a sudden it would be like he was seeing something from a completely new point of view. The sudden shift was disorienting, like seeing movement out of the corner of his eye, and it broke his usual focus with useless thoughts of what could be.

With new eyes, Blacknail studied his creation. Before his fight with the raiders, he had simply seen the encampment as a collection of tools for his use. Everything had a simple purpose. To fight Werrick, he needed an army, which meant he needed humans. However, humans were scatter-brained and reluctant to work for him, so he needed other hobgoblins to help him keep control. The settlement below him had simply been a place for him to gather up hobgoblin minions and train them in pursuit of his vengeance against the Wolf, but now he saw more of its… looming potential.

The goblin encampment was more than a sum of its parts and it had taken on a life of its own. What happened here would ripple out and affect all of the North. Blacknail snarled and scratched his nose. It was a bother, but he was going to have to make sure his actions here didn’t end up causing too much destruction and chaos. Normally, he wouldn’t care, but he knew that Saeter wouldn’t have approved of such things. Blacknail’s master had loved the North and the people that lived there, in his own way. He hadn’t shied away from violence but he’d greatly disapproved of the destruction of cities and unnecessary killing. Blacknail even understood why, kind of. Too much killing made people too afraid to make nice and tasty things. Blacknail liked having other people make him tasty things.

The hobgoblin chieftain’s thoughts were interrupted by the arrival of Gob. He stepped out of the bushes and walked over to Blacknail’s side. “What do you command, great warchief?”

Blacknail’s eyes narrowed and he turned to stare at the forest behind him. “Now we deal with what is left of the intruders. They cannot be allowed to return to the lands of men.”

Gob smiled and licked his lips. “We will hunt them through the trees?”

“Yes, gather up all the hobgoblins you can. It will take many days for the humans to escape the Green. We will stalk them until they grow weary and break. Not a single man will live to tell others of us.”

“Your words shall be done,” Gob replied with obvious excitement before bowing and hurrying back down to fulfill his orders.

When he was gone, Blacknail snorted and shook his head to clear all the clutter. He was doing way too much thinking. It was annoying and actually a bit painful, so he was going to stop and have fun instead.

The hobgoblin chieftain smiled and turned to address the hobgoblin guards that were standing behind him. “Let’s go hunt and kill a bunch of people. They might have things we want.”

The simple life was the best. Soon, Blacknail would make his move South, and the minor scuffle at Shelter would be nothing compared to the terror he would unleash upon the Wolf and his unsuspecting servants. They had no idea what was coming for them, no one did. Soon, blood would pay for blood, and Saeter would be avenged. He would make Herad proud.










INT: HOARD










The scribbling sound of an ink-stained feather-pen sliding rapidly over paper filled the small room.  It was occasionally interrupted by a plop, as the writing instrument was quickly and methodically dunked in an ink vial. That swiftly moving pen was being gripped by the hand of a bald man with a long white beard. He was in turn seated at a grand wooden desk, which was covered in stacks of paper. The old man was wearing ornate red robes and there was a grim but dedicated look on his face as he worked. 

It was getting late and very little light was coming in through the windows, so the small room was lit by two delicate looking lamps. One was hanging from a wall and the other was sitting on the desk. Both of them were made from delicate twisted metal and powered by a mana crystal. The pure white light that shone out of them revealed an impressive looking chamber. Red tapestries emblazoned with a stylistic eye hung on the walls.   

The man continued his work for several minutes until he was interrupted by the sound of the room’s single door opening. He looked up and scowled as a pair of younger men stepped into the room. Both of them stood stiffly and were dressed in red militaristic uniforms, but one was taller and took the lead. 

“You asked to see us, master,” he said as he and his companion gave the man behind the desk a quick bow.  

The bearded man stared at them silently for several seconds. When he replied, he didn’t sound happy and he got right to the point. “Captain, we have recently received several concerning reports from various merchant houses we are in contact with. They all hint at the presence of a rogue mage in the North with access to far more thaumaturgical knowledge than he should have. This is unacceptable. You are to take a guild task force north and deal with the situation yourself.”

The mage guard captain nodded deferentially as he stood at attention. “How reliable is the information? The sources seems suspect to me. The merchant houses have never been our strongest supporters. They would sell anything given the chance.”

The man behind the desk huffed disdainfully, but he didn’t seem annoyed by the question. “True, the fact that several different sources have collaborated the information could be seen as verification of its authenticity, but it is also more than slightly suspicious. It seems likely that our ever-so-helpful informants are working together to feed this information to us. Regardless, investigating this situation is in our interest. The merchants are too powerful to ignore and catching rogues is our greatest priority. Something must be happening here and we need to know what.”

“Why would the merchants want to work together to feed us information? The coin grabbers all compete with each other,” the second mage guard asked in confusion.

This earned him a glare from the guild master. “Unnecessary information. Regardless, it wouldn’t be all of them. There is a certain group of merchants that work together to further their interests. The guild has been watching them, but that doesn’t concern you. Simply do as you have been instructed.” 

“Yes, master!” the lead mage guard quickly responded. “Do you have recommendations or instructions that won’t be in the official briefing?” 

“Why else would I have called you here?” the guild master said as he held out a handful of papers. The lead man took them and quickly looked them over.

“Daggerpoint? That’s way up in the lawless lands! Unless we bring a full war party or join a large caravan even getting there will be difficult.” 

“Exactly, and we might not be the only guild that this information has reached. What we have heard suggests that this rogue may have stolen some rather advanced techniques. Our guild is very interested in knowing exactly how true this is.” 

“Ah, and you want us to make sure that our guild… learns exactly what techniques this rogue has acquired.”

“Yes, and since the North is an uncivilized place with no current rulers and few witnesses, it is also your job to make sure that none of the other guilds prevent this from happening,” the guild master explained as he gave his subordinate a meaningful look.

The mage guard captain nodded again. “I understand. We will leave in the morning.”

“Good, it seems that you do understand. It goes without saying that you will be rewarded greatly if you return bearing useful knowledge.”

“Yes, master. We will not fail you or this guild. Magic is power and magic is truth!” 

“See that you don’t. I am authorizing you to requisition whatever you think you need. Take as many soldiers, equipment, and battles mages as you think suitable. The North can be quite dangerous and this rogue may not go down without a fight. Plan for extended magical combat but don’t be too obvious about it. This is an operation that requires subtlety and perhaps some deniability as well.”

“As you wish. I will bring a full squad of guild wardens and my own pick of experienced battle mages. We will travel north incognito and find this rogue mage.”

“Good. Now, also missing from the official briefing are some of our local contacts,” the guild master replied as he held out another piece of paper. “Even in Daggerpoint we maintain some sources of information, unsavory as they may be. When you get to the city put pressure on them and they should be able to point you in the right direction.” 

“Is that everything, master?” the mage guard captain asked as he took the paper.

“Yes, you are dismissed,” the guild master replied as he waved his subordinates away. He then looked down and pulled his pen out of the inkwell it had been resting in. 

“For the glory of the Fiery Eye!” the two mage guards said as they saluted and turned to leave.

The guild master didn’t look up or reply as they exited the room. He scowled deeply as he began writing again. When the door had swung shut and he was alone, the magically lit room was once again filled with the sound of scribbling and rustling papers. 










AFF 1









Geralhd frowned with obvious trepidation as he studied Blacknail. The hobgoblin simply smiled back in a cheerful manner. That always disarmed humans, or maybe it stunned them, Blacknail wasn’t sure. It worked. That was what mattered.

It was mid day, and people were walking past them on the street as they both stood outside a rather fancy looking inn that was located on a busy city street. It had stained glass windows and its sign bore the image of a wine bottle and a silver fork. Blacknail had his hood up so that he didn’t draw attention, and the other former members of Herad’s band had already gone inside.

“Are you sure you don’t want to join us?” Geralhd asked. “We’re planning on holding a celebratory feast, and it won’t be the same without you. You were our guide here. Let us reward you! We can rent a private room to help keep you incognito.”

“I was the leader, not just the guide,” Blacknail pointed out.

“Ah, yes. That too.”

Blacknail fel the urge to roll his eyes, but he suppressed it. That would be rude. It was amazing that humans were stupid enough to believe that he was stupid enough not to catch the nuance of their words. Did they think he was as stupid as they were? Well, whatever. Their reluctance to admit he was the best leader they had ever had wasn’t an issue right now.

“No, I got things to do, very important things. I need to visit some people I met here before. They will be very excited to see me.”

“Huh, I keep forgetting that you came here with Herad last year. But all that can wait. Think of all the food and drink you will be missing, and Khita is expecting you to join us. She wouldn’t have gone in without us otherwise.”

“I’m fine, and Khita can bother someone else for a while. I’m busy.” The young redhead had mostly recovered from the injuries she had acquired during the battle at Shelter, but the journey here had taken a lot out of her so she had gone ahead to sit down.

“There will be more meat pies than you can eat.”

Blacknail wavered. That was a tempting offer. He could eat a lot of meat pies. Maybe his plans could wait… No, he had to prioritize and resist temptation. He would just have to rob a store later tonight, when he was done.

“Sounds tasty, but I can’t. I will see you soon,” Blacknail responded before turning to leave. He had to focus on the mission. Pies were secondary to vengeance, most of the time.

“Good luck then, and try to stay out of trouble!” Geralhd called after him. The man was obviously torn between keeping an eye on Blacknail and finally getting the rest and relaxation he had been craving for months, but his impatience had won. All of the former bandits had filled their pockets with coin from the slain raiders.

“Of course! Don’t worry, I’m amazingly sneaky, and I will keep my head down,” Blacknail replied cheerfully as he turned to wave goodbye. He was going to do the exact opposite of what he had just said.

Without a shred of guilt, Blacknail turned back around and started walking away. The hobgoblin’s cloak trailed behind him as he moved down the street, and people got out of the way. He had engineered everyone’s return to Daggerpoint for a purpose, and it was time to get to it.

About three weeks had passed since the defeat of the raiders who had attacked Shelter. While Geralhd and the others had been resting and relaxing, Blacknail had hunted down the fleeing remnants of the raiders. He and his minions had stalked them through the forest and worn them down with constant surprise attacks until they were easy pickings. It had been both a necessary part of Blacknail’s grand plan and a lot of fun. There was just something so sweet and right about a good hunt with a bloody ending. It warmed Blacknail’s hobgoblin heart.

Once the last of the raiders were dead and no longer amusing, Blacknail had returned to Shelter and finally guided his companions east through the Green to Daggerpoint. The journey had taken a while but it had been mostly uneventful, until he had dropped them off at the inn behind him.

After walking past a tailor’s shop, Blacknail stopped at a corner. He brought his fingers to his mouth and whistled sharply. The shrill noise caused several people to look his way, but Blacknail ignored them, and there was soon a replying whistle from off in the distance. Blacknail headed towards the noise. He walked down the road, stepped behind a fruit booth, and slipped into an alleyway that was out of sight of everyone on the road. The side street wasn’t empty though, two dozen cloaked figures were standing in the shadows. They looked Blacknail’s way as he approached, and he saw into their shadowy hoods to get a good look at their faces. They were hobgoblins.

Blacknail quickly counted them to make sure they were all there. They were. “Good, you made it into the city without any problems.”

“Yep, it wasn’t even hard,” Scamp replied proudly. “We climbed the wall. All the humans didn’t even look our way, and they couldn’t smell us if we were sticking our fingers up their small pink noses.”

“Why do they even have noses?” another hobgoblin asked no one in particular.

Before leaving Shelter, Blacknail had assembled a group of hobgoblins and ordered them to follow in secret. Scamp hadn’t been Blacknail’s first choice for sub-leader, but Gob was needed back at their main base, and after Blacknail Scamp was actually the most experienced hobgoblin when it came to dealing with humans. He had also been raised in Herad’s camp when he was a goblin.

Blacknail took a moment to study his minions. Entering the city had affected each hobgoblin differently. The place was incredibly alien to most of them since they had been born and raised out in the forest. Some were excited while others were more nervous, but all of them seemed distracted and jumpy. Several weren’t even looking in Blacknail’s direction. They were scanning the shadows for danger or trying to peer past Blacknail to get a look at all activity on the street behind him. To remedy this, Blacknail hissed and slapped the nearest hobgoblin across the side of the head. That got their attention.

“Pay attention to me. I’m your leader,” Blacknail told his minions. “You don’t need to fear the humans here. They are blind and stupid. As long as you are with me you will be safe, so ignore all the delicious smells. I will get us all tasty food later.”

This speech reassured the hobgoblins a fair bit and they calmed down enough to give Blacknail their complete attention.

“What are we doing here, boss? Are we going to steal a whole bunch of tasty and shiny stuff?” Scamp asked.

“No! Stealing is bad,” Blacknail replied as he kicked a surprised Scamp in the shin. “We are here to learn from the humans, and then we will probably kill a whole bunch of them. If those people just happen to have lots of interesting items for us to take then that isn’t stealing because they aren’t using the stuff anymore, since they are dead.”

“That makes sense to me,” another hobgoblin agreed. A lot of other minions nodded, while Scamp winced and shook his sore leg.

“The first person we are looking for is a mage. He knows some fancy magic stuff I need.”

“So we are going to talk to him?” Herah asked as she stepped right up next to Blacknail and stared into his eyes.

Blacknail leaned away from her. He had considered leaving the female hobgoblin behind, but she was one his best disguise artists and voice mimics. She was one of the few hobgoblins who could sound completely human and she even had a blonde wig. Also, she had really wanted to come and he wasn’t sure she would have listened if he said no.

“Sort of. His name is Avorlus, and he probably won’t want to share his magic with me, so we are going to sneak into his house and ask him about it when none of his servants are around. We don’t want to meet his guards. They are tough fighters and rather unfriendly.”

Once all of his minions had fully grasped the details of the mission, Blacknail led the way deeper into the city. Avorlus lived near the center of the city where most of the big fancy houses were. To avoid unwanted attention, Blacknail chose to move through the back streets and less occupied portions of city. His cloaked hobgoblin minions trotted after him, as they moved through the shadows and grimy alleys.

It felt weird to be back in Daggerpoint. The city was the same. It was still a steaming heap of nose burning scents, both good and bad, but he was here under very different circumstance than his first visit. Then he had been one of Herad’s servants and now he was the leader of his own group. Blacknail’s right hand tightened into a fist as he suddenly felt the ache of Saeter’s absence. Soon…

The hobgoblins ran into people more than once as they stalked through the back streets, but after one glance at Blacknail’s party the people all quickly disappeared without a word. This was Daggerpoint and everyone here knew better than to go looking for trouble. It soon became obvious that there was no immediate danger of discovery so the hobgoblins began talking amongst themselves.

“There are so many humans here.” one remarked in awe.

“There is even more garbage,” another replied as he scowled down the unidentifiable substance he had just stepped in.

“Oh ya. The pinkies are everywhere. They have lots of cities all over the place. You just don’t see them out in the forest much because almost all of them are too stupid to survive there without being in a huge mob,” Blacknail replied as he kept walking.

The group passed an alley that led out into a street where several food vendors were hawking their wares. The aroma of the greasy food wafted out and enveloped the hobgoblins. Two of them instinctively moved to investigate, and Blacknail had to drag them back by their cloaks. After a couple of quick punishment swats, they kept moving.

All the hobgoblins with Blacknail had been thoroughly trained, but they were still hobgoblins. Each of them had been taught self-discipline the same way Blacknail had, through intensive and exhausting swordsmanship lessons. The only way to escape the embarrassing beatings was for them to seize control of their emotions and learn the skills necessary to fight. This self-discipline was necessary because hobgoblins were violent and anti-social by nature. In the wild, hobgoblins usually murdered each other at first sight. Those that failed to learn to suppress their urges were executed. They were too dangerous to keep around and of no use to Blacknail.

After observing his minions, Blacknail had also come to realize that a lot of the successful hobgoblins changed throughout their training. Some developed quirks such as nail-biting or making clicking noises when stressed, while others became obsessed with something. The hobgoblin walking right behind Blacknail would stop and tap his elbow every few seconds. Blacknail was glad he hadn’t picked up any weird quirks like that when Saeter had trained him.

Soon the hobgoblins reached an area where the houses were squeezed together and the back alleys came to an end, so they quickly stepped out onto a main road. It wasn’t particularly busy there, but there was more than a few people about, and Blacknail’s group drew a fair amount of attention. Cloaked figures were hardly rare in Daggerpoint, but although the hobgoblins’ features were hidden there was still something off-putting about them. Maybe it was the way they moved or maybe it was their height that raised people’s hackles. There were lots of humans as short as hobgoblins, but they didn’t usually wear dark cloaks and travel together in large groups.

Before they could draw too much attention though, Blacknail led his minions back down into an alley. No one raised an alarm behind them so they kept going. After a bit more walking they reached a tall wall that ran between two homes. Two by two, the hobgoblins jumped and grabbed the top so they could pull themselves up and over it. Once they landed on the other side they had reached the central district of the city.

The going here was tougher. It was the only place where the city watch patrolled, and although they tended to let most people enter and leave unmolested, Blacknail was sure they would be suspicious of his minions. They weren’t as good at disguising themselves as he was. The key to mimicking humans was to walk around like you were blind and about to walk right into something.

Blacknail peered out from behind the corner of a building and looked around. He didn’t see any guards so he motioned for his minions to follow. All together, they ran across the street and jumped into some shrubbery that bordered a yard. A few moments later, they leapt out and ran over to the neighbors’ place. Like this, they made their way down the street until they had arrived at their destination. In front of Blacknail was the fenced-in property where he had met Avorlus. Like before, the long path up to the house was barred by a metal gate, but now there was no huge glowering guard watching over the entrance. It looked deserted.

Carefully, Blacknail signaled for his minions to hold their position and then went to investigate. He nonchalantly walked over to the gate and looked around. No one stepped out to stop him, so he placed a hand on the iron gate. His gentle touch caused it to swing open on its well oiled hinges. Blacknail froze but no guards appeared, so he stepped inside and glanced towards the house. There were no signs of activity, so he signaled for his minions to follow him.

Once they were all past the gate, the hobgoblins crept up the pathway that led to the house. One side of it was bordered by a neatly trimmed hedge, so they kept their heads low as they moved. As they approached the door, Blacknail noticed that it had been left slightly open. He watched the windows of the huge mansion before him for any signs of movement as he stalked over to the door and carefully examined it. The lock had been busted. The wood was splintered around the metal plate and wouldn’t shut properly anymore. Blacknail grunted and peered inside. The house was dark and empty. This wasn’t going anything like he had planned. He wasn’t sure what was going on, but it didn’t seem likely that Avorlus was inside and off guard.

After his minions had joined him, Blacknail pulled the door open and they entered Avorlus’s mansion. The reception room was exactly as Blacknail remembered, except for the lack of people and the huge hole that someone had blasted through one of the interior walls.

“This is definitely the house of a mage. Something went boom,” Scamp remarked as he walked over to the hole and examined it. The edges of the rubble were burnt black.

“I don’t think Avorlus did that,” Blacknail replied as he reached Scamp’s side. “I’d bet that some other humans with magic attacked this place.”

The scent of blood was thick within the mansion and there were other signs of battle everywhere. As the hobgoblins explored the other rooms they found more blast marks, some rather extensive water damage, shards of black crystal jutting out from walls, and what looked like a bottomless pit in the middle of a hallway.

“Do you think this is supposed to be here?” a hobgoblin asked as he peered down into the pit’s black depths. The wooden floor around the hole had been cracked and torn.

“No, humans don’t like having holes in the ground in places where they walk a lot,” Blacknail replied. He knew this from experience.

More searching revealed quite a few interesting items that quickly disappeared into hobgoblin pockets but no signs of Avorlus. There were also a lot of books and bits of paper with writing on them scattered around the house, but none of the hobgoblins could read. Blacknail hoped the secrets he was looking for weren’t’ written on any of them. It hadn’t occurred to him to bring a human in case he needed someone to make sense of their scribbling.

“What do we do now, boss? I don’t think your magic man is here,” Scamp asked when they had all returned to the reception room.

Blacknail sighed and thought it over quickly. He needed to find Avorlus, even if it meant taking some risks. Hopefully the mage was still alive.

“Stay here,” Blacknail orders his minions.

The hobgoblin chieftain then went back to the largest and most luxurious bedroom they had found and started searching it. It took him a few minutes to find what he was looking for, several articles of clothing that smelled strongly of Avorlus. He grabbed them and then handed them out to his minions.

“What’s this for? I already took a nicer looking shirt. It has silver buttons!” a hobgoblin remarked as he held the brown shirt he had been given out in front of him.

“Smell it. I’m looking for the human that wore them,” Blacknail explained as the hobgoblins passed the clothes around and sniffed them. “I’m going to send a bunch of you to look for him.”

“You want us to explore the city by ourselves?”

“Yes, just stay out of trouble. Sniff around for signs of Avorlus and make sure no humans get a good look at you. If they do then kill them. Come back here when four hours pass or if you find Avorlus.”

All the hobgoblins immediately turned to leave. Most of them were grinning in excitement.

This didn’t amuse Blacknail. “No, not all of you! Some of you have to stay here with me. I will decide who gets to leave.”

There were moans from the hobgoblins as Blacknail chose three to remain behind with him. They watched the others leave with obvious disappointment. Both Herah and Scamp were selected to go hunting. Blacknail had wanted to keep them with him and out of trouble, but they were too skilled not to use.

“I’m going to find something nice to wear and maybe a new wig!” Herah exclaimed as she walked out the door.

Scamp was right behind her. “I want an entire tray of sausages, the spicy kind!”

Blacknail scowled after them. He had no way of keeping his minions on track once they left. All he could do was hope they remembered to actually look for Avorlus and not just stuff themselves silly.

“What are we going to be doing here?” one of the remaining hobgoblins asked as he gazed longingly after his more fortunate fellows.

Blacknail smiled fiercely as he answered. “We’re laying a trap. There is no way the people that attacked this place aren’t watching it. If we make some noise then someone will come to investigate and we can ask them some questions.”










AFF 2










While he was waiting for his minions to return, Blacknail began laying the groundwork for his next move. The first thing he did was explore Avorlus’ mansion more thoroughly. The huge building was full of grandly decorated rooms and lavish furniture, but that didn’t interest the hobgoblins. However, they did make some interesting discoveries. The building had a kitchen of course, and so now that most of the others had left, Blacknail and the remaining hobgoblins raided it for snacks. Since it didn’t seem like anyone had been around for a few days, most of the food was a little stale, but that didn’t matter too much to the hobgoblins. A little age made most human foods taste better anyway. Mold added both color and flavor.

After eating their way through the cabinets, the searchers moved on to examine and loot the rest of the place. One of them stumbled upon a hidden doorway in a wall. It opened to reveal a stairway going down, so the searcher immediately ran to fetch Blacknail.

“Where do you think it goes?” he asked when everyone had gathered to study the stairway.

“To a place that the mage wanted hidden, a place where he keeps his most prized possessions,” Blacknail replied.

“A hidden food store?” the hobgoblin guessed as he leaned forward and peered eagerly down the passage.

Blacknail shook his head. “No, a mage values his magic more than anything else.”

After a brief search for a torch to light the way, Blacknail led the way down the stairs. There were light crystals on the walls but none of the hobgoblins could activate them, since they didn’t have mage blood. Scamp could have done it, so Blacknail sort of regretted sending him away. However, on the other hand, if there was any explosive magic down here then Blacknail didn’t want Scamp anywhere near it.

Upon reaching the bottom of the stairs, the hobgoblins found themselves in a fair sized room with rough stone walls. Tables, shelves, and complex looking contraptions filled the space. Light from the torch Blacknail was holding shone out into the room but it wasn’t strong enough to dispel most of the shadows that filled the chamber’s corners. Most evidently of all though, everything reeked of human blood. The smell was practically suffocating.

“Ew, it smells like a pinky exploded down here,” a hobgoblin remarked as his lips curled up in disgust.

“What are those metal cages for?” another minion asked as he stepped up to examine one of the objects in question. There were three empty cages with iron bars up against the nearest wall. They were more than large enough to hold people and piles of chains lay inside them.

Blacknail pinched his nose close. “They are for holding people. You can smell it.”

“Oh, we should get one for our base. They seem super useful!”

“Maybe later,” Blacknail replied absently as he went to investigate a shelf.

The tall wooden shelf contained a lot of the items that Blacknail had come to associate with mages, such as glass bottles and delicate looking metal tools. All the beakers and vials were empty, though. Judging from all the stained glass shards on the ground, it looked like someone had hastily swept the one that had been full of liquid off the shelf and onto the ground. None of the remaining items were of any use to Blacknail so he moved on.

The table off to one side looked like it had once been covered in piles of papers and books, but now there was only a black stain, fragments of burnt paper, and a small pile of ashes atop it.

“This bed isn’t very comfortable,” a hobgoblin remarked.

Blacknail looked over to see that the speaker was lying down on a wooden platform in the middle of the room. It was slightly slanted and looked to be adjustable. It also had several straps on its surface, and next to it was a little table that held various small knives, a pair of scissors, and a large saw with jagged teeth.

“That’s because no one lays down on it by choice,” Blacknail replied. “It’s for butchering people.”

The hobgoblin quickly rolled to his feet and backed away from the table. “I didn’t think humans ate other humans. Even we don’t eat humans.”

“The meat and blood aren’t for eating. They are for the mage’s experiments.”

“Magic sounds very icky.”

“It is, when it’s not exploding,” Blacknail replied as it dawned on him that he had no idea what the Elixir he drank was actually made out of. It was probably best not to think about it.

Further exploration of the room failed to yield any useful discoveries. All the beakers were broken or empty, and there were no mana crystals lying around. There also wasn’t a map to Avorlus’ location sitting out anywhere, which would have been useful. Disappointed, Blacknail headed back up the stairs and into the main part of the mansion. All the other hobgoblins were forced to follow him since he was the one holding the torch.

The entire mansion had had been completely searched now that the hidden basement had been explored, and Blacknail hadn’t found any clues to Avorlus’ location. That meant he had to go back to his first plan and prepare an ambush.

Blacknail had been doing a lot of travelling lately, so he’d had plenty of time to think about a pet project of his, building a better human trap. Now was his opportunity to put his ideas into action. What fun. He couldn’t wait to see the look on his preys' faces when the trap was sprung! Right away, Blacknail went about gathering up supplies and materials. He was going to need a lot of rope, some bait, and a large frying pan.

Humming with excitement, Blacknail went to work. Once he had the tools he needed, he looked around for the best spot to put his ingenious design together. The key was to think like a human so that you could predict exactly what they were going to do. You had to know what they liked, what they couldn’t resist, what they hated, and what they feared. Although, it was almost more useful to know what they didn’t fear, since humans seemed terrified of basically everything. Not like hobgoblins, which were only afraid of things that made sense, like… giant green things with teeth. There were just an uncomfortably large amount of those in the North.

“Why are you putting those shiny bits on the ground?” one of the hobgoblins asked as Blacknail was working.

“They are bait. The humans will see them sparkle and investigate,” Blacknail explained as he did his best human voice. “They will be like, look silver coins! They are super useful if I want to do pointless human things. I can never have enough money, so I should pick them up and not think at all about how suspicious they are.”

“Is that what a human would really say?”

“It is what they will think as they pick the coins up.”

“That sounds really dumb, but then again they are very shiny. Can I have one?”

“No, these are mine. Get your own.”

Another hobgoblin walked over. “Why don’t we just sneak up and grab them when they show up?”

Blacknail glowered at his minion. “This will be safer and… more fun. Just shut your jaw and do as I say. We are doing it my way. I’m the leader.”

When the trap had been set up, Blacknail ordered one of his minions to pull his hood up and go hang around outside the front gate of the complex. He was to stay by the gate and within sight of the street so that he would attract attention, but he was ordered to disappear back inside if the city guard showed up or anyone tried to approach him. Another hobgoblin was to watch from concealment and report everything that happened. Nothing was likely to happen right away, so Blacknail went to stuff his face and take a nap while he waited. All this planning had made him hungry and the great big bed in Avorlus’ room was both comfy and empty.

Blacknail hadn’t quite drifted off yet when he heard the sound of someone approaching. He was curled up atop a pile of blankets and feeling quite comfortable, but he fought off his drowsiness and looked up towards the source of the noise. It was one of his hobgoblin minions, which meant that this probably wasn’t an attempt on his life. Although, Blacknail wasn’t completely sure since hobgoblins were so deceitful and vicious, except for himself. He was loyal and honest at all times. Even when he lied he was being honest in spirit, since it was probably for their own good. He was caring like that.

“A stranger has come,” the hobgoblin announced when Blacknail looked his way.

A human had arrived to test the trap! Blacknail immediately jumped up and motioned for his minion to lead the way. The hobgoblin nodded and together they raced across the mansion to one of the back doors. They then slipped outside and stalked through the bushes until they were looking out at the front entrance from a concealed position behind a tree.

At first Blacknail didn’t see anyone, but then he saw motion along the path from the front gate. Someone was creeping carefully along the other side of the hedge, where it would be harder to see them from the house. It was a figure in a long brown cloak. They weren’t doing a very good job of moving stealthily, but their jerky and tense movements certainly made them look like they were trying hard at it.

From his hiding spot, Blacknail watched the figure get closer with building excitement. He smiled as the man got close enough for him to get a good look at. It was definitely an unfamiliar human! Under his hood, he had dark eyes that made him look tired and an unshaven face. The man crouched at the edge of the hedge and leaned out to look around. He scanned the front of the house and the nearby greenery, but his eyes slipped right past Blacknail and the hobgoblin beside him. The man obviously wasn’t much of a tracker or hunter.

When he didn’t see anyone else around, the intruder got up and hurried over to the front door. As he was crossing the grounds, he happened to look over to one side and see something on the ground. He stopped and took a quick second to pick up the item that had caught his attention. It was silver coin. Blacknail giggled quietly to himself from his hiding place.

Just as he was about to start moving again, the intruder saw another coin in the grass and hesitated. A moment later, he shuffled over to pick up this coin as well. That was when he noticed the open pouch of coins next to a nearby tree. The bag was open so that the coins were clearly visible.

The man hesitated again. He looked confused and hesitant as he turned to scan his surroundings, but once again he didn’t see anything dangerous, so he shrugged and slipped the coin he was holding into one of his pockets as he moved towards the tree. He took several steps and then his boot hit something. There was a crack as a twig snapped somewhere nearby. The man flinched and stood up straight to look around again, but he didn’t see the trip wire he had just set off. The trap was in motion, and a moment later a dark object descended from the leafy branches hanging overhead. The frying pan smashed into the top of the intruder’s head. There was a thud and a clank as the iron skillet bounced off bone. The man swayed, regained his balance, and then crumpled bonelessly onto the ground like an empty set of clothes.

“Huh, it worked,” the hobgoblin next to Blacknail muttered in surprise.

“Ha, it worked!” Blacknail shouted excitedly as he burst from concealment.

The two hobgoblins then ran over to examine the fallen human. They were quickly joined by several other hobgoblins that had been hiding and watching.

“Hmmm, very nice. Good timing. It was a little boring, though. I need to make the next one have more whiz and crack. Some boom wouldn’t hurt,” Blacknail mused to himself as he examined the remains of the trap. “Maybe I can do something with forks...”

“Now what?” a minion asked.

“We bring him inside, put him somewhere nice and comfy, and then threaten to cut him into pieces until he tells me what I want to know.”

“What if he doesn’t know anything?”

“Then at least I will have fun.”

At Blacknail’s command, two hobgoblins dragged the unconscious man inside the mansion and plopped him into one of the chairs there. Hobgoblins then tied him to the back of the chair with a loop of rope, while Blacknail grabbed another chair and sat down in front of the captive. When a slap failed to wake the man up, a minion went to fetch a bucket of water. Blacknail made a mental note to maybe use a smaller frying pan next time.

“Ah, gods above!” the man screamed as cold water splashed across his face and soaked into his clothes. He jerked forward but the rope held him down, and his eyes shot wide open but they didn’t focus on anything for a few moments. However, when the captive did get a good look at the person seated in front of him his eyes went even wider than before. He gasped and looked terrified out of his mind.

Blacknail just smiled and leaned forward so he could meet the man’s eyes. “Hello!”

The captive’s mouth fell open and he stared back uncomprehendingly. “What?”

“I’m the one who is going to be asking the questions,” Blacknail replied. “You just need to worry about answering them.”

“Hells, what are you?” the man gasped in terror.

“What did I just say?” Blacknail replied as he glowered in annoyance. He was really getting sick of how stupid people could be. Maybe a few pokes with a knife would help this human learn.

“Are you a demon? Am I dead?”

Blacknail paused and took a moment to think. “Er, yes… Yes, you are. I’m a demon and this is the hells, so there is no point in not answering all my questions.”

“Oh, gods. No, I can’t believe it. I prayed to Cor-Dius constantly and tried not to commit too many crimes a day! How could this happen to me?”

“Believe it. Now answer my questions,” Blacknail hissed as he raised a dagger threateningly. That seemed like fairly demon-like behavior to him.

The man immediately began spilling his guts. In fact, he was talking way too much. Blacknail didn’t really care about his reasons for sleeping with his neighbor’s wife or that time he had stolen his brother’s golden ring and sold it.

“Focus on the stuff that happened right before you… um died,” Blacknail told him.

The frantic man quickly began explaining about how he’d been hired to watch the house for signs of activity by a group of men who had assaulted it a few days earlier.

“Who where they?”

“They didn’t tell me, foul one. I was just paid to help them find the place, but they must have been from a mage guild. They were too organized and packing too much magic for them to be anyone else. I have no idea which one. Please don’t devour my soul.”

Blacknail really didn’t like being called foul by a smelly human, but that wasn’t important right now. He had heard of the mage guilds many times, although he knew little about them, except they were a group of powerful mages. Mahedium had been on the run from them, and now it seemed like they were after Avorlus.

“What did they want with Avorlus?” Blacknail asked his mortally confused captive.

“I don’t know, great defiler. I just know they wanted him alive.”

That was interesting, and good news. It meant there was a solid chance Avorlus was still alive. Blacknail asked the man a few more questions but didn’t get any more interesting information out of him, except for the location of what the captive swore was the best cheese shop in the city. Since the man was no longer of any use, Blacknail got up, walked around, and cut his throat from behind. He did it without warning so that the man barely had time to react. One moment he was whining about how he’d been forced to kill that dog because it wouldn’t shut up, and then the next he was choking on his own blood. The frothy gurgling was much more pleasant to listen to.

Alive, the man would undoubtedly have tried to warn his companions about the hobgoblins’ presence, and Blacknail had no way of stopping him. Two hobgoblins then carried the man’s body over to the deep pit in the hallway and dropped it down into the dark. Blacknail didn’t want to leave Avorlus’ house a mess. He was a guest here after all.

Before Blacknail could wander back to the bedroom and start napping again, a hobgoblin ran over with news.

“One of the scouts has returned, boss,” the excited minion reported. “He found the mage you are looking for, but so have the people that attacked this place. It looks like there is about to be a big fight.”









AFF 3














The four hours Blacknail had given his scouts were almost up, and it was time for them to return from their hunt, so Blacknail decided to wait a few minutes before heading off to track down Avorlus. The scout that had found him needed a moment to catch his breath anyway, and some of the minions that had stayed at the mansion had wandered off and needed to be rounded up.

After stretching and yawning to shake off the effects of his nap, Blacknail sent out word for everyone to meet at the main foyer. There, they began preparing to head out, while they waited for the laggards to arrive. Equipment needed to be sorted, disguises had to be fixed, and loot had to be stashed away.

It didn’t take long for the scouts that had been sent out to start coming back. The first hobgoblin that arrived walked through the front door and reported that he hadn’t found anything of interest. However, Blacknail couldn’t help but notice that his clothes were absolutely covered in blood that smelled suspiciously human.

“What happened to you?” Blacknail asked.

“I tripped,” the hobgoblin replied meekly as he turned to avoid meeting Blacknail’s eyes.

“Into a giant puddle of human blood?”

“Er… yes. That.”

Before Blacknail could question him more – like about how the puddle had gotten there in the first place - he was distracted by the arrival of another scout. This one had something sitting on its shoulders. It was a human, a very small one.

“Weeee,” the little brown haired child laughed as he threw his hand up into the air. He was dressed in fine looking clothes and didn’t seem put off by the presence of all the hobgoblins at all, least of all the one he was riding.

Blacknail stared. “What is that?”

“I found it behind a house. Can I keep it?”

“Green men!” the child giggled as it stuck its tongue out at Blacknail.

“No, you can’t keep it. I already have to deal with too many small useless critters, and that thing can’t even feed itself. It could take over a year to properly train it!” Blacknail growled angrily. He had no idea how long it took human children to grow up, or how old this child was. He just knew they matured slower than goblins, so it took around six years, maybe?

“I know it’s pink and ugly, but look at its chubby face and big cute eyes! Don’t you just want to give it treats and pat its head?” the hobgoblin explained as he set the child down.

“No, take it back, right now!”

“Angry green man,” the child laughed.

“I promise to feed it and train it to do chores.”

“No! I don’t have time for this. Go return it. You can catch up to us later.”

“Aww,” the hobgoblin scout replied sadly as he turned to leave the mansion and do as he was told.

The arrival of Herah and Scamp was quite plain by comparison. They were merely pushing a wheelbarrow full of junk and food between them.

“Did you even look for the mage?” Blacknail asked them. He was not amused. It seemed like most his scouts had simply been slaking off. It was a miracle that one of them had actually stumbled onto Avorlus’ path.

“Sure, he wasn’t in any of the sausage shops we went to,” Scamp replied as he stopped pushing the wheelbarrow and let go of it.

“Why would he be in a sausage shop?”

“That’s where I would be.”

Blacknail glared at Scamp. Once they got out of this city, the hobgoblin was going to be given an endless stream of chores to do, or get stabbed to death. Either one would be fine.

“I looked for the mage. I’d do anything for you,” Herah interjected as she approached.

“As you should. I’m the leader,” Blacknail replied absently as he stepped out of the way of her attempt to lean against him. At this point, it was second nature to him.

“I also have cheese!” Herah said as she presented him with a small bundle wrapped in cloth.

Blacknail quickly snatched the present from her and sniffed it. It was cheese, alright. It wasn’t the best type, but it was far from the worst as well.

“You’re my new favorite,” Blacknail told her approvingly.

“Does that mean I get a hug?”

“No, not at all,” Blacknail replied as he eyed her suspiciously. He knew she wanted to mate with him, but why did she want to hug him? Was she trying to trick him somehow?

When everyone had gathered and gotten ready, the scout who had located Avorlus led the way back out into the city. The hobgoblins quickly left the central district and made their way into the outer parts of Daggerpoint, where everything was dirtier and more cramped. It was beginning to get dark out as the day grew old, and the sun was now touching the western horizon. The streets had become less crowded as shops closed and the shadows had lengthened. This made it easier for Blacknail’s party to move through Daggerpoint without drawing too much attention. They passed through the residential area, walked past streets full of shops, and exited an alley to emerge among rows of derelict-looking warehouses. There was no one in sight but the occasional rustle or clank could be heard from down a dark alley. It was probably just rats, or orphans. They were pretty much the same thing anyway.

“That’s the place there,” the hobgoblin scout said as he peered out from behind the corner of a building and pointed to a warehouse.

Blacknail joined him and leaned around the corner as well. All the other hobgoblins were behind him. “You followed the scent here?”

“I found the mage’s trail in a nearby alley and it led me here, boss. There are men guarding the entrances so I went back to get you.”

“And the enemy?”

“The hunters. They are in the buildings around us. The watch and wait. For what, I don’t know.”

“They probably want to move in darkness. Even in Daggerpoint people would notice a small battle and come see what was happening,” Blacknail mused to himself as he scanned the nearby windows for signs of watchers.

“What do you want to do, boss?” Scamp asked.

“We will sneak in and try to find Avorlus. There is no way some lazy city humans will see us,” Blacknail answered haughtily as he turned to face his minions and rubbed his hands together in glee. This shouldn’t be too hard.

Before anyone could reply, there was a loud boom. The orange light of untamed flames shredded the nearby shadows. The unmistakable crack and thud of flying masonry filled the air and all the hobgoblins flinched. One of the walls of Avorlus’ hideout had just exploded, and there was a cacophony of excited shouts from within.

Blacknail leaned back around the corner and frowned in annoyance. As he watched, a squad of armored human warriors stormed out of a door across the street and ran toward the action. Their leader was very clearly holding a mage staff, and as soon as they had disappeared into a side street there was another explosion.

“Or we could wait here and see what happens,” Blacknail told his minions. This didn’t seem like a situation he wanted to get involved in.

“Great idea, boss!” Scamp agreed as the other hobgoblins nodded.

“You are so wise,” Herah added fawningly as she fluttered her eyelashes his way.

There was another explosion, and then a body flew out of a second-story window and smacked into the street below. It slid briefly across the cobblestones before coming to a stop. A few moments later, a new squad of armored soldiers marched out of an alley and took up position in front of the door of Avorlus’ warehouse. They ignored the corpse that lay by their feet.

“Wow, the humans in this city sure have a lot of fun,” Scamp remarked in surprise.

Flames were now leaping out of some of the first story windows. A burning man threw himself out of one of them and began thrashing around on the ground. He screamed for a few seconds before one of the soldiers walked over and silenced him with a stab of his sword.

Several minutes passed as the hobgoblins in the shadows watched the building burn. Blacknail took the time to try and come up with a new plan, but nothing came to mind that didn’t end with him staring down the business end of a mage’s staff. Then, there was a crash, and several figures stepped out of the warehouse’s front door. By the light of the fire, they were recognizable as the attacking soldiers that had entered the warehouse before. Their leader with the mage staff was still with them. More importantly, two of soldiers were carrying a limb body between them. Blacknail studied the figure and saw the familiar figure of a white-haired old man. It was Avorlus!

“That’s him, our quarry,” Blacknail hissed as he pointed at the unconscious mage.

“It seems like these humans got him first,” Scamp replied.

“Too bad, let’s go home!” another hobgoblin added. He seemed a little frightened by all the mayhem, so Blacknail stomped on his foot and gave him a hard stare to remind him of who he should really be afraid of.

The two groups of soldiers had now merged and Avorlus was right in the very middle of them. Suddenly, two men in the dark uniforms of Avorlus’ bodyguards rushed out of the front door of the warehouse. It wasn’t clear if they were chasing after their master or just trying to escape the flames. They had swords in hand, and like all of the rogue mage’s men, they were heavy set and tough looking. Avorlus also had a habit of making his guards into Vessels, since that was his magical specialty.

The leader of the soldiers saw the guards emerge from the building, and he raised his staff. As soon as it was pointed in their direction, a blast of force shot out and slammed into the closest guard. There was a crash as he was sent flying back through the door and into the building. Before the other bodyguard could even react, a second blast smashed into him. He was also blown backwards, but instead of going back through the door, there was a loud splat as he hit the wall.

The leader of the attackers then studied the building for a few seconds, before flipping his staff around. He fiddled with the knobs on the side, and then he pointed it back at the building. A heavy boom shook the air as a green ball of energy of slammed into the building. It flew in through a window and exploded within the building, causing the earth to shake slightly. However, the mage didn’t stop there. He fired three more times. The walls of the building began warping and then the entire warehouse collapsed into a pile of burning rubble. A second mage with a staff then stepped forward and began spraying the remains with a stream of water. The water hissed and steamed as it hit the flames and hot stones. It didn’t take long for all the visible fires to be put out.

“Let’s not fight them,” Herah suggested. She sounded impressed, and Blacknail didn’t blame her. This was easily one of the greatest displays of magic he had ever seen. Usually mages held back more.

With the building completely destroyed, the soldiers started marching away down the street. They moved quickly, as if they were in a hurry, and Blacknail could guess why. They hadn’t exactly been subtle during their attack. Even this late, people would be coming to investigate all the noise they had just made. There were probably already some unwanted eyes around.

“We are following them. Be sneaky and stay out of sight,” Blacknail hissed at his minions as he stepped out on the street and began stalking after the soldiers.

“You don’t have to tell me that,” a hobgoblin whispered as he began tiptoeing after Blacknail. “I’m going to be sneakier than ever, so I don’t end up going splat against a wall.”

The other hobgoblins then followed, if somewhat reluctantly. It was night now, and a slim crescent moon was visible in the sky overhead. Without the firelight, it was dark and hard to see out, although there were still some light streaming from windows. Daggerpoint was a large city, and some streets were lit and still occupied, but the soldiers avoided them.

The rooftops started pressing closer together as the group Blacknail was following headed into a lower end residential distract. To get a better view, Blacknail jumped onto a pile of barrels and climbed up the side of a building. He pulled himself onto the clay tile roof and then continued after his prey. The soldiers travelled down several dark streets and more than a few tight alleyways, as Blacknail stalked them from above. The soldiers had a rear guard that was watching their retreat, but none of them looked up for pursuers, which was a common human failing.

As his minions followed below, Blacknail leaped from one roof to another. He landed softly with almost no noise, and then he scrambled after his quarry. He caught up to them and stopped to watch from behind a chimney as they suddenly came to a stop outside a large shop. It was a large two story building along a fairly prosperous-looking street, although there was no one out at this time of night. The door of the shop was opened by someone within and then the soldiers hurried inside with Avorlus.

Below Blacknail, his hobgoblin minions arrived and took up position in the shadows of a tight alleyway. They waited for his orders as he studied the building. Inside, a light flared into existence, but the windows were shuttered so nothing was visible inside. After a few moments of thinking, Blacknail scrambled down the side of the building to join his minions in the alleyway.

“What now, boss?” Scamp whispered.

“Now we prepare to move,” Blacknail replied quietly. “These humans are very organized and this is their base. There will be sentries all around here. Check the nearby buildings and streets. I want every one of them found and watched.”

“Can we kill them?” another hobgoblin asked eagerly.

“Not yet,” Blacknail answered. This didn’t please many of his minions, but they knew better than to complain.

“It’s a night hunt,” Herah remarked as she smiled. She didn’t seem too disappointed.

“Yes, and it will be easy. Humans can barely function in the dark,” Scamp bragged.

As they broke up into smaller groups and headed out, the hobgoblins began betting with each other about who would find the most sentries. They were far more eager for action now that there was little chance of a face-to-face fight breaking out, and hobgoblins loved to hunt, even when it didn’t immediately end in blood.

Blacknail left two minions behind to watch the front door and then took another with him as he circled around to find the back entrance. If anyone left the shop he wanted to make absolutely sure he knew about it. Once he’d found a comfortable spot on a nearby rooftop to watch from, he settled in to wait. Now was not the time to act. It was best to let the humans relax their guard, and then strike when they were unprepared. The guild wanted Avorlus alive, and he had been unconscious when he’d been captured, so that meant Blacknail had time.

Midnight came and went as Blacknail waited with the patient focus of a predator. The night grew pitch black and then began to lighten, as hobgoblins reported in to their leader and then went back out to scout or watch their quarry. Several enemy sentries had indeed been found and easily evaded. Several humans slipped into and out of the shop, but none of them were Avorlus. As the very first rays of the sun began to shine out from behind the horizon, Blacknail decided it was time to move.

“Now, tell the others to take out all the sentries and then report back here,” he told two of his minions that were behind him. They nodded and ran off to spread the word.

Soon, grinning hobgoblins began arriving as Blacknail’s forces gathered. Several of them already smelled of blood from taking out the enemy sentries.

“All the watching humans are dead?” Blacknail asked.

“Except the two in the shop that are watching the streets from windows,” Scamp replied.

“Then we take them out now, at the same time I go in to find Avorlus.”

“Whatever you want, boss.”

“Exactly,” Blacknail hissed in reply. “I’m the leader, and if you follow my orders then we will get what we came for without a problem.”

At Blacknail’s command, Scamp led a small group of hobgoblins over to scale the front of the building and take out the sentry that was posted at the window there. Blacknail took three helpers and went to do the same to the sentry at the side window. After descending to the ground, he crept through the shadows and towards the shop. When he got to the wall, he reached up and began scaling it by grabbing the rough stonework. Soon, he was dangling just beneath the windowsill. He waited there until he heard a quiet whistle from below. That was the signal. The sentry was alone and had turned away from the window. Grinning, Blacknail reached up and then pulled himself up onto the window. His strong, light, and agile body allowed him to move with both ease and in complete silence.

There was a small sitting room in front of Blacknail. It was barely lit by a single small lamp off in a far corner. The sentry was an armored soldier and had walked away from the window so he could grab a bite of food from a tray on a table off to one side. There was only about seven feet between him and Blacknail, and he seemed completely unaware of the fact that he wasn’t alone anymore. In one smooth motion, Blacknail drew a long dagger and leapt towards the man’s back. He sailed through the air like an errant shadow, and as he landed on his target, he pulled the man’s head back and reached around to cut his throat. The dagger sliced effortlessly through the flesh, and then Blacknail pulled the man down to the ground and stabbed him under the ribs for good measure. Blood spilled out of the wounds as Blacknail pinned the sentry against the floor. He died a few seconds later without ever managing to put up a fight, or even get a look at his attacker.

His prey slain, Blacknail stood back up and grinned viciously at nothing in particular. He was practically vibrating with bloodlust, but he suppressed it as he walked over to the window and signaled for his minions to climb up. They were in. Now they just needed to find Avorlus without alerting the mages.










AFF 4












After taking a second to listen and make sure that no one was hanging out in the hallway, Blacknail crept out of the room where he had just killed the sentry. Two hobgoblin minions followed after him, and one remained behind to serve as a lookout. He had been ordered to imitate the sentry if anyone came looking, kill any humans that weren’t fooled, and whistle sharply if he was found out. That would be Blacknail’s cue to break for the closest exit.

Having followed the guild soldiers that had abducted him, Blacknail knew that Avorlus was somewhere in this building, and he needed to find the mage without being detected by those same soldiers. Blacknail doubted he could fight his way to the mage. There were dozens of heavily armed human soldiers inside and at least two combat mages as well. Blacknail had just seen a demonstration of the firepower those combat mages wielded, and he had no desire to go head to head with them. On top of their unbelievable power, mages could be very tricky. They didn’t play by the same rules as other people, and Blacknail had no idea what the rules of magic were. It might be a good idea to learn sometime. He would have to remember to ask.

A long carpet stretched down the hallway and muffled the sound of the hobgoblins' steps. One end of the hallway ended at a door, and at the other end was a staircase that led down. Blacknail headed for the stairs. As he walked, he heard voices from behind the closed door of one of the adjacent rooms.

“With the target captured we should head back at first light,” a man said.

“It might be better to interrogate him here,” someone else replied.

Blacknail grinned in relief as he walked past the door. It sounded like Avorlus was still alive. He had been fairly sure that the guild wouldn’t kill him yet, but not completely certain. Humans could be unpredictable in their stupidity.

When he reached the stairs, Blacknail took a moment to sniff around. He didn’t detect any signs of Avorlus, and this seemed like the only way up to the second floor. That meant that Avorlus wasn’t up here. Cautiously, Blacknail leaned over and peaked at the floor below. It was another empty hallway, although this one was much better lit, so with his minions in tow, Blacknail got up and carefully crept down the stairs. The steps creaked a bit, but no one showed up to check out the noise.

The hallway at the bottom branched off in several direction. Blacknail walked forward a bit and peered down a side passage. He was immediately greeted by the sight of the front door. Two enemy soldiers in chainmail were guarding it. Since there was nothing for him there, Blacknail waited until he was sure they were both looking away, and then he and his followers slipped past the doorway and further down the hallway. The scent of Avorlus reached Blacknail’s nose as he moved deeper into the building. The rogue mage had been brought in through the front door and then been carried this way.

There was a door to Blacknail’s right, and it was hanging slightly open. A quick look inside revealed a large dark room that was full of people. Blacknail had found most of the soldiers, but they weren’t currently a threat. Most of them looked to be asleep on makeshift hammocks or the floor. The room was obviously an impromptu barracks and judging by the smell Avorlus wasn’t inside. Moving on, the hobgoblins passed several closed doors, but none of them were the way Avorlus had gone.

Suddenly, Blacknail heard the creak of floorboards from behind him. He froze. Someone was about to walk out into the hallway, and there was no way he would miss the hobgoblins there. Quickly, Blacknail tested the closest door. It opened to reveal a linen closet. Blacknail wasted no time, and jumped inside. His two minions were right behind him, and the door snapped shut after them. No one moved or spoke for several long moments as the hobgoblins waited in the darkness of the closet for the sound of footsteps to pass, but then Blacknail spoke up.

“Get your foot away from my nose. You’re crushing it,” he hissed as he stared at the offending hobgoblin’s boot, or at least he was fairly sure that it was a boot that was pressed up against his face. It was difficult to see in the gloom.

The closet was rather small and the hobgoblins had been in a hurry when they had jumped inside, so they had ended up bunched together in a messy ball of awkwardly placed limbs.

There was a grunt of exertion as someone tried to wiggle around, but then it stopped. “Sorry, boss. I can’t move.”

Blacknail hissed and tried to get free but one of his arms was jammed between someone’s legs and both his feet were immobile as well.

“I’m stuck too,” the other minion added unhelpfully.

Annoyed, Blacknail kicked someone in the stomach. He wasn’t sure who, but both his minions deserved it so it didn’t really matter. A few moments later, and after a bit of trial and error, the hobgoblins managed to roll themselves out of the closet by shifting their weight all at once. They fell apart once they were free, and Blacknail climbed to his feet. He really wanted to smack his stupid minions around, but now wasn’t the time. He needed their help to complete the mission. After that he could smack all he wanted.

A turn in the hallway revealed another staircase that led downward. A quick sniff around proved that Avorlus had definitely been carried down them, so Blacknail followed after him. These stairs were less creaky, which was good because the basement wasn’t empty. A quick glance around revealed that there were two guards standing next to a door across the room.

Blacknail studied the two soldiers carefully for a few seconds, and then when he was sure they weren’t looking his way, he dropped down the stairs then rolled to the side in one smooth motion. The basement room below was full of crates and barrels, and Blacknail came to stop behind a trio of barrels that concealed him from the guards’ view. The entire chamber was obviously used for storage. It was lit by a series of oil lamps on the walls, but the room was far from bright. The piles of materials cast shadows everywhere, and there was a draft in the room that was causing some of the lamps to flicker ever so slightly.

Blacknail was quickly joined by his two followers, as they copied the maneuver he had used to descend the stairs. One of the hobgoblins opened his mouth to say something, but Blacknail shushed him. The storage room had a stone floor and stone walls, so echoes could be unpredictable and any speech might alert the guards no matter how quiet it was. Blacknail signaled to his minions using hand gestures that he wanted them to follow and then he started moving. He dashed out from behind the barrels and over to a pile of crates. From there, he crawled across the ground until he reached another bunch of barrels, and then he peeked out to look around. The guards didn’t react at all. They hadn’t seen him or heard anything suspicious yet.

There was a problem, though. The doorway the soldiers were guarding had a large open space around it, and there was no way the guards wouldn’t see anyone approaching. Thus, a more complex plan was needed. Blacknail withdrew a pair of small round stones from a pouch on his waist. He then explained the general outline of his plan to his minions using hand signals. Once they got the idea, Blacknail tossed a rock. It flew close to the ground before hitting a crate on the far side of the room. There was a thud as it bounced off the wood and then clattered noisily against the stones of the floor.

“What was that?” one of the guards asked as he looked over towards the noise.

The other man shrugged. “It was probably a rat or something. I’m sure there are heaps of the nasty beasts in this disgusting excuse for a city. I can’t wait to leave this crap hole behind.”

“I’m going to check it out.”

“Why? We’re not here to protect some merchant’s stock from vermin. Our orders are too make sure the prisoner doesn’t go anywhere.”

“I know, but I still want to check it out. The rats get huge in these parts, and it might be something else,” the first guard said as he stared suspiciously at the source of the noise.

“Like what, a goblin? I think the rat would be more dangerous.”

“I won’t know until I look, but with a blood mage having been loose in this city for years I don’t want to take any chances.”

This argument seemed to resonate with the second guard. He grimaced sourly. “Gods forsaken blood mages. We should have already killed this one. They are vile.”

“Not our call,” the first man replied as he walked carefully away from the door and toward the pile of crates the noise had come from. He had a wary hand placed on the sword hilt at his waist.

His companion watched him move forward, and thus they were both looking directly away from the hobgoblin’s position. Blacknail flashed his minions the go signal and then launched himself into action. He jumped over the crates he was hiding behind and when his boots hit the basement floor he was already sprinting forward. As Blacknail dashed towards the guard at the door, he pulled his sword loose.

Both men were still looking the other way so they saw nothing, but the guard by the door heard something and turned to look Blacknail’s way. He froze for a second at the sight of three running hobgoblins and didn’t seem to know what to do, as if he doubted his eyes. A brief instant later, he opened his mouth to shout something, but Blacknail had already closed the distance between them. His sword sliced through the air and towards his target’s neck.

“What?” The guard gasped as he managed to jump backwards out of the way of the attack. However, the hurried action left him off balance.

Blacknail adjusted his stance and turned his slash into a thrust. The tip of his blade cut into the man’s throat and silenced him. However, the brief scuffle had made more than enough noise to draw the attention of the second guard. He turned to see what was going on, only to be tackled by the other two hobgoblins. Their momentum sent him sprawling over sideways, and there was a loud crack as his helmeted head smacked against the stone floor. The blow stunned the guard for a moment, and that was all the time the hobgoblins needed. Knives appeared in their hands and almost instantly sank deep into his exposed flesh. He was dead within seconds, without having managed to shout or give any warning.

The man Blacknail had stabbed in the neck was also no longer among the living. Blood was slowly seeping out of the guards’ bodies as Blacknail walked over the corpse in front of him and inspected the door. It was a thick wooden barrier with a cast iron doorknob and keyhole. He turned the handle, but it didn’t budge. It was locked.

“Look for a key,” he ordered his minions as he turned to look at them.

Almost immediately one of the hobgoblins held up a thick iron key and gave Blacknail a happy grin. Since they had started looting the fallen guard’s body the second it had hit the floor it hadn’t taken them long to find it. Blacknail took the key and inserted it into the lock.

“Watch this carefully. It is very difficult and you may need to explain it to the others,” he explained as he showed the watching hobgoblins how to unlock a door.

“And that means it will open now?” one of the minions asked as the lock clicked.

Blacknail turned the handle again and pushed the door open ever so slightly before responding. “Yes, but you need the right key. They are not all the same.”

A push caused the door to swing fully open, and the hobgoblins were greeted by the sight of a small windowless room that had been completely dark until the door had been opened. In the center of the room was a small table that was just big enough to sit two people, and there were in fact two chairs on opposite sides of it, and in one of those chairs was Avorlus. The mage was tied to the back of the seat and there was a cloth gag stuffed into his mouth. Blacknail could hear the mage breathing ever so quietly but he didn’t move or look up at the intrusion into his chamber. He seemed to still be unconscious.

“This human smells like the person we are looking for,” one of the minions remarked as they wall walked into the room.

“It’s him. He is the mage I’m hunting,” Blacknail answered as he smirked triumphantly. He had found the maker of Elixirs. Now he just had to get out of here with him intact.

At Blacknail’s order, one hobgoblin grabbed Avorlus’ feet and the other grabbed his torso. They then flipped him into their shoulders where they could carry him with ease. The jostling failed to wake him up, but there didn’t seem to be anything wrong with him.

“Can we leave now?” one of the hobgoblins asked.

“Yes, let’s do that,” Blacknail replied. He didn’t feel the need to stick around either.

With Blacknail in the lead and their cargo safely acquired, the hobgoblins hurried back out of the side room and then over to the stairs. Blacknail went up first to make sure the hallway was empty, and then they rushed through the building and upstairs.

“Who is that? I hear a lot of movement,” one of the guards at the entrance asked after the hobgoblins had run past.

The hobgoblins ignored them as they raced through the upstairs hallway to the room where they had entered. The sentry they had left behind was waiting for them there, and the shop was coming alive behind them. They didn’t have much time before someone investigated this room. A lot of people were now moving down below and talking amongst themselves. The hornet nest had been well and truly kicked now, so Blacknail wasted no time. He leaned out the window and whistled. Right away, several hobgoblins stepped out of the shadows on the street below.

“Catch the human,” he told them as he signaled the minions behind him forward.

The two hobgoblins holding Avorlus immediately dumped the unconscious mage out of the window. He plummeted down to the ground, but right before he hit, three hobgoblins managed to dive forward and catch him.

“Good work!” Blacknail laughed as he jumped out the window. He landed on the cobblestones below feet first and then rolled to reduce his impact.

Without waiting for orders, the hobgoblins still up in the room jumped out after him as well. They were just in time. Light flared out of the second story window as someone with a lamp or light stone stormed into the room.

“Someone just jumped out the window. They’re on the street below!” an irate sounding woman yelled from up above.

“Run, and don’t forget the mage!” Blacknail shouted as he followed his own advice.

He took off at a sprint away from the shop and deeper into the twisting alleys of Daggerpoint. His minions, including two that had picked up Avorlus, were right behind him. Together, they slipped away into the shadows as the front entrance to the shop burst open and human soldiers began pouring out.

“Don’t let them get away!” someone roared.

Blacknail laughed gleefully as he turned a street corner. The sound echoed off the buildings and back toward the shop, where it undoubtedly reached the ears of the guild soldiers. There was no way any humans were going to catch him now. It was still so early in the morning that it was dark out, and he had too much of a head start. Avorlus was his, and that meant that the power at Blacknail’s fingertips would soon grow stronger than ever, and power was meant to be used.







AFF 5












The hobgoblins under Blacknail’s command carried Avorlus through the back alleys of Daggerpoint. At first they heard shouts and the stomp of boots as guild soldiers tried to follow them, but they soon lost any sign of pursuit. Blacknail led the way out of the merchant quarter and into a rundown residential section. The slum’s streets were narrow and dirty, and many of the small homes here were obviously derelict.

Daggerpoint had a huge human population, but it wasn’t overflowing with people. It seemed like its population had shrunk over time, although Blacknail had no idea why. It wasn’t the sort of thing that he usually thought about, but as he led his minions past an old abandoned wagon that was missing a wheel, several notions flashed through his mind. Maybe it was because the city humans had gotten lazy and couldn’t protect themselves from the beasts in the forest anymore?

The sun was coming up, so before too many people started taking to the streets, Blacknail chose an isolated building on an empty block. The door had fallen off so the hobgoblins just marched inside. The small home had been stripped clean of furniture and was obviously water damaged because of a leak in the ceiling. It also didn’t smell great inside, but this was Daggerpoint, so that wasn’t a surprise. Blacknail expected that some of his hobgoblin minions would suffer permanent damage to their ability to smell before they left, especially if they kept sniffing spices.

Once Avorlus had been thrown inside, Blacknail got his minions busy doing work. He needed some items, and he wasn’t going to go get them himself. That wasn’t what leaders did. Minions were also sent out to form a perimeter. If the guild soldiers showed up anywhere nearby Blacknail wanted to know about it, before they started raining down fire and blowing up buildings. Those hobgoblins that had good disguises and half decent acting skills were also given orders to gently but firmly send away any approaching citizens, under threat of pain and death.

Soon, the hobgoblins had acquired most of the things Blacknail wanted. A blanket was hung over the door, two simple wooden chairs were acquired from nearby, and someone fetched a bucket of water. Blacknail took a seat in one chair while two of his minions picked Avorlus off the ground and sat him down in the other. A third minion then dumped the bucket of water over Avorlus’ face, while the other hobgoblins stood back behind him.

As the water washed over him and then splashed down onto the floor, the mage came awake. It had been very cold water, and it got a strong reaction. Avorlus’ eyes snapped open and he jerked forward in what looked like an attempt to stand. However, he was still tied up and a hobgoblin was standing behind him and holding him in place, so he didn’t get very far. All Avorlus could do was flop back onto the chair and look around. There wasn’t much to see in the dark room so he quickly noticed Blacknail sitting in front of him. His eyes narrowed as he stared hatefully at the form before him.

“You may as well kill me. I won’t tell you anything! You have no right to the secrets I have discovered. You are parasites and vermin that feed upon the wonders of magic! You guilds exist only to stifle the works of your betters and hoard power you don’t deserve,” he cursed. “One day real seekers of knowledge will rise up and destroy you!”

What? Blacknail considered his words for a moment before carefully replying. “I think you’re confused. I’m obviously not with the guilds.”

“You’re not?” Avorlus remarked in surprise as he stared at Blacknail. He seemed to be having trouble seeing.

“No, I’m a hobgoblin. I don’t think your mage guilds have many of us.”

Avorlus froze and one of his eyes twitched. “What?”

“I’m green and I have pointy ears,” Blacknail explained as he pointed to the tips of his ears.

“Oh, um… its dark in here and my vision is still a little blurry. I think someone bashed me over the head…”

Blacknail looked around. It was fairly dark in here. He had forgotten how bad human eyesight could be in dim lighting.

“I can help you with the light,” Blacknail replied as he motioned for a minion to go remove the blanket from the door. He had just put it there to make sure no one could see inside, but it probably wasn’t necessary.

With the sheet gone a lot more light streamed into the room. Avorlus looked around and gulped nervously. He didn’t seem all that happy to be out of the clutches of the guild. “I see that you’re all hobgoblins. That’s interesting…”

“I’m the leader,” Blacknail told him. It was important that everyone knew that.

Suddenly, Avorlus sat up straighter and his eye narrowed in understanding as a realization hit him. “You must be that hobgoblin of Mahedium’s. I can’t think of any other reason you would want to abduct me, and I don’t know of any other hobgoblin that can… talk and such.”

“I can talk just fine,” Scamp interjected, before Blacknail shut him up with angry look.

Blacknail then turned back to Avorlus and hissed angrily. “I never served that traitor. I was Herad’s favourite.”

A neutral expression overcame Avorlus’ face and he leaned back. “Ah, sorry. That was a slip of the tongue. I apologize.”

“Don’t do it again.”

“I won’t. Do you mind answering some questions? Like where am I and how I got here? I must admit to being rather confused. The last thing I remember is the guild assault on my hideout,” Avrolus asked in a careful tone.

“I rescued you from those guild people after they had caught you. Now, we are hiding in Daggerpoint.”

“Ah, and why did you do that?”

“Because we’re friends!” Blacknail explained as he smiled cheerfully. “You helped Herad and me out before so I helped you.”

“So you’re going to let me leave?”

“Of course, but as your friend and ally I can’t let you walk back into danger. That’s not what a true friend would do.”

“I see, so if I said I would like to meet with some people?”

“Too dangerous. Those guild soldiers could be anywhere.”

“And if I said I wanted to join a caravan leaving the city?”

“Too dangerous.”

“So I’m your prisoner,” Avorlus stated flatly.

“No, that’s silly. I’m just going to send you to a safe place where the bad guild people won’t be able to find you. As your friend, it is the least I can do!”

“I can’t say I like this development all that much, but at least it seems like I’m not going to be tortured to death today. That’s an improvement anyway.”

“Everything becomes better when I show up!” Blacknail agreed.

Avorlus sighed. “I’ve avoided the guild and becoming anyone’s servant for almost forty years, and now this. I’ve lost everything and been kidnapped by primitives.”

“Not kidnapped, I liberated you!” Blacknail replied. He was mildly annoyed that Avorlus wasn’t understanding the difference.

“Well if you want me to stay that way there is something you should know. The guild will probably be able to track my location using magic, so we need to get moving right away.”

“How will they do that?” Blacknail had never heard of magic that could be used to find things. That was what noses were for.

“My attackers had ample opportunity to collect some of my blood, and I undoubtedly bled somewhere they can access. With that and the right mana stone they can make a blood compass, which will point in my direction. The technique is common among guild hunters.”

“That’s not good,” Blacknail remarked as he began to think. If it pointed in Avorlus’ direction… “The city isn’t safe. It’s too easy to sneak up and surround us. I will have to send you out into the Green.”

“You want to send me out into the forest?” Avorlus asked in alarm. “The Green is full of dangerous beasts and who knows what other terrors!”

“It will be safer for you there. My minions live out there and know how to survive, unlike the men chasing you. You will be fine.”

“You have a point,” Avorlus remarked reluctantly.

“I have several, and I keep them sharp,” Blacknail replied as he stroked the hilt of a dagger at his waist. It was one of his favorites.

“I don’t doubt that,” Avorlus said as he frowned thoughtfully and looked up. “I’m more curious about what you want with me, though. What is it that you're up to and how can I help you with it? Last I heard, Herad was dead and her forces had been scattered.”

Blacknail met Avorlus’ gaze with a steely look of his own. “I want to kill those that destroyed my old tribe, including the traitor Mahedium. You know how to make my Elixir, and I need more of it, lots more of it.”

“I suppose I don’t mind helping you with that. It’s actually in my own interest, although I clearly don’t have much choice,” Avorlus huffed as he looked down at the ropes encircling his torso. “The timing of the Fiery Eye’s sudden interest in me is highly suspicious. I’d just turned down an invite from Mahedium and his backers. They wanted me to join them in creating a sort of… secret guild that answered to them. I said no – I serve no one but myself - and then all sorts of troubles began cropping up to hinder me. They weren’t subtle, but they were obviously too afraid to face me and my allies here in Daggerpoint directly, so I underestimated how far they would go to monopolize magical knowledge in the North.”

“Our enemies are the same,” Blacknail agreed. “Mahedium betrayed Herad so that he could join up with the Wolf.”

“And the merchants that support the Wolf, the Broken Wheel.”

“Yes, them. They were the ones that gave the Wolf’s minions gold when Herad was here in Daggerpoint. They used it to buy troops.”

“They’ve done a lot more than that. The Broken Wheel and Werrick control everything in the North now, either directly or from behind the scenes. These are very powerful people that you’ve decided to raise your blade against. What makes you think you stand a chance?”

“I have my minions here, and many more of them as well.”

“You will need more than hobgoblins.”

“I have a lot of human minions, and a vast territory I control,” Blacknail bragged. It wasn’t his fault that most of the humans that worked for him were too stupid to realize that they did, and he did control a vast territory, even if it was almost all empty forest on the edge of the frontier that no one else wanted.

“But do you have somewhere that I can do my work safely?”

“Yes, I even have a minion that knows many of Mahedium’s secrets. He makes crystals for me.”

“Do you now…” Avorlus replied with obvious interest.

“Yes, I do,” Blacknail told him. Avorlus would undoubtedly be surprised when he learned who Blacknail was talking about, but it was the truth.

Avorlus grinned. “It seems we can help each other. I’m curious about something, though. When you ‘liberated’ me, did the hunters ever see your faces?”

“I think so. They probably saw something. We had to kill a few of them. Why do you want to know?” Blacknail asked. Was this a bad magic thing? Could they be tracked somehow?

Avorlus smirked evilly. “No real reason. I just wish I could see the look on their superior’s face when they hand that report in.”

If Avorlus was telling the truth about the blood compass then unwanted company was probably going to arrive soon, so Blacknail ordered several of his minions to take the mage out into the forest right away. They had a campsite out in the Green nearby that they had used on the way here, and it would be impossible for the guild to get close to it without being seen.

“You’re not coming with us, boss?” Scamp asked. He had been selected to lead Avorlus’ guards, because Blacknail didn’t want him around.

Blacknail grimaced. “No, I have to meet with a human, a very dangerous one.”

“Oh, they must be very super scary,” Herah remarked in surprise. She had also been personally selected to guard the mage. Blacknail had a strong feeling that things would be much simpler if she were out of the way for this next part, and he trusted his instincts.

“They are. Be very grateful you don’t have to meet them,” Blacknail replied as he sent his minions on their way.

When they were gone, Blacknail sighed and rubbed his eyes. He had been putting this part of his mission off, but he didn’t have any more excuses. He needed information on Werrick and this Broken Wheel company. More than that, he needed to understand a lot of things about human, their society, and their lands that were mysteries to him right now. Such things hadn’t concerned him before, but ever since the battle at Shelter he had come to realize how ignorant he was. That had to change.

Blacknail hissed in frustration. As much as he wished that he could just attack some random important looking humans for information that was unlikely to work. He knew of only one person that would know about Werrick and all the other stuff he needed. He was going to have to visit Luphera.

“You stay here and guard this place. I will be back soon,” Blacknail told the dozen hobgoblins that hadn’t gone with Avorlus. He expected some of them to sneak out and explore the city the second he left, but hopefully they would at least organize some sort of watch. Right now, he was too distracted to care, though.

“You don’t want anyone to go with you?” one of the guards asked.

“I really don’t,” Blacknail answered grimly. There was no way he wanted any of his minions around when he visited Luphera. Not that he cared what they thought, but they would be putty in her hands, unlike him. Blacknail was known for his iron self-control.

After leaving the other hobgoblins behind, Blacknail walked out onto the street and began making his way to Luphera’s home. He hoped she still lived in the same place. Having to search for her would be annoying.

The sun had fully risen above the horizon now, but Blacknail didn’t bother sulking through the shadows. With his hood up he was just another private individual. In the slums, the few people he passed ignored him. This wasn’t surprising since half of them looked even more suspicious than he did. One man in dirty brown clothes was dragging a sack that made a coughing noise as Blacknail walked by. The hobgoblin was tempted to seize the sack and see what was inside, but he had to prioritize.

The street he was on led him past rows of small homes and onto a larger road lined by stalls and shops. This still wasn’t the best part of the city but it was an improvement. There were a lot more people milling around here, but no one gave Blacknail trouble. He looked down to hide his face, stepped into the crowd, and made his way through them. He passed by colorful peddlers, confident thugs, and tired-looking workers as merchants hawked their wares from nearby stalls. Blacknail made sure he kept an eye out for children so he could avoid them. Almost all the small humans were thieves out to steal his shinnies, but they weren’t the biggest hazard. The real danger was the carts or horses being led around. Blacknail distrusted horses. They were vile creatures that stank like death and their eyes shone with hatred. He made sure he didn’t go anywhere near them so they couldn’t kick or bite him.

Eventually Blacknail passed through several different sections of the city and found himself standing outside the large building that Luphera shared with lots of other scantily clad women. There was a bald man in a red vest guarding the door. He was taller and much more muscular than most human men, and he probably weighed three times as much as a hobgoblin. Blacknail considered walking up and beating him to a pulp, just to prove that he could. However, Luphera had reacted badly the last time he had hurt one of her employees. Should he just go up and ask to see her? She would undoubtedly want to see him, but would they actually tell her that he was here?

Blacknail decided to just sneak in through the back. That was what he had done every other time and it had worked out fine, even though he’d had to fight his way through a small army of assassins once. It was unlikely to happen twice though, so Blacknail headed around to the alley behind the building and climbed inside the window that led to Luphera’s bedroom. It was empty. The fancy looking room with its ornate furniture and huge four post bed looked much the same, but it smelled very different. Not only was the scent of Luphera’s unique perfume gone, but the woman’s own scent had been replaced by that of an unfamiliar woman.

“This isn’t good,” Blacknail mused to himself as he examined the room. He didn’t find any treats or signs of Luphera, just lots of silky clothes.

As Blacknail was examining a particularly frilly piece of clothing he had found in a drawer, someone knocked on the suite’s door. The hobgoblin sat up. The bedroom door that led to the sitting room was open, so Blacknail got ready to hide.

“Blacknail, the mistress invites you to join her,” a man politely announced from outside the suite.

“How?” Blacknail hissed to himself in confusion. They knew he was here? What? That didn’t make any sense. There was no way some lazy city humans had seen him! He was a master sneaker of peerless skill.

Slowly, Blacknail got up and made his way over to the suite door. He could hear relaxed breathing from the other side but that was it. The man there wasn’t moving and seemed perfectly willing to wait for him.

The hobgoblin hesitated and then opened the door. It swung open to reveal a thin older man with a neatly trimmed grey mustache who nodded respectfully in welcome. He was wearing a tidy outfit with black pants, a white shirt, and a red vest.

“Er, hello.” Blacknail greeted him.

“Hello to you as well. This way please. The mistress is waiting,” the servant replied as he gestured down the hall. He was wearing white gloves and he didn’t seem surprised in the slightest by Blacknail’s appearance.

Blacknail shrugged and began walking in the indicated direction. It wasn’t like he had any better options, and he was used to being confused and irritated whenever Luphera was involved.










AFF 6












The prim servant with the mustache and the fancy clothes led Blacknail around a corner and down to the very end of the hallway. He then stepped to the side and gestured towards the door there.

“The mistress is waiting just inside for you,” he announced politely. Blacknail resisted the urge to wipe the pleased look off his face by kicking him in the groin.

Instead, the hobgoblin stared at the door for a moment, before sighing and pushing it open. He would have much preferred it if he’d been able to sneak in, instead of being invited like this. All this preparation for his arrival resembled a trap far too much for his comfort. Luphera probably didn’t want to kill him, but that didn’t mean her intentions would be in his best interest, especially if she got handsy. She had tricked him into doing things for her more than once. Not this time, though. Blacknail had changed. He was going to stay in control of the situation. He was a leader now, and he wasn’t going to let a human woman tempt him into doing anything that undermined his pride.

The door in front of Blacknail swung open to reveal a lavish sitting room that was much larger than the one in Luphera’s old suite. Tasteful bits of ornate furniture ringed the room and art decorated the walls. A pair of cushioned couches sat in one corner and there was a long low table in front of them. The first thing Blacknail noticed was the plates of food on the table. The second thing he noticed was that Luphera was sprawled out on one of the couches. She was laying on her side in a bold but lazy posture, and she smiled confidently as Blacknail walked in. As per usual, she was wearing thin silk clothes that revealed the shape of her. Although this time they were blue and instead of a dress she had on loose trousers.

After studying her for a moment, Blacknail shifted his gaze and focused on her eyes. Looking at her body muddled his thinking, but her eyes revealed her intelligence and confidence. Luphera had power. It wasn’t the type of power that Blacknail was used to, but it was very real and very dangerous. Blacknail had to concentrate on that, and not on the curviness of her hips…

“Ah, Blacknail. I’d been hoping that you’d come visit me again. It has been so very boring here without my favorite gentleman caller around. I found myself longing for the excitement of your company,” Luphera said as the door behind Blacknail shut with dull final thump.

Luphera continued to smile invitingly as she sat up and pushed some of her long blonde hair behind her ear. As she moved, the long neck of sleeveless shirt shifted and more of her ample bosom was exposed. Blacknail did is best to focus on her eyes.

“How did you know I was here?” he asked her. That was still bugging him.

Luphera laughed. “I deal in information and I have people everywhere.”

“That’s not an answer.”

“If you want something from me then you need to pay for it, although this won’t cost you much. You just need to stop being so rude and greet me properly,” Luphera replied in a playful tone. Blacknail didn’t like being told what to do - he was a leader, not a minion- but this was just a small thing.

“It’s good to see you again, Luphera. You smell as nice as ever,” Blacknail said as he grinned at his host. The scent of her perfume filled the room and was hard not to notice.

“Thank you, please hang your cloak and jacket on the hook by the door. They aren’t needed. It’s nice and warm in here,” she replied as she gestured towards a brazier that was sitting in the far corner of the room.

After forcing himself not to growl, Blacknail did as she had asked. It was warm in here, and again this was a perfectly reasonable and normal request for her to make. Taking off his jacket made him feel exposed for some reason, though.

As he turned around to face Luphera again, she got up from the couch and walked over to him. Blacknail couldn’t help but notice how her hips swayed as she walked. Herah’s didn’t move like that. Wait, why was he comparing them?

“See that wasn’t so hard,” Luphera remarked as she picked something up off a cabinet and handed it to him. “These are for you. Think of them as a gift from someone looking to please a handsome leader.”

Receiving a gift thrilled Blacknail. Obviously, Luphera knew how amazing he was, and she had mentioned that he was leader! Blacknail took the items and looked them over. It was a full set of clothes, including socks. They were nice looking if very different from what he usually wore, much softer. The shirt was white and long-sleeved. The pants were black and surprisingly snug. Usually human clothes were very loose on him and fit poorly, although that wasn’t surprising since every piece of clothing he owned had been looted from dead people.

Luphera smiled invitingly. “Try them on.”

“Right now?” Blacknail asked uncertainly. He wasn’t usually concerned about nudity. Until his master had taught him otherwise, he had spent most of his life running around naked, but he liked the idea of having as many barriers as possible between himself and Luphera right now.

“Well, you’re not loitering around here in those dirty rags. This is a classy establishment. The least you can do is wear something clean.”

Blacknail grimaced. His clothes weren’t dirty! Sure they had dirt on them, but it was the good kind. They barely stank at all, especially when compared to humans.

“Most humans don’t like people changing in front of them,” Blacknail pointed out. He’d had this explained to him several times. Vorscha in particular had told him she didn’t want to see his skinny green ass, even though she had usually been very practical for a human. He missed her.

“It’s nothing I haven’t seen before,” Luphera replied. She twittered with obvious amusement.

“Can I change in the next room?” Blacknail asked. It might be better to play this safe.

“I can hardly stop you,” Luphera laughed. “However, why would you bother? Are you afraid of little me?”

Blacknail was not afraid of anyone. He huffed and immediately began disrobing. However, when he looked up to see Luphera licking her lips he had to suppress a shudder. It was possible he may have just been tricked, so he pulled on his new clothes as quickly as possible.

“Yes, these look quite good on you,” Luphera commented as she walked over and adjusted his clothing a bit. “It was definitely worth all the trouble of having them custom made and coming up with a style to fit your figure and features. You look absolutely chilling, like a uniquely sophisticated beast.”

Blacknail held very still as she smoothed out some wrinkles on his shirt. His new clothes were so soft they almost tickled his skin. It was distracting. He had never worn anything like them before.

“Will you tell me how you knew I was here now?” he asked. He really wanted to know. It didn’t seem possible.

“Yes, of course, since you’re being so well behaved. It’s not complicated,” Luphera replied as she walked back over to her couch and sat down. “When I received word of a figure matching your description being seen around Daggerpoint again, I immediately placed that window you entered through under surveillance by someone in the neighboring building. You’ve used it every time you’ve come to visit me.”

“I’m too sneaky. No one could have seen me,” Blacknail countered gruffly. Although, he supposed they might have noticed another hobgoblin that wasn’t nearly as handsome as him and somehow mistaken them.

“There were a few other hints that you were back in the city as well, such as the arrival of a group of Herad’s old minions and some rather large explosions.”

Blacknail huffed. So it was Geralhd’s fault. “The explosions didn’t have anything to do with me. I just watched them.”

“Yet we tend not to see very many destructive displays of magic such as those in this city, except for some reason when you’re around. You have a way of livening up the place,” Luphera said as she leaned sideways against the arm of the sofa she was sitting on.

“I’m just not lazy, unlike some people,” Blacknail told her.

“I find the excitement you bring to be one of your more charming traits. But surely you have some other questions. Alas, you never just visit for the pleasure of my company.”

Oh, right. He was here for a purpose. Blacknail scratched his nose and considered what to say. Maybe he should try to turn the tables a bit and be charming. He was so handsome that it had to work, especially with his nice new clothes.

“I did come just to see you. You’re the best smelling human in the entire city, and you’re also so smart. You know practically everything,” he told her as he put on his most charming smile. He wasn’t sure how effective it would be since he had never tried it before.

Luphera pouted. “So you don’t want anything from me?”

“Everyone wants stuff from everyone else. Humans and hobgoblins are the same that way, although hobgoblins are more honest and direct about it,” Blacknail replied. They usually just took what they wanted without asking.

“Like you are right now?” Luphera asked with an amused smile.

“Exactly! I’m completely honest.”

Luphera sat up and patted the surface of the sofa next to her. “Well, if you’re here to relax and enjoy some conversation with the best smelling woman in Daggerpoint why don’t you come sit down.”

Blacknail hesitated. He may have made a tactical error. Was it too late to flee for his life? He didn’t want to get too close, but on the other hand that was where the food was and he was getting sort of hungry. There was even a plate of cheese slices…

It didn’t seem like he had much of a choice, so Blacknail sighed quietly to himself and reluctantly walked over to sit stiffly down next to Luphera. Then he helped himself to a slice of cheese. It was very good, but Blacknail wondered how much it was going to cost him.

“Now, what did you want to talk about? I’m shivering in anticipation of your conversational topic of choice,” Luphera whispered as she leaned up against Blacknail and titled her head so that it rested against his shoulder.

“Um, so how are things here?” Blacknail asked her. He was being subtle and indirect.

Lupherea suddenly sat up straight so that she wasn’t leaning against him anymore. “Ha, they’ve been better. Business has been good, especially the physical part. There is more money moving through the city now, but my real area of interest has been drying up. There is a lot less intrigue in a city controlled by one man. Everyone is holding their breath and waiting to see what happens next.”

“Werrick rules Daggerpoint,” Blacknail remarked in a deliberate attempt to steer the conversation. Being subtle was easier than he’d thought it would be.

“Ruling is probably too strong of a word, but yes,” Luphera replied with sly smile. “All the remaining bandit chiefs and gang lords have bent the knee. He left a lieutenant and the man is nominally in charge of the city, although the Governor still runs the inner district as before.”

“What about you?”

“I’m neither a bandit nor a gang lord. I wasn’t asked to swear to anyone, and if something mysterious and assuredly fatal happened to Werrick or his men I would quietly cheer and uncork a bottle of my best wine. The city is growing boring and stale. There are no opportunities for me to prosper in such a place.”

“This lieutenant, where does he live and what is his security like?” Blacknail asked in as neutral a tone as he could manage.

Luphera leaned back, raised a leg, and placed a bare foot on Blacknail’s thigh. “Oh, why would you want to know that?”

“You made me curious?” Blacknail replied uncertainly as he stared at her manicured toes. He didn’t want to give himself away, but it was hard to focus.

“Well, I’ll do my best to satisfy your curiosity then. The name of Werrick’s top man in the city is Cedric. He’s holed up in a mansion on the edge of the inner district, and he has quite a few guards, although he relies far more on borrowing Werrick’s strength than using his own. He doesn’t have nearly the forces necessary to keep everyone else in line,” Luphera explained before going into more detail.

She withdrew her foot and continued talking for several minutes. Blacknail nodded along. Occasionally he grabbed a piece of fruit or cheese from the table as he listened.

“Is your desire for knowledge sated now?” Luperha asked once she was done speaking. She

“No, I don’t know much about Werrick, other than the obvious. I bet you do, though.”

“Ah, there is an interesting man, even if he isn’t my type. I’ve met him only once briefly, but he’s too important for me not to have learned everything I can about him. Before I reveal anything more though, how about you do some sharing of your own? It’s only polite for you to entertain your host.”

“Me? What do you want to know about?” Blacknail asked in surprise.

“Yes, you. I find you absolutely fascinating. You’ve never told me anything about yourself. I’m sure it’s a riveting story.”

A frown appeared on Blacknail’s lips as he thought back. He’d spent most his life a tiny goblin in a sewer. He didn’t feel like sharing this story, so he twisted the truth a little instead.

“I wandered the wilds South when I was younger,” he explained to start off his story.

Luphera listened to him make stuff up until he finished with his arrival in Daggerpoint the first time. “What have you been up to since our last meeting? You were part of Herad’s band, but Werrick wiped them out. Obviously, you survived.”

“Yes, I survived, although my master Saeter didn’t. Werrick killed him,” Blacknail hissed. He couldn’t help himself from showing some anger as the emotion flooded over him.

“Alas, so Saeter really is dead. He was quite the man if half the stories about him were to be believed.

“He was the best man in the entire world, and I will avenge him,” Blacknail replied as his eyes narrowed in fury.

A flash of interest appeared within Luphera’s eyes but then it quickly disappeared. She reached out and put a comforting hand on the hobgoblin’s shoulder. “But how did you survive?”

Blacknail mentally went through some sword drills to calm himself down. Saeter had been the one to teach them to him. “I’m very hard to kill. I fought Werrick but had to go save some of my human minions. I guided them through the forest. None of Werrick’s men could hope to catch me in the Green.”

Luphera sighed dramatically. “The endless Green, so close and yet so unreachable. You have such interesting tales of it. Here in Daggerpoint, it lurks just out of sight and we try not to think about it, yet it has all of us city dwellers completely surrounded. We could visit it at any time, but only the blandest of its edges. We would never survive the journey to its heart, where its true splendors await.”

“Mostly it’s full of trees and things that want to eat you,” Blacknail pointed out.

Luphera rolled her eyes. “Werrick’s attack on Herad was months ago. Where did you go after that?”

“I found a safe place out in the woods, and made some human friends. They liked me because I helped them kill some other humans.”

“Such is the way of the world,” Luphera laughed. “But I’d heard that you have some other friends as well. Where did you find them?”

She was probably talking about the hobgoblins. Blacknail shrugged without concern. If she knew about them then she knew about them. “I just sort of found them out in the forest. I’m a natural leader so they decided to follow me around.”

Luphera leaned over and stroked Blacknail’s nose with a playful finger. “And now you’re here seeking vengeance with new friends and allies. You seem very confident. Since you’re so smart and such a great leader, surely you have some other exciting resources that you haven’t told anyone about.”

Blacknail shivered in delight. “I have a cave full of gold and some mages.”

“That is so interesting. I knew you wouldn’t disappoint me.”

Blacknail groaned. Why had he admitted that? The gold was supposed to be a secret. Luphera was starting to get to him, and her sweet perfume was starting to clog up his brain. He needed to steer the conversation back to where he wanted it to go.

“Can you tell me about Werrick now?”

“Of course. I’d be glad to help my favorite hobgoblin,” Luphera answered as she snuggled in close to him. “Werrick was the second son of a minor noble that held lands on the western border of Hulgaron. While he was away fighting for his country his family lands were decimated by the war with Eloria. When news reached him he deserted and managed to convince his entire squad to come along. He then came north and set himself up as a bandit captain, but even then he wasn’t satisfied. His drive and ambition pushed him to seek out more power and prestige for himself.”

“What does he want? He is already the most powerful chieftain” Blacknail asked her. He wanted to understand his enemy.

“Well, I can’t read his mind, but I imagine he wants to be a king. He is a man of noble stock after all. Normally such a thing wouldn’t be possible, but these aren’t normal times. What’s left of the border lords are holed up in their castles and little more than bandits themselves, and the neighboring countries have bled themselves dry in their wars.”

“How is a king different form a chief, and what wars are we talking about?” Blacknail asked. He barely understood some of the terms and references she was using, and he felt like the details were important here.

“Well that will take a long time to explain. If you want to know all that then you’ll have to stay the night,” Luphera purred as she grabbed his arm and pulled him closer.

Blacknail felt his elbow rub up against Luphera’s chest. He suddenly felt an uncomfortable feeling down below his belly. It was an itch he desperately wanted scratched and Luphera’s scent was intoxicating. Desperately, he tried to remember that she was just a fat pink human, but it didn’t work. The memory of the soft feel of her skin filled his mind instead. The color suddenly didn’t seem all that important, even if green was far superior in every way.

“I guess I should stay then. It’s my duty as a leader to learn as much as possible,” he told her as he stared at her breasts through her semi-translucent shirt. He was a great leader.












AFF 7














The terrified scream echoed out from the dark hallway behind Blacknail and into the building beyond. The now annoyed hobgoblin had been stealthily stalking towards the door that led to his target, but he stopped for a moment and hissed in frustration. One of his minions had messed up. Now the enemy had been warned and the assault had to be sped up. Thankfully this was Daggerpoint and it was still dark out. No one from outside would be coming to investigate. Getting involved in other peoples’ problems was a bad survival strategy here.

“We move now. Kill everyone and leave no witnesses,” Blacknail ordered the half dozen hobgoblins behind him before drawing his sword and dashing forward.

The sound of running feet on wooden floorboards broke the quiet as the inhuman killers abandoned stealth and suddenly began sprinting toward the door at the end of the hallway. Blacknail reached in first, and he grunted in effort as he kicked it. There was an earsplitting crunch and thud as it burst open, and he dove inside. The room on the other side was dark, but there was enough moonlight coming in from one small window that the hobgoblins could make out the outlines of the chamber’s contents. Rows of beds lined both walls, and most of them were occupied.

“What in all the hells,” someone yelled as they scrambled out of bed and tried to make sense of what was going on. The other occupants of the room were reacting in a similar manner, but it was dark and they had all been asleep until a moment ago, so they were moving slowly and without organization.

Without pause, Blacknail lunged forward and cut the closest man down as he fumbled around blindly. Behind him, his hobgoblin minions flooded into the room. Blades sliced through the shadows and found soft flesh. More screams and curses filled the air as the confused and disoriented humans began to grow terrified. The scent of blood filled the room, and giggles of delight could be heard beneath the screams as the hobgoblins delighted in their grisly work. They were predators in their element.

“Oh, gods. What’s going on?” someone pleaded.

Then, there was a flash as a man at the back of the room managed to light a lamp. The unexpected illumination flooded into the room, reflected off raised blades, and revealed the attackers.

“Shit,” the lamp bearer cursed softly as everyone froze for a brief moment and looked around for the first time. He had just rolled out of bed so he was completely nude, which made it obvious he was trembling in fear of the sight before him.

“Keep fighting. They are ours,” Blacknail yelled as he stabbed a man that tried to run past him. He didn’t want his minions to falter just because the odds had changed a little.

A big bald man wearing nothing but a loose shirt produced a sword from somewhere. Blacknail stepped forward to engage him before he could strike out at another hobgoblin. The man hesitated and then swung wildly at Blacknail’s head. Blacknail ducked under the blow and gutted his opponent with a precise horizontal slash. A disbelieving grunt of pain escaped the man’s lips as he fell and his guts slipped out of his abdomen. They made quite a mess on the floor.

As Blacknail moved on to cut down his next victim, his minions struggled with the other humans. Some of them had dropped or lost their swords and were biting and clawing at their opponents. One unlucky hobgoblin was punched in the face by a large pot-bellied man and collapsed into a heap. However, Blacknail advanced up the center of the room and his swift blade cut through any resistance that formed. Filled with terror, the humans fought desperately but they were swiftly overwhelmed. Confronted with inhuman opponents that most of them only knew from stories, they didn’t plead for mercy as they fell, and Blacknail didn’t give them any. Soon, the floor was drenched in blood and all its former occupants were dead.

“Now to the next room,” Blacknail growled as he turned back towards the door. He didn’t have time to waste.

The hobgoblin chieftain ran back out into the hallway and towards his next objective. The attack on Cedric’s headquarters was going well. Thanks to Luphera’s information Blacknail knew exactly where everything was. After taking out the sentries in a coordinated attack, he had divided his followers into teams and sent them to take three different objectives. Even now, his minions were rushing through the building and killing all the humans they found. They were outnumbered – Cedric had over fifty men in this building alone - but the hobgoblins had the advantage of surprise and momentum. Quite a few enemies had died in bed or before they could even figure out what was going on in the darkness around them. Blacknail grinned as he felt a throb of sadistic glee. Hobgoblin night-sight could be very useful if used correctly by a great leader, and he was better than a great leader.

Another door appeared out of the darkness in front of Blacknail. He kicked it, but it was unlocked so he lost his balance as the door slammed into the wall behind it. Cursing, he stumbled forward but then caught himself and looked around the room. This one was already lit by a lamp. The people within had used the warning they had been given to start to organize, but there were only three of them. Blacknail was unsurprised. This was Cedric’s room, and leaders usually didn’t share their chambers.

“What in damnation are you supposed to be?” the man in the center of the room swore as he looked Blacknail over. He matched the description of Cedric, a tall man with short black hair. The other two residents of the room, a man and a woman who looked like servants, were helping him strap a boiled leather breastplate over a simple shirt and trousers that he must have just thrown on.

“Your death,” Blacknail replied with a mirthless laugh and a smile that didn’t reach his eyes.

Cedric grunted as he reached over and picked up a sword of the bed beside him. His servants both finished attaching his breastplate. The woman stepped back away with a fearful look on her face, while the male drew a long dagger.

“No, you’re that hobgoblin. The one they call the faceless killer. I’d heard you were dangerous, but you can’t be doing this alone,” Cedric remarked as he raised his weapon and took up a defensive stance. It was at that moment that several of Blacknail’s minions caught up and slipped into the room behind their boss.

Their arrival surprised Cedric and he grimaced. “That answers my question I suppose.”

“Yes, it does,” Blacknail laughed as he stepped forward and attacked.

His opponent easily dodged the blow by leaning back, but Blacknail turned the slash into a flurry of attacks. Cedric blocked one and then dodged the others, before slashing at Blacknail’s chest with a two-handed strike. His sword was a longer and heavier weapon, so Blacknail dodged instead of blocking. Meanwhile, the servant with the knife tried to circle around and get at Blacknail’s exposed side, but two hobgoblins intercepted him and forced him back. Another hobgoblin circled around to approach the female servant. Before he got too close though, she pulled out a long knife of her own, and the hobgoblin hesitated.

There was a metallic ringing as Cedric blocked a downward slash from Blacknail. The hobgoblin jumped back and looked for an opening. He feinted a stab and turned it into an upward riposte when Cedric tried to parry it. Blacknail’s weapon caught on his opponent’s breastplate and then slid up and away without doing any damage.

Cedric took a step back and glared at Blacknail. “What are you here for, creature?”

“To deliver a message to your master, all his friends, and all of his enemies,” Blacknail shot back. He was getting a little tired of this fight. It might be time to order his minions to help. He didn’t have any Elixir left to burn and he didn’t feel like taking any risks.

“Fighting the Wolf is a fool’s errand.”

Blacknail laughed with dark amusement. “Says the man whose corpse will soon be a warning to others.”

“Not likely,” Cedric growled as he lunged forward and launched a flurry of attacks.

Both the human servants had managed to keep their hobgoblin attackers away so far, but as the man slashed at the hand of one hobgoblin another jumped forward and stabbed him in the gut. He gasped and collapsed with the sword stuck in his belly. The woman gasped but didn’t drop her guard. This development left Cedric’s side exposed to Blacknail’s minions. He let up his attack and shifted into a defensive stance.

“You can’t fight all of Werrick’s men. He has allies and friends everywhere. The North belongs to him,” the bandit lieutenant told Blacknail.

“He has no friends in the Green. He has no allies nearby to save you. The North belongs to whoever holds it,” Blacknail replied as he stepped forward. His minions smiled and pressed in to pressure Cedric’s flank.

On the other side, the woman was now desperately flailing with her knife. She had kept the hobgoblin assaulting her at bay so far, but she couldn’t keep it up. Her assailant was playing it safe and constantly feinting with his longer blade to wear her out. Suddenly, she stumbled and the hobgoblin facing her reacted. His blade sliced down and cut into her arm. She yelped and fell backwards, dropping her weapon as she instinctively clutched her wound. Her opponent followed up by kicking her in the head, and there was a cracking noise as she fell over sideways. Unconscious, she didn’t stir as she began to bleed out onto the floor from the gash on her arm. Blacknail grinned and focused on Cedric. A female opponent was no different from a man to him, and he wasn’t even slightly interested in mercy when it came to anyone who worked for Werrick, even indirectly. Mercy was human thing anyway.

Cedric looked grim now, and he had good reason. He was surrounded by hobgoblins on three sides.

“Why are you doing this?” he asked Blacknail. “Werrick will unite this land and build something better. He is the greatest man I’ve met, and I’m sure he could use your skills or at least pay you off.”

“I don’t care at all. The Wolf attacked my tribe and killed my master. He took what was mine, my most precious things. I can never get them back, so I will take from him in kind,” Blacknail hissed as he motioned for his minions to attack. It was time to finish this. As he lunged forward from the front, Blacknail’s followers closed in on Cedric from the other directions.

“You will fail, you pathetic creature,” the man growled as he glared at Blacknail.

“You’ve already failed,” Blacknail hissed back as he slashed at Cedric’s front leg.

The man had no option but to block the attack, and then try to twist away from the other hobgoblins’ blades as they took the opportunity to attack all at once. He failed. With pleased hisses, Blacknail’s minions stabbed and slashed their opponent. Some of the blows bounced off the breastplate, but others sank deep into flesh and cut into organs. Shuddering, Cedric coughed up a mouthful of blood and then tottered over backwards. A moment later, Blacknail walked over and kicked him in the ribs. He didn’t move or appear to be breathing, so the hobgoblin turned away.

“I win,” Blacknail announced to no one in particular as he walked over to the bed and used a sheet to wipe the blood off his blade. Now that all the enemies were down, some of his minions copied him. He’d made sure they knew the importance of keeping their blades clean.

“Take his breastplate off and carry it for me. It’s mine now,” Blacknail told one of his minions as he stepped back out into the hallway.

It seemed like the mission had gone perfectly. Their main target, Cedric, was dead, and it didn’t sound like there was anyone still putting up any resistance. Blacknail walked over to a window and stared out of it. The moonlit rooftops of Daggerpoint lay before him, and they looked a lot less shabby in the dark. As he stared at the scene, the hobgoblin felt his heartbeat slow and his fury slip away. He took a moment to reflect.

This was a blow against Werrick. The death of his lieutenant would weaken his hold on the city and make him look weak. A weak chieftain would face many more challengers and have fewer options than one that seemed invincible. Blacknail could also use the fallout to manipulate others into doing what he wanted. Yes, everything was going perfectly, but he didn’t feel any better. He was still hollow inside. Werrick was still alive. Saeter was still dead.

Blacknail growled and stomped off to organize his minions. Thinking about this was pointless, and the mission wasn’t quite over yet. He had meant what he’d told Cedric about leaving a message. The ruin and horror he was about to make this building into would be Blacknail’s message to Werrick. All his minions already had their orders, and were undoubtedly already fulfilling them, but Blacknail wanted to make sure they stayed on task.

Bodies were moved, furniture was torn apart, and everything that was both shiny and light enough to carry was gathered up by hobgoblins as Blacknail stalked through the building and oversaw the work. His minions went about their tasks with obvious glee and they tried to outdo each other. In one room five mangled bodies had been hung from the roof with rope, while in another the bodies had all been hacked into pieces and strewn all over the room. When it was about time to leave, Blacknail went back to Cedric’s room and cut off the man’s head. He carried it by its hair over to the front door, and while all his minions watched, he impaled it on a wooden spike that one of his minions had driven into the ground. No one that approached the building in the morning could fail to notice the bloody detached head, and no one that learned of what had happened inside the building could fail to realize that this hadn’t been a normal fight. Word would spread and carry fear and uncertainly with it all the way to Werrick.

“Victory is ours. This is just a taste of things to come,” Blacknail told his gathered minions. “I will lead you to all the best and tastiest prizes you can imagine. We will hunt our enemies and spread our tribe’s territory far and wide!”

The crowd of hobgoblins cheered, and Blacknail grinned in satisfaction. He knew how to motivate hobgoblins and keep them loyal. He just had to keep on winning, and this had been a great victory. Not a single hobgoblin had died. A few had gotten injured, but that was it. The humans had been completely caught off guard and unable to defend themselves as Blacknail’s minions had cut them down in the dark.

Since they had accomplished their mission and they had already loitered here too long after making so much noise, Blacknail led his minions through the streets as it began to grow lighter out. The sun was just beginning to rise. Instead of going to the safe house, they headed toward the city wall. Once there, they climbed over it and slipped out the city. It was possible that they might have picked up some observers and Blacknail didn’t want to lead them back to the safe house. He also wanted to check in on the forest camp. He’d left Herah in charge of watching Avorlus there.

The birds were signing their morning songs as the victorious hobgoblins slipped into the forest. The streets had been empty and they hadn’t run into any problems on the way out of the city. Blacknail located a familiar animal trail and they followed it through the trees and over to the hill where they had set up the camp. It was only about half an hour from the walls. The only way up the hill from the direction of Daggerpoint was easily watched. It involved using a fallen tree to cross a stream that lay at the bottom of a deep chasm and taking a narrow path up a steep rock face. Thus, they were spotted well before they reached it. Blacknail had left sentries out to watch in case the guild tried to track down Avorlus. The sentries acknowledged their companion's presence but stayed at their posts as they passed them by.

Soon enough, Blacknail reached the top of the hill and saw the camp before him. It was a simple collection of tents that had been set up among some large rocks, and various bags and piles of loot lay around the place. As he had expected, Blacknail noticed Herah and Avorlus sitting by the firepit, but they weren’t alone. Something red and annoying was sitting beside Herah. It was Khita… What? He had left her behind in Daggerpoint! How could she have possibly found this place?

“Ah, there you are Blacknail! I was beginning to think you were never going to show up!” the redhead young woman remarked cheerfully as she stood up to greet him.

“How did you get here?” Blacknail spat back in frustration.

“Oh, Herah came and got me. She wanted to talk to me about some stuff.”

What? Blacknail wasn’t completely sure why but he didn’t like this development. It smelled like a conspiracy against him.

“I saw that you’ve captured another mage. I don’t know why you want them all, but I’m sure you have a plan.”

“I do and it’s a great plan. This mage knows how to make my Elixir. He’s why I came to this city. I need Elixir to kill my enemies easier.”

“Well at least this one isn’t tied up and naked, unlike the last. Is it because he’s a man?”

“Excuse me?” Avorlus asked in alarm as he threw a nervous look at his captor.

Blacknail hissed and stomped the ground in exasperation as he glared at Khita. “That wasn’t me. Imp did that, and it made sense. Who knows what dangerous magic thingies that woman was keeping in her clothes.

Why did Khita keep bringing this up? During the battle at Shelter, Blacknail had knocked out the raiders’ mage. While he had been resting after his glorious victory, Imp and some other hobgoblins had captured her, and then taken some simple and completely justified safety measures that Khita wouldn’t stop bringing up.

“Ah, sure. That sounds believable,” the redhead replied as she smirked.

Blacknail hissed again. Why did humans have to make something as simple and pure as stripping and tying up your prisoners so complicated? They injected sex into even completely innocent activates. It was disgusting. There was a time and a place.







AFF 8












Grunting in annoyance, Blacknail wandered away from the center of the hobgoblins’ forest camp and sat down on a stone that was right beside his tent. He needed to take a quick break. Being around Khita was tiring, and he’d just completed a difficult mission that had involved a lot of hard fighting and great leadership. He also hadn’t gotten a lot of sleep last night – for reasons - and it was still early in the morning. Blacknail closed his eyes, but he found it difficult to clear his mind. Up in the trees, the birds were singing their morning tunes and incessantly chirping away. He was also not left alone. Khita murmured something to Herah and than wandered over to Blacknail’s side.

He looked up at her and scowled. “What do you want?”

“To talk to you about some things,” Khita replied with a shrug.

“Too bad. Go away.”

She didn’t listen. “I was just having a chat with Herah.”

“My eyes and ears work fine. I knew that,” Blacknail observed derisively.

“Wow, you’re grumpy right now.”

“I’m trying to rest my eyes and think, but you’re bugging me, like a bug. Stop buzzing around and go away,” Blacknail replied with a wave of his hand as if to shoo her away.

“Well, you’re not busy right now, and this is important.”

“Fine, what is it?” Blacknail sighed. It was probably best to deal with Khita quickly so that she would leave him alone.

Khita smiled gleefully. “Right, so I was talking to Herah and she mentioned that you’d been avoiding her, even though anyone can see that she wants to jump your bones.”

“That’s none of your business. Why do you care?” Blacknail hissed.

“Herah is my friend.”

Blacknail doubted that, but he humored the redhead. “She’s a hobgoblin.”

“And you don’t find them attractive? What, do you like human women, or men, or something?”

“Huh?” Blacknail sputtered in surprise. What was she getting at? Did she know about Luphera?

“That’s nonsense. Stop being so stupid, you ugly human!” he quickly shot back. “Of course hobgoblins are much better looking than humans. You’re all fat, and pink!”

“Then what’s the problem?” Khita asked.

Blacknail rolled his eyes and sneered at her. “Hobgoblins can’t be trusted. They are devious and violent. Letting them near you is stupid. I can’t let her get too close or she might kill me and take my place as leader.”

Khita gave Blacknail a perplexed look as she titled her head to the side. “You’re a hobgoblin too…”

“That’s why I know they can’t be trusted.” Blacknail explained. No one knew hobgoblins better than he did.

“So the others and I shouldn’t trust you?”

“That’s different.”

“Why?”

Blacknail hesitated before replying. “…because I’m loyal and amazing, and I’m already the leader anyway.”

Khita shook her head. “Right, I think you’re being stupid and paranoid. Herah is attractive for a hobgoblin, right?”

“Yes,” Blacknail answered uncertainly. That was one of the reasons she was dangerous.

“Then you should definitely hook up with her! Just have fun!”

“What?” Several rather odd and confusing images popped into Blacknail’s head. He gave Khita a startled look.

“You should have sex with her,” she explained dryly.

“I don’t want your advice about this. Go away, stupid girl.” Seriously this might be the most annoying conversation Blacknail had ever had with Khita, and that was saying something.

“Ugh, you’re being stupid. Just relax and have fun. We’re all going to die eventually,” Khita told him as she turned and began walking back to Herah.

“But I have things to do before then,” Blacknail growled at her back.

Khita didn’t know anything. She was human, and not a very smart one. Sure, Blacknail would have enjoyed playing around with Herah. She had nice pointy ears, and a properly thin body, unlike Luphera, but she was dangerous. Blacknail could feel it in his bones. More than once, he’d caught her looking at him like he was a big juicy steak. That was unnerving. Yet, Luphera couldn’t be trusted either and he’d messed around with her. Blacknail could take care of himself, and it was possible that Herah wasn’t actually trying to kill him. Perhaps he was just so handsome that she couldn’t help but want to be with him and keep him around? He did have the nicest looking nose in the North. Before Blacknail could think about the situation any more, a hobgoblin appeared at the edge of camp and ran over to him.

“Boss, I found something while I was in the city,” the newcomer announced excitedly.

“Oh? What is it? Blacknail asked as he looked up. He wasn’t going to ask why the hobgoblin had been wandering the city alone, because he already knew the answer. A lot of the hobgoblins were sneaking away to explore. He was also grateful for the interruption.

“A familiar scent, a human. I found someone in the city that was back at our main camp!”

Blacknail could think of only one person that could be. He stood up and smiled. “Oh, really? Take me to them.”

Soon, Blacknail and some his minions were sneaking back into Daggerpoint. Khita and Herah invited themselves along this time, but Blacknail ignored them. It was amazing how ineffectual the city wall was at keeping hobgoblins out. They could easily scale it, dig under it, or slip through the gaps in the wood. It didn’t seem like anyone ever patrolled or repaired the barrier.

“I’m stuck!” Khita hissed from where she was balancing atop the wall. She was having a more difficult time slipping into the city and had required a lot of help.

“Just jump down,” Blacknail told her impatiently.

“It’s like a three story drop from here! Are you going to catch me?”

“No, you’re a big fat human. You’d crush me.” Blacknail told her.

“I’m not fat! You hobgoblins are just skinny,” Khita huffed as she began to slowly climb down. Blacknail had provided her with a rope but it was still taking her forever.

When she reached the bottom, the party quickly made their way along several back streets and towards a rundown residential district. They avoided as many people as possible and people avoided them right back. The dirty looking workers and tired women that walked by gave them plenty of space.

“The trail led here,” the hobgoblin they were all following said as he came to a stop across the street from an inn. They were standing beside an empty stall that somewhat concealed them from casual observation.

The inn was a rather shabby structure that looked like it had seen better days. The faded sign over the door bore the image of a cup, or maybe it was a tower? It was hard to tell. Blacknail took a few moments to think about the best way to approach this situation. Having their entire group walk into the inn would probably be a bad idea. There was no way a whole group of hooded individuals wouldn’t draw attention once they were inside. He would probably be fine if he went in with just Khita, but then what would he do once he found his target?

As Blacknail was mulling his options, the door swung open and a man stepped out. After exiting the building, he briefly scanned the surroundings, but his gaze swept right over Blacknail’s group without concern, and he began walking away from them and down the street.

“That’s him. Follow me,” Blacknail hissed as he set off after the man.

The hobgoblins and Khita hung back while their target remained in plain sight of the public. They watched and waited for several minutes as he wandered the city streets, until finally he stepped off of a main road and into an alley. Instantly, Blacknail put on a burst of speed and sprinted after him, with his minions in pursuit.

In the alley ahead, the man began muttering to himself and kicked a bit of trash. “Damn, innkeeper. He should be paying me to stay in such dirty rooms. If only those raider bastards hadn’t taken almost all my gold.”

Suddenly, he froze as if he’d heard something. With a startled look on his face, he turned to look back over his shoulder. He swiftly spotted the cloaked hobgoblins and jumped in surprise.

“Is this about the money?” he squealed. “Were you sent by Jasper to collect? I don’t have it on me, but I swear I can get it. My luck at cards is usually very good. That was just a onetime fluke.”

Instead of answering, Blacknail motioned his minions forward. They jumped on the startled man and began tying him up with rope they’d prepared beforehand.

“Don’t kill me! Oh, gods. I’ve come too far to die now.”

Once the man was completely secure and gagged, Blacknail removed his hood and leaned over. “Hey there, Elyias! It’s great to see you again. You don’t have to worry anymore. It seems like you got lost and couldn’t find your way back to Shelter, but your great leader is here to help now!”

Elyias’ eyes widened and he opened his mouth wide as if to scream - probably in joy – but then a hobgoblin shoved a sock in his mouth. The only sound he could make was a muffled moan, as he chewed the dirty wool and struggled against the two hobgoblins holding him,

Blacknail smiled and continued talking. “Good thing we found you before this Jasper fellow! It sounds like you were in trouble. Don’t worry, though. He won’t find you at Shelter.”

As Elyias tired to scream something incomprehensible, Blacknail stood up and ordered three of his minions to take the man back to their forest camp and keep him there. As they left, Blacknail wondered where the sock had come from…

“Why do you even want that loser?” Khita asked as she watched Elyias be carried off.

“He’s a friend! We can’t just leave him all alone in this dangerous city,” Blacknail explained as he nodded sagely. It was good to help your friends.

“Whatever, now that you’ve had your fun can we move on to something important?”

“Sure, let’s go meet up with Gerald and Beardy. When I’m not around for too long they get into trouble.”

The inn that Blacknail had last seen his human companions at was in a much better neighborhood on the other side of town from where they were, so it took a while to walk there. With the others gone, only three hobgoblins were left with them, so they didn’t draw too much attention as they walked along the main roads.

When they reached their destination, Blacknail left the other hobgoblins outside and entered through the front door with Khita. The place was mostly empty although there were still a few people around. Most of them seemed to be drinking and keeping to themselves, which suited Blacknail just fine.

“I’ll go up to their rooms. The innkeeper and his employees know me. You should stay down here,” Khita suggested.

“Fine, be quick.” Blacknail told her as he looked around for a good place to sit down.

He chose a table over in an isolated corner. There was no one else near it. As he sat down to wait, Khita walked up the stairs to the second story and out of sight. Blacknail sighed impatiently, but his boredom was quickly interrupted. A big man who had been drinking at a table across the room got up and wandered his way. He was more fat than muscle but his fists were almost the size of Blacknail’s head. It was amazinghow big some humans got.

“Do you think you’re so tough just because you’re wearing a fancy hood? It’s rude indoors, you know,” The huge man said as he glowered at the cloaked hobgoblin. His breath reeked of alcohol. “What, are you hiding your ugly mug? I think you must be a hideous bastard under that. ”

Blacknail sighed again and shook his head. “No, I think I’m tough because I’ve killed a hundred men like you.”

A knife appeared in the hobgoblin’s hand as he stood up. His motions were smooth and so frighteningly quick the man barely had time to react. Blacknail really wanted to work out some frustration by killing this dumb drunk, but that would draw too much attention. Instead, his blade lashed out at the man’s waist. Too quickly to follow, it sliced through cloth and leather while barely grazing the skin beneath.

“Huh?” the drunk remarked as his pants suddenly fell down.

“Leave or die,” Blacknail replied as he sat back down without concern.

The drunk stared at him for moment and then looked down. It took him moment to process what had happened, but when he figured it out he took a quick step back, almost tripped over his pants, and then hurriedly stumbled back to his table as he pulled his trousers back up. There were a few soft laughs from around the room.

Blacknail grunted in amusement as he leaned back in his chair. The incident had gotten the attention of a few people, but they didn’t do anything more than look his way and whisper among themselves. However, some of those whispers reached his ears and drew his attention. There were two men seated at a table across the room, and they were talking to each other while deliberately not looking in Blacknail’s direction. Both of them looked like any other thug off the street.

“Is that the hobgoblin?” one of them asked the other.

His companions whispered back, but Blacknail’s ears caught the reply. “Probably. It’s incredible that it can just walk around like this. Even knowing what to look for I can’t tell if it’s human or not from here.”

“If that’s it then we should go get the others. I’m not going to be getting close enough to peak under that hood, so there is no point in staying around.”

The second thug nodded in agreement, and then they both carefully got up and headed for the door. Blacknail studied them out of the corner of his eye as he pretended to watch the stairs. They knew, but how? Who were they and where had they learned about him? There was only way to find out. Blacknail rose to his feet and followed after the humans.

Once he was outside, he spotted a pair of his hobgoblin minions across the street where he had left them. They also noticed him right away, and he flashed them a quick series of hand signals. Upon receiving his orders, the hobgoblins studied the humans that had just left the inn and nodded back to Blacknail. They then slipped away into an alley and out of sight.

Blacknail waited a few moments, and then he began to trail his targets. He kept his head down and made sure there was always a group of people between him and the two men he was following, as he walked through the crowds that had come out to shop or work. People were walking and talking everywhere, and Blacknail did his best not to stand out as he kept an eye on his quarry.

Then a few moments later, the two men stepped away from the crowd. They walked over to the shadows near a closed shop and began talking amongst themselves, while occasionally scanning the crowd. Blacknail casually sauntered behind a colorful stall and out of sight. It seemed his targets were worried about being followed, but they were also apparently terrible at searching for pursuers. As Blacknail watched, three hobgoblins stepped out of the alley behind the men and dragged them into the shadows.

Blacknail grinned as he sprinted across the street after them. He slipped into the alley and was confronted by the sight of his minions holding the two men at knifepoint. The humans were holding very still and had their hands up above their heads. Both had hobgoblins behind them with blades pressed against their throats.

“Who are you and why were you looking for me?” Blacknail asked them as he stalked over to study them.

“We’re just pickpockets,” one of the men stammered.

“That’s a lie. Cut off one of his fingers. He has lots of them and if he is stubborn we can remove his toes as well,” Blacknail ordered the third hobgoblin that wasn’t holding anyone.

“Wait, no! I’ll tell you everything,” the thug quickly offered. Blacknail motioned for the man to continue talking and for his minion to put his knife away.

“Ahh, I wanted a human finger,” the hobgoblin whined.

The first thug wasted no time in spilling his secrets. It was actually impressive how fast he could talk. “We were sent here to look for the crew that attacked Cedric. Our boss thought that if we handled you then Werrick would reward us, or at least know we weren’t involved. He wanted to make sure you weren’t too much for his gang to swallow first though, so he sent us in to look around before committing the rest of the crew.”

“And how did you know who attacked Cedric or where I was?” Blacknail asked as he leaned forward to stare into the man’s eyes. He was shivering. They were only a few inches apart now, and Blacknail’s inhuman appearance obviously terrified him.

“Our boss paid an informant. They told him about you and they said that you were tied to a group of thieves that used to serve the Black Snake, before she got herself wasted. They also told us where to find them, at the inn.”

Blacknail growled and bared his teeth. “Do you have any proof of what you say?”

This development was very unwelcome. He had been planning on staying in the city for a while and gathering up a lot more supplies and information. If everyone knew who he was and where to find him that would be impossible.

“Um… I have this note from the dealer. It has your pals’ descriptions on it,” the first thug answered as he hurriedly pulled a folded piece of paper out of his pocket. The second man glared at him but kept quiet.

Blacknail took the note and unfolded it while everyone watched him. He took his time to study it carefully, but since he couldn’t read all the scribbles meant nothing to him. However, he recognized a very faint scent that clung to the paper. It smelled of exotic flowers. The scent tingled his nose and excited him.

“Kill the one that didn’t talk. Let the other go,” Blacknail told his minions.

The hobgoblins immediately obeyed. The second thug only had time to blink once before his throat was cut. The other stared at his dying companion in horror as the hobgoblin behind him backed off.

“Wha… why?” he asked in confusion.

“So that people know what happens when they go against me and what happens when they cooperate,” Blacknail answered dismissively as he turned to leave.

The thug stared after him for a second, and then sprinted away down the alley. Blacknail growled to himself as stomped off out into the street. He had some unwanted yet important things to deal with now. His human friends needed warned, and he needed to deal with a tattletale. This was going to be… complicated.













AFF 9












When Blacknail got back to the inn everyone was waiting for him. Geralhd, Khita, and Beardy were standing beside the table he’d been sitting at, and they looked upset. There was a scowl on Geralhd’s face and Beardy was grimacing. Blacknail walked over and nodded in greeting.

“Where did you go?” Khita asked. She only sounded slightly annoyed.

“I needed to follow some people and then kill one of them,” Blacknail explained.

Geralhd winced. “Uh, who?”

“Are you kidding?” Beardy asked as he threw his hands up in exasperation. “You’re supposed to be staying out of trouble.”

Blacknail shrugged. “He was a spy for someone who wanted to kill all of you.”

“What? Why would anyone want to kill us?” Beardy asked. He sounded like he didn’t believe Blacknail.

“That’s what I wanted to find out. When I asked, they said a whole bunch of Werrick’s men got themselves murdered and chopped up into little bits. They were looking for the people who did it, and someone saw you and remembered that you were Werrick’s enemy.”

“We’re not his enemies! Herad is dead and we don’t work for her anymore. We’re just minding our own business now. We certainly didn’t kill any of the Wolf’s men!”

“That doesn’t matter. They thought you were involved and were going to gather some friends so they could capture you for questioning,” Blacknail told him.

“It sounds like you had your reasons for wandering off, but I have to ask, did you kill Werrick’s followers,” Geralhd asked the hobgoblin.

Blacknail shook his head. “I’m just one small hobgoblin, smaller than a human. I don’t even have Elixir anymore, and almost a hundred men were killed. I couldn’t do that alone.”

Khita gave Blacknail a knowing look, but Geralhd and Beardy nodded along. On the way to the city, Blacknail’s hobgoblin minions had stayed back and out of sight of the human bandits. They had no idea that he’d brought them with him.

“Then who did do it?” Geralhd mused aloud.

Blacknail shrugged and suppressed a smirk. “Who knows? It’s a mystery.”

“The important thing to focus on is how this affects us,” Beardy pointed out. “If people think we’re involved in that mess then they are going to be come after us like hungry wolves.”

Geralhd nodded. “You’re right, of course. I don’t think we can just explain this away, no matter our innocence, especially now that Blacknail has intervened so aggressively.”

“I saved you,” Blacknail pointed out. He didn’t want there to be any confusion about that.

“Well, whatever happened, we can’t stay here,” Beardy remarked. “We need to get everyone up and leave this inn immediately, before anyone else comes to look for us.”

“Where will we go? Is anywhere in the city going to be safe?” Khita asked.

“I don’t know this city very well,” Geralhd admitted.

Blacknail perked up. “I do, I know this city very well! I’ve even met most the important people in it, some of them are even still alive. It’s the information dealers we need to watch out for. They know everyone and have eyes everywhere.”

“Is there anywhere we can hide from them?”

“I know a lot of abandoned houses we could hide in. There are a lot of dark places people never go in this city. They are dirty but dry,” Blacknail offered. He knew the humans were too picky to take him up on his offer. Geralhd in particular was a wimp.

As if to prove Blacknail right, Geralhd grimaced in disgust. “No thanks. It seems like we have no choice but to leave Daggerpoint.”

There was thud as Beardy slammed the table with a closed fist. “What! Where will we go? Werrick controls all the cities and towns around here. If he is looking for us then we’re screwed!”

Khita winked at Blacknail and then turned to Beardy. “He doesn’t even know about Shelter, let alone control it.”

“You want to go back to that mud pit? We just left! They probably don’t even want us there.”

“I don’t want to go back there anymore than you, the people there are a bunch of nosy hicks, but do we have a choice? There is nowhere else we can lay low until this blows over,” Khita shot back.

“We have money. We could buy proper supplies and gifts for them,” Blacknail suggested. “They would like us if we did that.”

“Some good wine would make the stay there much more tolerable,” Geralhd mused as he rubbed his chin. He sounded like he was considering the idea and warming up to it.

“I suppose it might not be a terrible place to hide out, as long as we bring our own supplies,” Beardy admitted.

“Tannin was always saying he needed a lot of metal tools. Bringing him some would make the villagers happy,” Blacknail pointed out. They would also serve his own purposes.

“True, but for a haul of that size we will need pack animals to carry it, like some horses,” Geralhd pointed out.

“No!” Blacknail hissed loudly. His voice was full of fury and disgust.

Khita rolled her eyes and Geralhd frowned.

“Why not?” Beardy asked in surprise.

“Horses can’t be trusted. They are vile smelly beasts. No horses will be going with us to Shelter!” Blacknail replied.

Geralhd sighed and gave Blacknail a confused look. “Your animosity towards simple animals is misplaced. Why do you hate them so much?”

Blacknail growled softly before replying. “When I look into their big stupid eyes I see their spirit, it is black and vile. They’re selfish beasts full of evil thoughts that enjoy peoples' pain.”

“That’s probably your reflection,” Khita remarked with a roll of her eyes.

Blacknail glared at her. “Nuh uh, no it’s not. You humans are just blind and stupid.”

There was a tired sigh from Beardy. “Fine whatever, we will use donkeys instead. You don’t have a problem with them, do you?”

“No?” Blacknail replied hesitantly. He had no idea what a donkey was, but he wasn’t going to admit it.

“If we’re going to be bringing donkeys we may as well grab some other animals,” Geralhd suggested. “I’m sure Tannin would appreciate some new stock, and it would improve the local menu as well.”

“Good idea, but this is starting to sound expensive. Can we afford all this?” Beardy asked.

“I have some money that I stumbled upon. You humans leave it everywhere,” Blacknail said as he placed a pouch on the table. The coins inside jingled as they moved. Blacknail hated parting with so many shiny bits, but he didn’t really use them for anything. He usually just ended up hiding them under rocks and stuff.

Geralhd opened up the bag and looked inside. “This will help a lot, but we will still have to watch what we buy.”

“I also have this,” Blacknail said as he placed a fist-sized object on the table. It was nugget of pure gold. There was silence as everyone stared at it.

“Where in all the hells did you get that?” Beardy asked. He sounded awed. Yellow rocks sure had a weird effect on humans.

“I found it in cave near Shelter,” Blacknail explained with shrug. It was a rock. Where did the humans think those came from?

“And you didn’t tell us?” Geralhd asked.

“It didn’t seem that important,” Blacknail explained.

Beardy gave Blacknail a greedy look and stroked his beard thoughtfully. “Was there more gold there?”

Khita sighed and spoke up. “We need to focus on leaving right now, remember? There are people after us.”

“Are we sure we couldn’t just buy all our enemies off?” Beardy asked as stared at the gold nugget.

Geralhd shook his head unhappily. “That probably wouldn’t work.”

“It really wouldn’t,” Blacknail agreed. It didn’t even make sense. Why wouldn’t they just take the money and then kill them for the rest?

“Fine, then that settles things. We need to get moving before anyone else shows up to look for us,” Geralhd remarked as he picked up the coin pouch and gold.

“Meet me at our last campsite outside the city at dusk,” Blacknail told everyone before turning to leave.

“Where are you going?” Geralhd asked.

“I need to meet with some people and cover our tracks,” Blacknail told them as he walked away.

As the door shut behind him, Blacknail smiled to himself. That had gone well. He hadn’t even really needed to convince them to do anything. With a little help from Khita, they had agreed on going back to Shelter without any input from him that might have seemed suspicious. Unfortunately, he had more unpleasant duties to attend to now.

After looking around the street to make sure there wasn’t anyone suspicious around, Blacknail headed off towards Luphera’s domicile. It had been her scent he’d detected on the letter, and the thugs had mentioned learning about him from an information broker. Luphera was a seller of secrets, and she probably knew more about him than any others that might be in the city. Blacknail growled as he stepped past a mother and child walking down the street. The conclusion was obvious, Luphera had betrayed him. She had put him and his friends in danger, and she had almost ruined his plans. That meant that Blacknail needed to deal with her. He couldn’t let anyone get away with betraying him, and even more importantly, she knew too much. If Luphera told Werrick everything she knew it would be a disaster. Blacknail had made sure not to tell her any of his plans, but he’d accidently let a few things slip. She had to be silenced.

As Blacknail walked down the street, he tried to figure out the best way of accomplishing his goal. Obviously, he needed to confront Luphera, however the last time he had tried to sneak into her place it hadn’t gone so well for him. She also had lots of guards, so fighting his way inside seemed like a lot of work. With Elixir a few humans wouldn’t be much of problem for him, but he didn’t have any more of it. Could he just walk in? Luphera’s servants might still have instructions to let him inside. That might be a trap, though. It was possible that she would lead him right into a room full of enemy soldiers. He wasn’t going to underestimate her. Should he go gather up some reinforcements? No, he didn’t have time for that.

Since all his other options seemed worse, Blacknail decided to take the risk and just ask to see Luphera. During his last visit, Luphera had given him instructions on how to meet with her, since he would make a scene if he went in through the front door. She had told him to go to the back door and knock, so that was what he did. He calmly sauntered around the building and into the empty alley behind it. There was no one around so he walked over to the door at the back of the building and knocked. After a few long seconds, the door swung open to reveal the older mustached man from his last visit. Both his clothes and his expression looked as unruffled as before as he quickly looked Blacknail over.

“I’m here to see Luphera,” Blacknail explained. He tried to sound friendly, but his rage made that difficult, and the man’s smug face annoyed him.

“Welcome. I will check and see if she is available. Please follow me,” the servant replied with a polite nod before turning around.

Blacknail cautiously followed the man deeper into the building. Neither of them said anything as they walked, and they kept to empty hallways and back rooms that were obviously used by servants and for storage. Only a single uniformed servant passed them by, and he gave Blacknail a quick glance and then hurried on his way. Eventually Blacknail’s guide stopped at a door.

“Please wait here a moment. I will be right back,” the man said with an apologetic smile. Blacknail nodded civilly back. He’d cooled down somewhat.

The mustached man then stepped through the doorway. Blacknail got a quick look at a larger and more lavish hallway on the other side before the door closed and he was left alone in the servant’s passage. He waited there for a minute or two until the door opened again.

“Just this way. The mistress is ready to see you,” his guide announced as he held the door open for Blacknail.

“Thank you,” the hobgoblin replied cheerfully as he stepped through the frame and out into the brightly lit and lavish hallway on the other side.

From there, it was only a few steps to another familiar door. Blacknail recognized it as the room where he’d met Luphera during his last visit. He tensed up as the mustached man glided over and opened the room’s door for him, as he had the others. Blacknail had been listening carefully and sniffing the air, but he sensed no signs of ambush. However, that didn’t mean there wasn’t one. Luphera had managed to surprise him more than once.

Gritting his teeth, Blacknail stepped through the door. He had come this far and wasn’t going to back down without a good reason. The room in front of him hadn’t changed at all. It was still warm, luxurious, and inviting. As before, Luphera was seated on a couch by the low table, but this time she gave off a more business-like impression. Her silk outfit had been exchanged for a proper blue dress that had long sleeves and went down to her ankles. The outfit still highlighted her bosom and the contours of her body, but it wasn’t at all playful looking.

“Blacknail, this is a surprise. I wasn’t expecting you back so soon,” Luphera remarked. Her back was straight and her hands were resting on her lap, so that she looked calm and collected.

“Good,” the hobgoblin replied as he looked around the room. He took a second to stare at the room that led off to the side, but nothing seemed out of place.

The unique flowery scent that Luphera wore still filled the room. After a few breaths Blacknail could feel it began to clog up his mind and quicken his pulse. However this time the scent had a slightly different result. His hidden yet roiling emotions skewed the perfume’s effects. His fury was only enhanced by lust. He wanted to taste blood, to rend flesh between his fingers and bite bone. Sex and violence weren’t so different if done right.

“Why don’t you come sit down and tell me why you’re here?” Luphera asked.

“One second. I’m just here to ask a quick question,” Blacknail replied as he turned back to look at the door he had come in through. The mustached man that had guided him here was still standing beside it.

Before anyone could react Blacknail lunged forward. He reached out, placed a hand on the servant’s head, and then pushed. Crack. The man’s head smashed into the wall behind him and he crumpled down to the ground. Blacknail smirked. Ah, that had been very satisfying. Gutting him would have felt even better, but Blacknail wasn’t sure he wanted to go that far yet.

“What! How dare you?” Luphera hissed as she jumped to her feet.

“He was annoying, but don’t worry. He will live, probably,” Blacknail replied as he turned to face her.

Luphera’s face was red with fury as she glared at the hobgoblin, but she flinched when he took a step towards her. There was a mad grin on Blacknail’s face that highlighted his bared teeth.

“What is the meaning of this?” Luphera stuttered as she fought to remain calm.

Blacknail pulled the note he had taken from the thugs out of his pocket and took another step forward. “You’ve been telling tales.”

“I don’t know what you’re talking about.”

The hobgoblin simply held the note out until Luphera took it.

“I see…” Luphera muttered as she read it. “And you think I had something to do with this?”

Blacknail growled softly as he met her gaze and stared intently into her eyes. “Did you?”

There was silence for several long seconds. Luphera was still, except for her eyes which moved as if she was thinking hard. Eventually she grimaced in distaste and looked away.

“Yes, I did. A powerful client came asking for information and I had to offer them something. I couldn’t just ignore them.”

“You betrayed me,” Blacknail hissed as he stepped forward and grabbed her wrist. She didn’t try to pull away. That and the fact that she hadn’t lied about her involvement allowed Blacknail to prevent himself from lashing out. Rage was still boiling beneath his skin. He didn’t like traitors, especially ones that targeted the people close to him.

“I don’t remember forming an alliance with you, and I’m certainly not your servant,” Luphera replied as she straightened up and her expression grew steely. “Our relationship is a mutually beneficial one, but also ultimately transactional.”

“You put my friends and minions in danger by telling my enemies where they were. If you are going to be working against me why shouldn’t I kill you?”

“I didn’t reveal anything you told me in confidence. You never even mentioned where your friends were staying to me. I learned of them through my own means, just as I would have learned who was responsible for Cedric’s death if I hadn’t already known you were the culprit. Little happens in this city that I don’t know about. Just because we are close that doesn’t mean I can afford to never work against you in any way. I’m running a business here after all, and I have duties to my other clients.”

Blacknail scowled and loosened his grip on Luphera’s arm slightly. This was confusing. Was she an enemy or not? Blackanil was fairly sure that she didn’t want him dead. She hadn’t revealed everything she knew about him, and she could have undoubtedly sent much more dangerous people after him than the two incompetents he had run into.

“What should I do with you then?” Blacknail mused softly to himself.

Luphera shrugged and gave Blacknail an annoyed look. It was an impressive display of bravery considering her position. The hobgoblin’s long nails were digging into her arm and his teeth were practically in her face.

“Nothing. Aside from all the fun we’ve had together, if you harm me in any way I won’t work with you ever again. I’m your best source of information and have helped you several times. You need me. So what if we sometimes work at cross purposes? You’re a big boy. I’m sure you can handle yourself.”

Luphera was making a weird sort of sense. It wasn’t like she had ever promised to be his ally. They had simply exchanged information. Still, Blacknail knew she was twisting the truth. He could see it in her eyes. There was something about this situation that he wasn’t seeing. Giving bits of information about him to his enemies had been part of a plan of some sort. But what had it been? Had she been trying to separate him from his allies? Maybe she wanted to force him out of town for her own reasons? Blacknail didn’t know. He wished he had some Elixir. If he could taste her fear then he might be able to figure out what she was playing at.

“If you’re just going to stand there all day, why don’t we relax a little?” Luphera remarked as she slowly stepped forward so that one of her legs went through Blacknail’s legs and brushed up gently against his groin.

Blacknail twitched and let her arm go before stepping back. “No, you’ve answered my question, and your advice is as good as ever. I’ll be leaving.”

The hobgoblin turned and stalked out the room, past the unconscious servant on the floor. Luphera was a confusing distraction right now. Killing her would be a waste, and anything short of that would be... unproductive. The only option seemed to be to be more careful of her in the future.

Right now, he needed to meet up with Geralhd and the others and head back to Shelter, where he was beyond Luphera's reach. The tools they were bringing would be very useful, and with the information Blacknail had learned here in Daggerpoint he could begin the next phase of his plan to defeat the Wolf.









INT: BTW







The room was silent as Edic watched his boss read the message that he’d just delivered. Werrick was standing behind a desk, and there was a scowl on his face that revealed carefully contained fury. It only got worse as he continued to read.

Edic glanced off to the side where Zelena was sitting in a chair. The beautiful but cold blonde woman looked relaxed as she patiently waited for her master to finish. Edic was less sanguine about the present situation. He didn’t like being put on the spot when his boss was angry. Although Werrick had a reputation for fairness, he could be very intimidating. He was a huge man and famed for his martial prowess. You didn’t keep several small armies of outlaws in line by being non-violent. Edic was used to being around dangerous people, but Werrick was different. He wasn’t a noble and he didn’t follow the chivalric code. Edic was the last son of a now deceased knight from lands near the border. He was a knight himself, even if his lands were worth almost nothing but the title they granted. He had seen which way the winds of fortune were blowing and decided to forswear the king who had never done anything for his family and offer his services to the rising power.

“This is an unwelcome development,” Werrick observed in a frosty tone as he finally looked up from the piece of paper.

“Yes, sir” Edic replied neutrally. He wanted to draw as little attention to himself as possible. He was just the messenger.

“Have you read this?”

Edic flinched and tried to hide it. “Yes, sir. I have. That’s why I brought the report to your attention right away.”

Werrick’s scowl grew deeper. “My subordinates have been slaughtered, and worse, there is absolutely nothing I can do about it. The perpetrators are long gone and have escaped into the forest. Sending men out into the deep Green to follow a hobgoblin sounds like a great way to never see those men ever again. This entire mess makes me look weak and foolish. Cedric’s position was an important one. Having him in Daggerpoint reminded all the local bandits of my power and control. I need them to fear me. There are too many for me to fight all at once.”

“We can send out orders for everyone to be on their guard, and Cedric can be replaced with ease,” Edic quickly responded. “The hobgoblin will have a much harder time getting into a properly fortified building full of men that are waiting for him. We can adapt to this tactic with ease. It won’t work again. Cedric was lazy and arrogant.”

Werrick huffed. “That’s what I like about you, Edic. You’re constructive. That’s one of the better traits to have in lieutenants, I believe.”

“I’m simply trying to do my best to serve,” Edic replied stiffly as he stood straight.

“And you do a good job of it,” Werrick admitted with sour grin. “Send out the order, and make sure everyone is on the lookout for hobgoblins. If he isn’t afraid to strike at the center of a city then anyone out on the road should be extra vigilant.”

“Immediately, sir.”

“Of course, that only helps us reduce the damage of any further attacks. It doesn’t deal with the actual heart of the problem.”

“As you said, going after the hobgoblin would be difficult. He could be anywhere out in the Green, and he undoubtedly knows it far better than we do,” Edic agreed.

Werrick sighed regretfully. “Mahedium warned me about this hobgoblin, and it appears he was right. I thought he was being paranoid, but I was wrong. I admit it. I will have to summon him so we can discuss what he knows about this Blacknail.”

“You want to meet with him directly instead of just communicating via letter?”

“I don’t trust that mage to be completely forthcoming unless it’s in person. I’ve rarely met anyone as secretive as him.”

From off to the side, Zelena finally joined the conversation. “I agree, lord. It is important you question the mage face to face. He has no allegiance to you beyond convenience. He also won’t want to leave his work. The Broken Wheel has supplied him with a lab and all the toys he could ever want.”

Werrick scowled again. “I don’t care what he wants. This comes first. Having magic support is nice, but I can do without any new mana stones. The hobgoblin is much more of a concern. If we can’t hunt him down, my first instinct is to set a trap for him, but I know too little about him right now. What does he want?”

“He’s a hobgoblin. They are little more than beasts. He probably just struck out at random,” Edic said.

Werrick shook his head. “I don’t think so. Mahedium said that the hobgoblin’s inhuman intelligence was a threat. The death of Cedric might be only a minor blow against me, but considering the strength of our opponent, it’s one of the best opening moves he could have made.”

“Surely that was just luck? I have a hard time seeing a savage like him coming up with a grand strategy.”

“Underestimating him again would be a mistake. Don’t forget that after my victory over Herad most the troops sent after the group he was with didn’t come back, and we’ve lost several other groups of bandits in that area that pledged themselves to me. No, we can’t underestimate him. I sense a pattern unfolding. This hobgoblin is going to be a dangerous opponent, maybe my most dangerous.”

“I’m sure you’re right, sir,” Edic replied. He didn’t necessarily agree, but knew better than to challenge his boss when he’d already made up his mind.

“I usually am,” Werrick agreed with a grin. “Was there anything else you wanted to bring to my attention?”

Edic took a second to think and coughed to clear his throat. “There has still been no progress in opening communication with anyone to the west, and we lost another scout. Neither the lords nor the outlaws out there care much about what goes on here in the eastern lands.”

“No one even wants to talk?” Werrick asked. He sounded slightly surprised.

“They just want to keep to themselves. As per your orders, we’re trying to find someone powerful there to negotiate and ally with, but usually they just kill the messenger for trespassing or speaking with the wrong accent.”

Zelena spoke up again. “That’s not surprising. Since this continent was settled, the West has always been a dark and wild place. They’ve never had kings or any central authority out there on the edge. Every hill is ruled by its own paranoid little lord, and they are always fighting each other, with the occasional break to oppress the peasants. Not that the common folk are any better. They’re just as vicious and insular.”

“We can’t even find any half decent maps of the place,” Edic agreed. “It’s all just hamlets and tiny forts out in the forest. Half of them are probably abandoned by now. Hells, they may all be. There might only be a few villages left west of Eloria. It’s impossible to tell because they bloody keep to themselves and there are no real roads. Look at what is happened here in the North, everything is collapsing, and they’ve been dealing with this sort of chaos for over a century.”

“You have a good point, but the difference is that they’ve always been like this,” Zelena told him. “I think they never would have settled out there in the first place if they couldn’t survive, or they would have died off long ago anyway. Don’t forget, the far West was settled all in one big wave from the Homelands, and there have always been dark rumors about the nobles that rule them.”

“I don’t know much about that. I’m not a scholar, but I don’t put much faith in old monster stories,” Edic replied respectfully.

Zelena chuckled. “And yet our current problems center around a monster from times long past.”

“Regardless, it might be best to just leave the West alone,” Werrick admitted. “We have problems enough already it seems. Inviting more would be foolhardy. Outside of the occasional raid or trading caravan, the people of the West haven’t had anything to do with East for a century, so I doubt we need to worry about them.”











TNT 1












The winding path before Blacknail ran through the tall trees, past the bushes at their edge, and out into the midday sunlight. The hobgoblin followed the trail and stepped out onto the top of a hill. Immediately, he was confronted by the sight of a valley surrounded by forested hills. Within the valley lay a crude looking village. It had been a long journey, but Blacknail had finally gotten back from Daggerpoint.

From atop the hill, Blacknail could see over the settlement’s walls. He frowned thoughtfully. What he saw within them surprised him a little. The large clearing was still full of rocky hills, but the amount of buildings around them had more than doubled. Black smoke rose up into the sky from several chimneys. The older longhouses made from woven branches and bark were still standing, but now there were plenty of buildings made from mud bricks and large felled logs. There were only a few areas within the walls left clear of construction, but an odd sight caught Blacknail’s eye. There was a crater where a longhouse had used to be. Had there been an accident? One lost building wouldn’t be so bad. Blacknail had actually been expecting to find half of the place on fire when he got back.

Looking over a bit, Blacknail saw that the forest outside the settlement had also been pushed back almost a hundred feet. A lot of that ground was still filled with tree stumps but some of the soil looked like it had been torn up and cleared of rocks and plants. Blacknail knew the trees had probably been cut down for firewood, but he wasn’t sure why the ground had been cleared. Maybe Gob was just trying to keep the goblins busy?

“How many goblins live here now?” Blacknail muttered to himself. Feeding them all might be difficult come winter, and he knew a lot of the little green pests were free riding of all his hard work, even if it was hard to find out which goblins those were. They all claimed to be hard workers…

Scamp interrupted Blacknail’s thoughts. “Dunno. Lots.”

The other hobgoblin walked up beside Blacknail and peered over at the settlement. There were several other hobgoblins behind him.

“I wasn’t asking you,” Blacknail replied dismissively as he began walking down the hill.

After dropping off Geralhd and the others at Shelter, Blacknail had met up with the hobgoblins that had been following them in secret and headed here. Most of the hobgoblins were carrying piles of tools such as axes or shovels. A lot of gear had been dropped off at Shelter but Blacknail had kept some for his own use. In particular the steel-headed axes would be useful for chopping down trees in order to build and provide firewood. Stone axes just weren’t anywhere near as good.

“And now I’m back here in this dirty death trap,” Elyias moaned from the back of the group. He was carrying a particularly large heap of tools.

Since Elyias was known as a thief and a traitor, he had stayed with the hobgoblins instead of travelling with the humans, although Blacknail hadn’t actually given him any other option.

“You’re safer here than practically anywhere else,” Blacknail told him.

“There is a difference between living and surviving. One of them has ale and women.”

Blacknail smirked at Elyias. “You can’t have either if you’re dead, but don’t worry, soon we will be having lots of fun!”

Elyias sighed despondently, but Avorlus spoke up. “This is where your mage is? The young fool is right, it doesn’t look like much. Although I don’t know what I was expecting.”

Blacknail scowled at the mage’s words. He was rather proud of the goblin settlement. It had taken a lot of hard work to create it out in the forest. Avorlus was just being miserable. He had journeyed with Geralhd and the others to Shelter, but he had demanded to go with Blacknail and meet his mage at the goblin settlement right away, even though the long journey from Daggerpoint had tired his old body out. On the way here Avorlus had found out that the mage he was looking for was a hobgoblin, but he still wanted the knowledge Blacknail said he had.

There was activity at the gate they were walking toward so Blacknail turned to observe it. Several goblins ran off as two hobgoblins stepped forward with raised spears. Blacknail didn’t recognize either of them.

“Stop! Who are you?” one of them yelled towards the approaching hobgoblins.

“I’m Blacknail, your leader,” Blacknail shouted back in an annoyed tone. They should really know this already. He was important.

“Really?” one of the guards replied uncertainly.

Blacknail glared t him. “Yes.”

“He’s Blacknail all right,” Scamp added helpfully. There was a moment of silence from the guards as they turned to regard each other.

“I thought Gob made him up,” one of them remarked to the other quietly.

“Don’t be an idiot. I always knew he was real,” his companion replied before turning toward Blacknail.

“You may come in!” he announced.

Blacknail huffed as he walked past the guards. “I know I can come in. I’m the leader and we outnumber you.”

The targets of his ire didn’t respond. They wisely kept silent and got out of the way. The wall in front of Blacknail was made from a row of long wooden stakes that rose up from the earth. They were tied together for extra strength and their tips had been sharpened to make them hard to climb or jump over. The gate through them was just a gap for people to walk through, which Blacknail’s group promptly did.

“Let’s go see Gob,” Blacknail informed his minions as he looked around the settlement. He wanted backup in case something unexpected happened.

After a few seconds, Blacknail spotted Gob’s old home and began walking over to it. It was one of the earliest branch longhouses, and a quick inspection revealed no sign of Gob, just half a dozen goblins that quickly ran off. Blacknail was just about to check the next longhouse when Gob appeared with two other hobgoblins behind him. Gob was the first hobgoblin that had joined Blacknail and he had been left in charge of the settlement while Blacknail was gone. Gob was very loyal but Blacknail was still a little nervous. He had been gone for a long time, and hobgoblins weren’t known for their patience or subservience.

“Welcome back, great one!” Gob exclaimed joyfully as he bowed his head.

Blacknail’s posture relaxed a little. Gob sounded very sincere. It was hard for a hobgoblin to fake happiness like that. “You seem to have done an alright job here in my absence,”

“You commanded me to keep the food stores full and make sure everyone behaved, so I have done so, lord.”

“Are you feeding all these goblins?” Blacknail asked. On the way in they had passed what must have been a hundred goblins.

“Yes, many of them work in the human fields for food, and I have started a few plantings of my own outside the walls.”

“I brought some tools that will help you with that,” Blacknail replied. “Did you run into any problems while I was gone?”

Gob shook his head. “There were a few young hobgoblins that refused to listen to your teachings, so I killed them.”

“You seem to have left plenty alive,” Blacknail observed. He had seen quite a few new faces as he’d strolled through the settlement. Blacknail wasn’t sure he really wanted so many hobgoblin minions. They were hard to control.

“You are a great leader, the more minions you have the higher your own stature!”

“True…” Blacknail mused aloud. He hadn’t really considered it that way before. Gob was making a fair amount of sense, but Blacknail was curious about one thing. “What happened to the longhouse over there?”

“Great one. I lack your power and good looks, so several hobgoblins began planning against you while you were gone. They thought themselves better than you, so I had Imp blow their house up while they were sleeping.”

“Don’t worry. I probably would have done the same thing. That sounds like it was fun,” Blacknail admitted with a smile.

“Thank you, master. May I ask who this new person is?” Gob asked as he looked toward Avorlus.

“A mage that can make some important stuff for me.”

Gob frowned. “He still has his clothes.”

Avorlus sputtered loudly and gave Blacknail an irritated look. The hobgoblin sighed.

“He’s not a prisoner,” Blacknail quickly said before leaning in close to Gob and whispering. “But make sure he doesn’t leave the camp without permission.”

Blacknail then coughed and stepped back. “I also have a bunch of tools I brought from the human city, find somewhere safe to put them. I don’t want any stupid goblins stealing them.”

“Rolly will take care of that. He has done a good job being in charge of the food storage,” Gob replied as he motioned toward a fat hobgoblin standing beside him.

“Make sure they are kept clean and ready for use. I don’t want them getting dull or rusty,” Blacknail added.

Rolly was one of the first local hobgoblins that had transformed. He had looked a little chubby even then, and he’d only grown thicker since. He wasn’t quite human fat, but he had a noticeable pot belly and was the widest looking hobgoblin Blacknail had ever seen. Still, Rolly had always struck Blacknail as clever enough to stay out of trouble, so he probably wasn’t a bad choice to look after the supplies, even if he did eat more than his share of them.

“Yes, boss. I will keep them safe and ready for use,” Rolly replied with a sloppy salute. When Blacknail nodded back, he then led the hobgoblins that were carrying gear off deeper into the camp.

“Since that seems like everything important, I’m going to go take a nap,” Blacknail said as he turned to look off towards where his cave lay. It had been a while since he had slept in his bed here and he wanted to get reacquainted with it.

Gob frowned. “I wouldn’t dare tell you what to do, but I was planning on holding a meeting for all the hobgoblins. Too many of them have never seen their glorious leader, and that is unacceptable.”

“Alright, I’m going to nap for a bit. Get me when you’re ready.”

Gob winced. “Sorry, boss. I got excited and already sent out minions to gather everyone. They should be ready in just a few minutes.”

“Fine, let’s get it over with then,” Blacknail groaned. It was probably a good idea to make sure everyone knew he was in charge, especially if it only took a few minutes.

“I think I’d like to skip this little event and meet with your mage already. I want to see if this hobgoblin really can make mana stones. If he does then this little jaunt won’t have been a complete waste of my time.”

Since there was no reason to keep Avorlus around, Blacknail led him and the hobgoblins on a detour toward Imp’s hut. Once there, Imp began a demonstration of his knowledge that involved several glass beakers and a lot of incomprehensible muttering. Avorlus frowned at the primitive surroundings and scavenged tools, but he quickly became enraptured by what Imp was saying and doing. Everyone else found staring at boiling liquids mind numbingly boring, so they stepped outside.

Blacknail was just about to suggest going to the meeting, when an unfamiliar hobgoblin walked over to him and waved in greeting. He was tall and thin with an unhealthy grey cast to his skin. His dark hair was very short and fuzzy, like it had been cut or burned off and only recently regrown.

“Who are you?” Blacknail asked in confusion. Most hobgoblins didn’t wave. That was a human thing.

“I’m Ferrar,” the hobgoblin replied in an equally perplexed tone as he quickly dropped his hand and stopped waving.

“Oh, right.” Blacknail saw the resemblance now, although it was hard to recognize him since he wasn’t standing next to a fire. “Have you come to pay respects to your great leader?”

Ferrar looked uncertain. “Er, yes. Congratulations on doing all the wonderful things that you did while you were gone to the place you went…”

“Thank you, congratulations on becoming a hobgoblin!”

Ferrar tapped the side of his head. “The better thoughts make it easier to figure out how to burn things.”

“Probably,” Blacknail replied. “Is that everything you wanted? I’m a little busy right now.”

“Hmmm, I wanted to ask you for something, boss.”

“What?” Blacknail asked. He was willing to bet it had something to do with fire.

“There are secrets that the humans have that I want.”

“Ask the villagers. They are supposed to share that sort of stuff with us now.”

“They don’t know! I need to learn from other humans that live somewhere else.”

“What are we talking about?”Blacknail asked as he frowned in puzzlement.

“Making the shiny metals. My fire doesn’t burn them enough! The humans here only know how to repair metal things. None of them can take iron from the ground and make new tools out of them!”

“Why do you want to do that? It’s easy enough to take metal things from humans,” Blacknail replied. The world was full of easily hunted humans with useful items.

Ferrar’s eyes seemed to glow with fervor. “I don’t want to take. I want to make a furnace that will melt iron and cleanse it. It will be bigger and hotter than any of the fires I have made yet, but I will tame its flames and create so many wonderful new things with its power!”

“I’ll keep an eye out for such a human,” Blacknail replied carefully, before taking a step back.

Ferrar was a very useful minion, if a little intense at times. Even as a goblin he’d been one of the most productive of Blacknail’s subordinates. Almost all the pottery was made under his direction and he was the best at crafting it, so keeping him happy would be worth a little effort. Building a new furnace to smelt iron would also keep him busy and hopefully out of trouble.

Now that Ferrar was done talking, Gob walked up and addressed Blacknail. “Most your minions should have gathered by now.”

“Let’s go then. I’m getting tired,” Blacknail replied with yawn.

With a respectful nod, Gob led Blacknail over to the largest open space inside the settlement. It was usually used for training, but someone had built a raised platform over on one side of it. To get to it the group had to pass by a crowd. Quite a few hobgoblins and goblins had gathered for the meeting. There looked to be almost a hundred hobgoblins and countless goblins. Once he reached the top of the podium, Blacknail took a second to look down at them. It was a little intimidating. There were so many eyes on him, and the idea of there being a hundred hobgoblins in one place was unreal. The idea that he would want to be anywhere near them was even weirder. Why weren’t they killing each other?

“They seem well behaved,” Blacknail remarked uncertainly to Gob.

Gob beamed proudly back. “I’ve been training them the way you taught me, and only those that learn are allowed to live. They practice with swords and to control their rage and hunger almost every day. Your ideas did this, wise one. Your genius knows no bounds! We are a mighty tribe now.”

Blacknail frowned as he looked over the hobgoblins. “Where do they all live?”

“Every longhouse has a small group of hobs that control it,” Gob explained. “The strongest rules the home and all the goblins that live there. Each longhouse is like a small tribe within a tribe, except they all serve their glorious leader, you.”

Blacknail still had a hard time seeing them all getting along. Even disciplined hobgoblins would find reasons to brawl. “Do they fight or steal from each other much?”

“Stealing from other longhouses is not allowed, by your orders. You have told me many times that stealing is bad, so I killed the thieves for you. Now they only steal small things and are very sneaky about it.”

“Yes, I am very smart for thinking of that. What about fighting?”

“Sometimes they fight, but they know what is allowed and what isn’t, only small murders not big ones.”

Blaknail nodded along thoughtfully. “Ah, that makes sense.”

Since Blacknail had no more questions, Gob stepped up to the edge of the platform and raised his arms. From somewhere off to the side someone blew a horn. The deep echoing sound rolled over the green crowd, and they all fell silent and looked towards the stage. Blacknail stared back. What was this now?

“Listen, brothers and sisters! Our magnificent chieftain has returned from his battle with our enemies. He has brought many spoils and bathed in the blood of the fallen. We are victorious! All praise to Blacknail the undefeated!”

The gathered goblins and hobgoblins immediately roared their approval by screaming at the top of their lungs. Their raised voices seemed to tear the air and explode out into the forest. Blacknail had to catch his balance and shake off the effect of the screaming. It felt like his skull was vibrating. When Gob had mentioned a meeting Blacknail had been picturing something smaller and a lot less noisy.

Gob then lowered his arms and stepped out of the way. The eyes of the crowd instantly all focused on Blacknail. He gulped and froze for second. He didn’t know what to say, and then he remembered that his audience were hobgoblins. He was a hobgoblin, so he knew them, even if he didn’t like them. You just had to tell them what they wanted to hear.

Blacknail stepped forward and yelled at the crowd. “Once we were weak and small. Once we feared the jaws of trolls and the claws of harpies, but no longer! I have slain these beasts. Follow me and you will never fear anything in the forest ever again. Serve me and food will be plentiful and your nights warm. You who stand before me are the strongest and the smartest. Serve me and we shall take the world as our own. Blood will flow and the hunt will last forever. I cannot be beaten!”

There was another frenzy of excited screaming from the mob. Hobgoblins were jumping up into the air and waving their arms. Even the goblins were getting into it, although Blacknail didn’t think most of them had any idea what was going on. They just liked shouting. The massed energy infected Blacknail and he found himself grinning crazily at the ranks of minions before him as they cheered for their glorious leader. He felt invincible and fulfilled, like a king. Maybe hobgoblins weren’t so bad.










TNT 2











The darkness of night enveloped Blacknail. Off in the murk, insects chirped and an owl hooted forlornly. Blacknail was leaning up against a tree and studying a distant source of light. Through the trees and down a hill, someone had lit a campfire. This was the deep Green. Humans didn’t camp out here unless they were very brave or very lost.

“Is that the man you are looking for?” Scamp asked. A dozen hobgoblins and two humans stood behind Blacknail.

“It’s a little too far away to tell,” Blacknail answered disdainfully. What a dumb question.

Khita stepped forward. “This is the right place. The villagers we asked said he was out here. Although, I guess they could have been lying. They were mucking hostile, like everyone else in this dumb place.”

“Let’s go see if it’s him,” Blacknail said as he began walking forward.

Blacknail and his followers had travelled west for weeks to get here. They had come to find one of the few famous bandits that still hadn’t allied with Werrick. There weren’t many holdouts according to what Blacknail had learned from Luphera, but they were far from Werrick’s territory here.

It had taken Blacknail a few days to rest after getting back from Daggerpoint. He had used that time to study all the changes that had taken place in the goblin camp and to plan for this excursion. There were a lot of new hobgoblins to intimidate and new building to explore. He had also visited Shelter and met with Tannin. The villagers had thrown him a feast! They had been grateful for all the gifts he’d brought them from Daggerpoint, especially the two cows. However, Blacknail had to leave and head east to fulfill the next stage of his plan.

After reaching the town of Westwatch, Blacknail’s group had resupplied and asked around. The people there had been more than willing to discuss the bandit chief that both raided the area and occasionally sent people to buy supplies there. Humans were weird. However, in the next village they had reached the people hadn’t been willing to talk to strangers. They had practically run Elyias and Khita out of town. Blacknail had thus been forced to track down the Red Hand himself, and their quarry had proven elusive.

“What do you want us to do?” A hobgoblin asked as he fell in behind his chieftain.

Blacknail kept walking. “Sneak around and take out any sentries you find, but don’t hurt them unless you have to, and don’t reveal yourselves. Anyone who gets caught will get a kicking.”

“Yes, boss,” the hobgoblin responded as he and several others dashed off into the shadows.

Soon, Blacknail reached the bushes at edge of the light. He hid among the leaves as he studied the figures around the fire. There were easily over thirty humans in the camp. Several had set up tents but most of them were sleeping under the outstretched branches of trees. Around half a dozen of them were still awake and moving around, most of whom were sitting around the fire.

Blacknail’s eyes were drawn to one man in particular. He sat alone, and Blacknail smelled leadership on him. Not with his nose, but with his instincts. It was obvious this man was the boss. Everyone else made sure to give him space, and they kept glancing at him out of the corner of their eyes, as if they were worried he would disapprove of something they were doing.

There was no doubt as to the nature of the men in the camp. These were Blacknail’s kind of people, bandits. Each of them was armed and they swaggered around like they owned the space they walked through and were daring someone else to say otherwise. In fact, most of them were better armed than Herad’s men had been. Blacknail saw several steel breastplates and bits of heavier armor.

Blacknail smiled. “Alright, let’s go introduce ourselves, Elyias. Everyone else stay here and watch.”

Elyias flinched. “What? Why me?”

“Ya, why him?” Khita asked. “I want to go.”

Blacknail rolled his eyes. Thankfully, he knew how to handle the young redhead. “No, you stay here. I need minions who can fight to cover my escape path. Use your bows if things get violent or if I give the signal.”

The hobgoblins nodded and the ones with bows readied them. Khita wasn’t happy about the orders, but she didn’t raise any more objections, and she stayed put with the rest of the hobgoblins when Blacknail and Elyias stepped out of the bushes.

At first no one in the human camp noticed them, and those that did dismissed them, but then someone realized they were out of place. By this time, Blacknail and Elyias were almost to the fire and had passed through half the camp unseen.

“Wait. Who are you two?” a tall man near the fire exclaimed as he jumped to his feet and drew his weapon.

“Intruders?” another bandit asked as he looked up. There was a nervous look on his face.

As all the nearby men reacted, Blacknail strode a few feet closer and then came to a stop. The bandit leader calmly leaned back and studied the newcomers. He was of average build and height, but he had a heavy presence. His shoulder length black hair had been slicked back and his eyes were hard and cold. They reminded Blacknail of Herad’s eyes, except they seemed gloomier, and also they were red. That was an unusual color for a human. Blacknail wondered if it meant something.

“You have a lot of guts to just walk in here,” the bandit leader remarked evenly. He didn’t seem concerned about their presence or even all that interested.

As Elyias trembled, Blacknail shrugged. “Thanks for the compliment. I came to speak with the leader of these bandits.”

“And what makes you think that we won’t just murder you?” a bandit asked.

“Because arrows kill people,” Blacknail replied as he signaled to the hobgoblins in the woods with a hand gesture.

Two arrows instantly burst out of the darkness and slammed into the ground beside the fire. Bandits swore and scrambled away from the impact site. Even Elyias flinched and he’d known they were coming.

“I’m not afraid of arrows,” the bandit leader observed. Blacknail believed him. He hadn’t even flinched. His cold eyes just studied the arrows for a moment and then moved back to Blacknail.

“So what is it that you want?” the leader asked.

Blacknail poked Elyias’ shoulder hard. This was his job! Elyias’ face was pale as a sheet. He sputtered and then quickly began reciting the speech Blacknail had ordered him to memorize.

“My master, Blacknail, is a notorious and terrible killer. He is a powerful bandit lord from the east and he demands a meeting of equals, so that he may discuss matters of grave importance with the bandit chief known as the Red Hand."

“And where is this master of yours?” the man known as the Red Hand asked. He looked and sounded annoyed.

“I’m right here,” Blacknail answered.

The man frowned and looked the hobgoblin over again. “Really? You’re a little odd, aren’t you?”

“True, a lot of people say things like that about me, some of them even more than once, but it’s usually because of my skin color,” Blacknail said as he lowered his hood. “I think most of them are just jealous of my handsome nose.”

There was a moment of shocked silence as all the bandits took in Blacknail’s face. It was green, and it definitely belonged to a hobgoblin.

“Hells, what is that?” someone cursed. There was muttering from several more men as they flinched away or reached for weapons.

“This is a new twist,” the leader said as he stood up. “None of the other messengers have been hobgoblins.” He looked interested now.

“I’m not anyone’s servant or lackey. I’m a leader,” Blacknail huffed. “I also haven’t sent any messengers.”

“A man representing the Wolf showed up. I killed him,” the black-haired chief replied with cruel smile. Blacknail couldn’t help but notice that he had rather long and pointy teeth for a human.

Blacknail stood tall and smiled back to show off his own impressive teeth. They were even pointier. “Good, I hate that guy. That’s one of the things I wanted to talk to you about, killing him together. Also, what should I call you? The Red Hand sounds silly.”

“My name is sir Ilisti Vang. You may address me that way, hobgoblin. This sudden interest in me from people in the east puzzles me. Why now?”

Blacknail shrugged. “Things are changing. Werrick wants to become king of the North, while everyone in the South is too busy fighting to stop him. Also, there is me. I’m doing some stuff.”

“The Silent Reaches change little. It has stayed much the same over the centuries. It was set up that way by the original settlers.”

“That’s this place?” Blacknail asked. He’d never heard that name before.

“That’s what we westerners call our lands. It is a place of refuge for exiles. We don’t much like outsiders - such as you - prying into our business.”

“Well, I’m not here to pry into your embarrassing secrets. I just want to help you make friends, conquer new lands, and kill the Wolf.”

Ilisti looked skeptical. “Why would I want to ally with you? Are you offering me anything more than vague promises?”

Ah, a negotiation. Blacknail scratched the side of his head. He didn’t have a lot of practice with these, except for the ones where he offered not to kill people in return for material reward.

“I’m a great ally. You help me and then I’ll help you kill your enemies. I’m the most dangerous killer in the world, and I have a lots of hobgoblin minions. We could have killed half your men before you knew we were here and then slipped away into the night.”

“And you think I need your help to slay some enemy you imagine I have?” Ilisti asked as he crossed his across his chest.

Blacknail’s grin deepened. “I know enough about humans to understand that they don’t like hanging out in forests with dirty clothes and almost no women around. You’re here because you have a powerful enemy.”

A hint of smile appeared on the man’s face. “That’s a fair enough point.”

“I have lots of points. Now, how can I help you? Who is this man that needs to be murdered?”

Ilisti frowned and rubbed his chin. His posture relaxed as he fell into thought. Warily, Blacknail watched him. The hobgoblin had been smiling and talking freely, but something about the man in front of him put him on edge. His scent was a little off, and he reeked of blood.

Without warning, Ilisti lunged forward. His blade flew free of his scabbard and sliced toward Blacknail’s face. Blacknail jerked backwards and burned a bit of Elixir he had ingested back in the forest. The sword’s tip barely missed his nose as he drew his own blade. It slid free just in time for him to block Ilisti’s next attack, however Blacknail was slightly off balance and the strength of the blow knocked him backwards an inch. He grimaced and desperately shifted his weight in preparation for the next blow, but it didn’t come. Cautiously, Blacknail held his sword up high in a guard.

“Not bad. I was expecting worse,” Ilisti remarked as he took a step back and sheathed his weapon. “You’re even faster than you look and certainly stronger than your scrawny frame suggests.”

“You're fast for such a fatty,” Blacknail hissed back as he lowered his blade slightly. He didn’t like being surprise attacked. That was his thing.

Ilisti smiled. “It was a test, nothing more. I wanted to see if you were as formidable as you claimed you were.”

“It was rude,” Blacknail replied.

“So it was. I apologize. It has been a while since I entertained proper guests.”

All the nearby bandits were on their feet now and several had drawn weapons. Ilisti turned to them and motioned them away. “Give us some space. I wish to talk to the hobgoblin alone.”

“As you wish, sir,” the closest man replied. All the bandits then bowed and hurried away, leaving Blacknail alone with Ilisti at the fire, except for a still frozen Elyias. Blacknail waved him away, and he ran off into the forest.

“I believe we were discussing our enemies,” Ilisti said as he sat back down.

“You first,” Blacknail replied as he also took a seat across the fire. He was still wary.

“Very well, you were right. I do have a powerful enemy. I was not always a landless exile. In my youth I was heir to my family’s ancestral lands, but a powerful neighboring noble stole my birthright. My family’s blood sworn knights fled the castle with me while my father bought them time.”

“And you want me to kill this noble?”

Much to Blacknail’s chagrin, Ilisti laughed. “You would find that difficult. I don’t doubt your might or skill, Blacknail, but my enemy is an ancient Vympir. His wounds heal in seconds and he is strong enough to rip a man in half. It is said his gaze can kill, that the darkness obeys him, and that he once killed a troll with his bare hands.”

That did sound difficult, and it raised some important questions. Blacknail sniffed the air and frowned as an unusual but familiar earthy scent filled his nostrils. “He’s a mutant, like you.”

“That is a rather unflattering way to describe the hallowed power granted by the ancient blood, but not completely inaccurate,” Ilisti admitted with shrug of his shoulders.

“If you don’t want my help killing your enemy then what do you want?” Blacknail hadn’t known that humans could become mutants. Could hobgoblins? Suddenly, he had a lot of questions that need answered.

As he leaned back, Ilisti sighed dramatically. “There is nothing for me here in the West. With what remains of my Bloodsworn, I have spent years surviving on the fringes while I wait for my blood to grow in strength and for some other noble to grow weak so that I mays seize his lands. That hasn’t happened, and I grow weary.”

“So?” Blacknail asked. He was getting a lot of information he hadn’t asked for.

“In normal times, I would never even think of going east, but your presence suggests an opportunity. My people have remained apart from the eastern kingdoms for good reasons. The cults tend to dislike our existence and your gathering of the wise agrees with them. They are jealous of our power, so they turn the lowborn against us and hunt us, but I don’t think they are your allies either.”

“No, I don’t like those people much, but it hardly matters. They rarely show up in the North. It’s mostly just the farmer type of humans and violent stealing types. Although there aren’t a lot of people outside the cities anymore.”

“Yes, which suggests the time is ripe for me to visit and perhaps carve out a place for myself. My kind have long thrived were we can offer our protection to the abandoned and forgotten.”

Blacknail shrugged. “It’s what everyone else is doing. Help me kill the Wolf and I’ll help you take some land.”

“That sounds a profitable basis for an alliance,” Ilisti remarked with a smile. His eyes had warmed up a little, but they were still dark and brooding.

Blacknail agreed with him. It sounded like Ilisti’s interests aligned with his. Werrick wanted to rule all the North and it didn’t sound like the Vympir would ever willingly serve the Wolf.

“There is one thing I should probably mention,” Ilisti said. “As a Vympir I occasionally need to feed on the blood of other men.”

That sounded inconvenient. Blacknail frowned. “You can’t just eat animals like everyone else? People don’t taste all that good.”

“It’s not a matter of taste, but of need. My bite paralyses people, and slowly changes their blood, so that I may return later and feast upon it.”

“More like slurp. Blood isn’t a food, it’s a liquid,” Blacknail mused aloud.

The Vympir sighed. “I would not tolerate such disrespect from a man, but I have no idea if you're being serious.”

Blacknail ignored him. This new bit of information did create some problems. He had been looking for a human to serve as a figurehead because humans didn’t seem to trust hobgoblins, but a Vympir would also probably not inspire trust. Still, Blacknail had found a useful tool here. He would just have to find some other human to be his puppet. He liked puppets.

“Alright, I will be your guide east,” Blacknail said as he looked up. “I can explain how things work there and introduce you to some people. I’m also an expert at hiding, so you won’t have to worry about the cults or anyone else.”

“Good, then we have a deal. I will help you fight the Wolf,” Ilisti said as he stood up.

The Vympir walked over to Blacknail’s side and extended an open hand. Blacknail stood up and took it. As they shook hands to seal their agreement, their inhuman eyes met and they both smiled. Blacknail liked Ilisti. He seemed like a straightforward guy.








TNT 3












After Blacknail and Ilisiti had finished their conversation, the vympir went to prepare for the journey he had agreed to undertake. Since all his men were glaring suspiciously at Blacknail and none of them looked like great conversationalists anyway, the hobgoblin wandered off into the woods to meet back up with the minions. They were right were he’d left them.

“Oh, good. You didn’t run off into the forest,” Blacknail remarked when he saw Elyias was with the hobgoblins and Khita.

Khita huffed in annoyance. “He tired. I grabbed him before he got himself lost.”

“That man was a monster. A vympir!” Elyias exclaimed as he stepped forward. He was still pale and shaking.

Blacknail put a hand on Elyias’ shoulder to steady him. “What do you know about vympirs? They seem like mutant humans to me.”

An excited gleam appeared in Khita’s eyes. “Really a vympir? Those are real?”

“I just said they were. What do you know about them?” Blacknail responded. Her sudden enthusiasm was a little unsettling.

“Just that they’re evil,” Elyias explained darkly. “Most people think they’re myths from hundreds of years ago. There are lots of tales of evil nobles with strange powers who prey on peasants, or of strangers who arrive in a village and pick the people off one by one.”

“I like the stories about vympir princes who fall in love with maidens and abduct them so they can be together forever. Usually the woman dies horribly, but it is still romantic!” Khita added as she smiled manically.

“They are terrible monsters that devour people and cause disasters,” Elyias hissed. “They hunt people at night and feed on them like beasts!”

“So, you think they are a lot like hobgoblins, eh?” Blacknail replied thoughtfully.

A startled look appeared on Elyias’ face. “Er…”

While Elyias tried to figure out what to say, one of the nearby hobgoblins took the opportunity to speak up. “So does this mean we won’t be attacking them and taking their stuff? They have some nice stuff.”

“No, they are probably our allies now,” Blacknail told him.

The hobgoblin picked his nose. “So, what do you want us to do with the sentries we caught?”

Blacknail had completely forgotten about them. “You better let them go.”

“What about their stuff? Can we keep that?”

“No, give it back. We don’t want to upset our new allies.”

“I think one of them is coming over here,” another hobgoblin remarked as he stared past Blacknail at the camp behind him.

The hobgoblin chieftain turned to see what his minion was talking about, and sure enough there was a human walking out to the edge of the forest. He was easy to see with the fire behind him, and he cast a long shadow. It was a man with a sword at his waist, but he didn’t look like Ilisti.

“My lord has sent me to talk to the one known as Blacknail,” the man announced formally once he reached the trees. His eyes roamed the darkness in search of the hobgoblins, and he didn’t seem afraid of the forest or the hobgoblins within it at all.

“I’m right here,” Blacknail replied as he stepped out of the shadows. He was feeling festive and light hearted. It wasn’t every day that you made an important new ally, and he was glad that coming to this depressing place had turned out to be productive after all.

The young man took a second to study the hobgoblin. He was calm, and didn’t flinch or look afraid at all. Blacknail found that unflappable demeanor to be annoying. He was used to getting reactions from people. Physically, the young man had short black hair, a clean-shaven face, and a patient look that spoke of a type of discipline most bandits lacked. He was shorter that his master, but he had the same red eyes.

“You’re a mutant too,” Blacknail remarked inquisitively.

“My name is Garen, and I’m a vympir, not a mutant. To call us such is an insult to our bloodline, and will not be tolerated.”

“How many of you are there? Mutants don’t usually get along.” In the wild, Blacknail had never encountered more than one mutant in the same place. He’d always assumed they ate each other.

“I am the only vympir in service to lord Vang, and as I said, we are not simple mutants. Ours is an ancient power that stretches back to the first emperors of man.”

“Oh, that sound impressive. How did you become one?” Blacknail asked. He wanted to know what he was dealing with.

“In my childhood, I was offered up by my village as a sacrifice to my lord’s family. However, I survived the offering of life and the ancient blood took root in me. Since the young lord Vang had no bond servants I was put into his service, where I have served him loyally ever since,” Garen explained. “How did you become such as you are? You are an uncommon hobgoblin.”

Blacknail frowned. No one had ever asked him that before. It was sort of a complicated question. Although, most of it probably wasn’t important.

“I was taken in by a bandit named Saeter to be his helper. He taught me everything I know, like how to fight, but he died, so now I’m trying to get revenge.” That covered the important bits.

Garen nodded in understanding. “Seeking vengeance against the enemies of your slain lord is a true servant’s duty.”

Blacknail nodded along. “Also, I’m very angry with them and want to enjoy pulling their tongues out with my claws.”

“Traditionally, I believe grim determination is the appropriate emotion for such tasks, but I don’t think anyone has ever actually said you can’t have fun doing it.”

“That’s good, but those rules probably don’t apply to me. Most rules don’t.”

“Ah, you might have a point there. Most rules of honor weren’t designed with hobgoblins in mind,” Garen admitted as he looked thoughtfully to the side.

“What were you here for, again?”

Garen looked embarrassed. “I apologize. I was momentarily distracted by your unusual demeanor.”

“Plus I look funny,” Blacknail added helpfully. If he couldn’t scare the man then he could still catch him off guard in other ways.

“Er…” Garen seemed rather uncertain of what to say now, but he collected himself and determinedly pressed on. “I was sent by my master to ask about several of our men who have disappeared.”

“Oh, them. I just gave orders for them to be returned. They should all be fine.”

“That is good. I would hate for our alliance to be marred by the stain or blood.”

“Ya, the smell is hard to get rid of, and you humans bleed everywhere.”

“…Yes.” Garen replied with careful neutrality.

Silently, Blacknail and him stared at each other for several very awkward seconds. The hobgoblin didn’t blink. Surprisingly, Khita took this opportunity to walk over and join the conversation. The surprising thing was that she hadn’t butted in earlier.

“So, you’re a vympir? Is that why your eyes are red?” Khita asked as she walked up beside Blacknail and beamed happily at Garen. “I didn’t think you guys were real.”

“Who is this?” Garen asked Blacknail. It was subtle, but he was definitely leaning away from the redhead. It was reaction the hobgoblin understood.

“She’s Khita. Someone fed her, so now she follows us around and won’t go away.”

Khita ignored the hobgoblin and focused on Garen. “I hear you drink blood. That doesn’t sound very appetizing. Does it taste different to you?”

“The taking of life is a sacred activity, that I shall not discuss with you,” Garen replied sourly.

Khita walked right up to him and looked him over. This caused Garen to look uncomfortable. Apparently, Blacknail wasn’t the only one who was used to being feared.

“Have you ever kidnapped a maiden?” Khita asked him.

A stiff smile appeared on Garen’s lips. “Having fulfilled my master’s request, I will be leaving now.”

“Bye,” Blacknail replied as the man walked out of the shadows and back to the campfire.

“He wasn’t very polite,” Khita observed as she watched him go.

With nothing else to do, Blacknail and his minions waited in the darkness under the treetop for Ilisiti to get back to them. It took almost an hour for him to appear at the edge of the light, but when he did, Blacknail went to meet him halfway.

“I just finished conversing with my subordinates and making plan. There is still lots to do, but I should be able to start heading east before noon tomorrow,” Ilisiti announced as he walked over to Blacknail.

“How many men do you have?” the hobgoblin asked.

“I have fifty-two armsmen in my service.”

“I thought you would have more. That’s not very many.”

“Quality is more important than quantity, little green monster. I could have more if I wished, but taking care of them would have been difficult. Once I’ve created a base of operations I can recruit from around my family’s old lands. There is no shortage of men there that would join my cause.”

Blacknail shrugged. “You can have both quantity and quality, big pink monster.”

An amused grin appeared on Ilisiti’s face. He seemed to have a much stronger sense of humor than Garen. “We will leave tomorrow, after I send someone to gather supplies from the village.”

“Will they deal with you? They were rather rude to us, and you’re a bandit.”

“I’m a vympir, even though they don’t owe me fealty, the people here know better than to aggravate me. The proper respect for the ancient blood has been instilled within them for generations. Being raided by me is practically an honor.”

“Neat. It would nice to buy some supplies before we leave tomorrow. How about you send someone with us?”

“Very well. I’ll send Garen with you. You shouldn’t have any problems with the villagers then.”

“Alright, that sounds good,” Blacknail replied. It also sounded fun. He should bring Khita. Amusement was hard to come by in the Green, and not to be wasted.

After talking to the vympir for a few more moments, Blacknail went off to set up his own camp. He didn’t fully trust his new allies yet, they had just met, and Ilisti’s men weren’t used to being around hobgoblins anyway. Sharing a camp overnight was thus probably a bad idea, so instead Blacknail selected a spot that was several minutes away. It was a defensible position in a small grassy clearing. They had checked it carefully for mimics before moving in, and found one right at the far edge. However, it was out of the way and mimics didn’t move much at night. If they set a watch the creature probably wouldn’t be a problem, and might even act as protection.

“What do you think of our new friends?” Blacknail asked his nearby minions when they had finished scouting the campsite. Around him, hobgoblins were trampling the grass and setting up the fire.

Khita shrugged. “I don’t see why we need their help, but they seem interesting anyway. We could do worse. It is sort of sharp to have vympirs on our side.”

“They’re vympirs! We can’t trust them,” Elyias shot back. “They will probably try to creep into our camp during the night and drink our blood while we sleep!”

“Don’t worry about that. Several hobgoblins will be watching over you while you rest,” Blacknail responded cheerfully. “From what I saw, my minions are better rangers and sneakers than the vympir’s.”

The hobgoblins in questions had just finished stomping down most the tall grass. Lurking animals could have used the plants as cover to approach unseen, so they had to be flattened.

“But you don’t know what they can do! They are mutants,” Elyias replied darkly. “Maybe Ilisti can turn into mist or put our sentries to sleep with magic!”

“Huh, that’s not a bad point,” Blacknail admitted reluctantly. He hadn’t thought of that.

Every mutant that Blacknail had ever fought had used some sort of weird magic. Vympirs undoubtedly had one as well. Did they each have different magic abilities or did they all share one?

The hobgoblin chieftain turned to look at Khita and Elyias. “You two have heard of vympirs before. Do you know any stories about them using magic like a mutant?”

“Nah, all the myths I’ve heard give them a whole bunch of abilities,” Khita replied. “In some, they turn into wolves or bats, and in others they can enslave people’s minds. Most of the stories are obvious shit meant to frighten children.”

“Sometimes they can fly or go invisible,” Elyias added after glancing quickly upwards. He still looked rather spooked. Blacknail didn’t see how vympirs were worse than any other mutants that lived in the Green. They certainly were far from the biggest.

By now, the hobgoblins had managed to gather a large stack of wood. They had also managed to get a small fire going, and the flickering light from the flames illuminated the clearing. Shadowy branches reached out from the trees at the edge. Blacknail turned to study the small tree that he knew was actually a mimic lying in wait, but it hadn’t moved.

“Maybe I can trick Ilisiti or Garen into telling me,” Blacknail mused aloud. He was rather smart.

“They might show their power if they get in a fight,” Khita remarked.

Blacknail turned to look at Elyias. “Do you feel like challenging Garen to a duel? If you insult his master I’m sure he would accept.”

“Ha! As if he would need to use some hidden power to beat me. You should do it. You’re the only one here who could give him a real challenge.”

Blacknail frowned. “That would probably ruin our alliance, so it wouldn’t work.”

“I’m sure we will see them fight before too long,” Khita pointed out.

Blacknail agreed with her, and since there wasn’t much else for them to discuss, he ordered everyone to bed down for the night. As everyone else fell asleep, he took first watch with another hobgoblin.

While his minion patrolled the edge of the clearing, Blacknail sat with his back to the fire and stared out at the forest. In the dark, the trees were a mass of shifting shadows. All the talk of mutants had put him on edge, and if anything was going to attack it would probably be during first watch. However, the forest was silent except for the chirping of insects and gentle rustling of leaves. Above the hobgoblin chieftain, the occasional cloud floated across the starry sky and briefly blanketed the moon and stars. Blacknail looked, but he didn’t see any vympirs flying up there.

Off to one side, Khita began snoring. Thankfully, a quick nudge from the toe of Blacknail’s boot caused her to roll over and shut up.

Now that there was no one else around to distract him, Blacknail begin to wonder if he was on the right path. He had a plan to get his revenge, and he was following it, but was that what he really wanted to do? What would Saeter have thought of his actions? Blacknail had no idea. Saeter had been a complex man. He would have wanted Herad to be avenged, but he hadn’t been a big fan of unnecessary violence. He had also seemed to care a lot about the people of the North.

Blacknail wasn’t sure if what he was doing benefitted the North the way Saeter had seen it. On one hand, he was about to start a war, but on the other he was making friends and protecting people! As Blacknail stared out into the darkness, he decided to just keep following the plan. He had already started it, and he couldn’t honestly think of anything else he wanted to do. Now that Saeter was dead, vengeance was the only force that propelled him forward. Without it he had no purpose.

The night grew colder, and Blacknail went to sleep after waking his replacement. Early the next morning, he led his followers back to Ilisti’s camp site. The vympir greeted them, and as promised, sent Garen to guide them to the village.

“They know you’re a bandit, right?” Khita asked as they walked off the main road and through the entrance of the village. Blacknail followed them with his hood up.

There were only a few people visible on the streets of the settlement, noticeably less than you would have seen in an eastern village at this time of day. There were also several other obvious differences. The buildings had a different style, with rounder sides and taller roofs. There were also weird fetishes made from twisted sticks in a lot of doorways and windows. Most of them were circular and braided into intricate web-like patterns. The entire place had an eerie feeling, as if something dangerous was hiding just out of sight, but it looked prosperous. The streets were clean, and the buildings were large and well maintained.

Geran shrugged as he answered Khita’s question. “They know I am of noble blood and that is all that matters. They fulfil their duties to us and we fulfill ours to them, even if my master doesn’t hold these lands.”

“What exactly are your duties?” Khita asked. “To only suck a few of them dry? To only feast on them when you’re really hungry?”

This earned her a scowl from Geran. “We protect them, from everything that would destroy them. Our might keeps both plague and the beasts of the forest at bay, and we rarely feed on villagers. Unless we are wounded or forced to expend ourselves, we can go over a year without having to take a new thrall, and most thralls are taken in battle besides.”

Two villagers that had been standing down the street noticed the newcomers. They both stiffened, and after a brief conversation, the woman hurried away while the man drew closer. As if they had received some subtle signal, all the other villagers slipped out of sight as well. As Garen and the others stopped in the middle of the road, the man hurried over. He was middle aged, dressed in a grey robe, and there was a soft cap on his head. He looked like some sort of administrator.

He immediately focused all his attention on Garen, and gave him a respectful bow. “How may I serve you, lord.”

Garen turned to Blacknail. “See, acquiring the things you need will be simple. Tell the man what you want, and we will soon be on our way.”

"Yes, it certainly is convenient to be so feared," Blacknail replied.









TNT 4










Now that Garen was with them in the village, Khita and Blacknail were able to buy food and gear in no time. The middle-aged man that had rushed over to meet them organized everything. Blacknail was sure that he was also trying to get them out of the village as soon as possible and away from the other villagers, but that was fine with him. He was used to behavior like that, although this time they didn’t even know he was a hobgoblin. The villagers were worried about Garen, even if they showed him nothing but respect.

When they were done shopping, they headed back out into the forest to meet up with the others. Not long after that, Ilisti was ready to move. Blacknail’s hobgoblins acted as scouts for the vympir’s men and guided them East. Ilisti’s men had packed their camp up and were transporting it using several horses – which Blacknail chose to ignore - and a small cart. Blacknail was fairly sure there were two corpses wrapped up in blankets on the cart, but who was he to judge?

At the front of the main group, Blacknail walked beside Ilisti. Khita, Elyias, and Garen strode behind them. Both the vympirs had horses, but they had chosen to travel on foot with their new allies for now. They were making their way along a dirt road that cut through the forest. At this pace it would take them almost two weeks to get back to Shelter.

The sky overhead was cloudy as they walked, and the wind was still. Most of the road was shaded by long branches that extended out from the forest on either side. The smell of wet earth and growing things hung heavy in the spring air, although the clouds up above were white and fluffy, so it didn’t seem like it was going to rain anytime soon. That was good. Rain would have turned the dirt road to mud and slowed them down considerably. Although the walk wasn’t too bad, Blacknail was bored so he decided to have a friendly chat with Ilisti.

“What’s your favorite way of hunting people?” he asked him.

“Excuse me?” the vympir replied as he gave the hobgoblin a surprised look.

“You’re a vympir. I’m a hobgoblin. We both hunt people. Everyone says so. I was wondering if you had any tips for me,” Blacknail explained.

“Um, no. Sorry. I’m not some beast out of an eastern folk tale, terrorizing villagers at night. I’m a lord of the ancient blood. I don’t hunt my prey. I earn my thralls in combat or they are offered to me by my gracious subjects if I am in need.”

“Well, if you ever want to start hunting people then feel free to ask me for tips. I’m very good at it.”

“I’ll keep that in mind,” Ilisti replied dryly.

Just then, a hobgoblin scout slipped out of the trees up ahead. Blacknail watched with interest as the scout jogged over to him. Had the scouts found something?

“What is it?” Blacknail asked. He hoped it was interesting.

The hobgoblin gave a little bow before answering. “Tracks, boss. They aren’t like anything we have seen before, and there are lots of them, everywhere.”

“What kind of tracks?” Blacknail’s minions weren’t all that experienced, so it was possible they were just confused.

“Weird ones, boss. The feet look small, but they have three long claws, and the way the tracks are clustered together makes us think the things have six feet. That’s a weird number of feet.”

“It is,” Blacknail mused. That description didn’t sound like anything he’d seen or heard of before, especially if these things travelled in groups. Maybe these creatures only lived in the West?

“Do you know anything that fits this description?” Blacknail asked Ilisti.

The vympir frowned thoughtfully and then grimaced. “Only one thing comes to mind, and I’m far from an expert on them, boggarts.”

“What are those?” Blacknail asked. He’d never heard of them, except it sort of sounded like something humans yelled when they stubbed their toes.

“Come up here and inform our ally,” Ilisti said as he turned back to look at Garen.

“Yes, lord,” Garen immediately replied as strode forward to join them.

“I thought boggarts were made up, like house spirits” Khita remarked as she invited herself into the conversation.

“Up until the last few years, most good people would have agreed with you.” Garen admitted. “However, that has changed. It all started with a sudden uptake in the disappearance of livestock. At first, harpies and goblins were blamed, but then herders and farmers began to find tracks similar to the ones you described. Hunters and foresters began to notice other things as well, like a sharp decrease in sightings of other creatures in certain areas, particularly goblins.”

“Huh,” Blacknail remarked. He didn’t like where this was going.

Khita shrugged. “So, you’re just giving the name to some new pest? Has anyone actually seen these things?”

“I’ve heard that a few bodies have turned up, although I’ve never met anyone who has seen the beasts themselves. However, the rumors describe insect-like creatures the size of large dogs with twisted bodies and incredibly sharp claws and teeth. They are also supposed to live underground and come up above to hunt. Maybe they hail from the Dark Paths”

“Ugh, nasty,” Khita remarked as she stuck her tongue out in disgust.

“How fresh are the tracks?” Blacknail asked his scout. He wanted to know if there were any swarms of goblin eating monsters around.

“We think they’re from yesterday,” the hobgoblin replied.

“Tell the others to be cautious and careful anyway. We don’t know much about these boggarts,” Blacknail said. There was a big difference between hunting goblins and hobgoblins, but maybe boggarts were too stupid to realize this for themselves.

The scout nodded and hurried off back into the forest.

“I’ve never heard of boggarts attacking a column of men, so we should be safe,” Garen remarked as they watched the scout leave.

“Yes, and I don’t imagine anything will be getting the drop on us with a screen of hobgoblins out there keeping watch,” Ilisti observed cheerfully. “From what I’ve seen, they are remarkably proficient scouts, as only true creatures of the Green can be.”

Blacknail nodded in agreement. “I taught them everything they know.”

The rest of the journey that day was uneventful. No horde of semi-mythical boggarts materialized to attack them. When it began to grow dark, the humans and the hobgoblins set up camp next to each other. Ilisit’s men were still uncomfortable sleeping right next to hobgoblins, and Blacknail thought it best to keep the hobgoblins out of trouble. However, before everyone started tucking in for the night, Ilisti and Garen visited Blacknail’s campfire.

“Greetings, I just wanted to stop in before took my night’s sleep,” Ilisti said as he walked over.

Blacknail, Khita, Elyias, and several hobgoblins were seated around the fire. Elyias immediately shied away from the vympirs, while everyone else greeted them.

“We’re just sitting here, discussing our favorite foods. Mine is old smelly cheese.” Blacknail replied. “You eat food, right? You don’t just drink blood, do you?”

Garen winced but Ilisti took the questions in stride and answered matter-of-factly. “We eat normal food, yes. The blood of thralls is simply the source of our power. We consume it rarely.”

“Good. The world is full of tasty things. I would hate to have an ally who couldn’t enjoy it. I’ll bring you some cheese when we get back.”

“I shall look forward to it.”

“You really shouldn’t,” Khita muttered darkly to herslef. Ilisti seemed to intimidate her in a way Garen didn’t, so she didn’t usually speak up around him. Blacknail didn’t get it. They were both vympirs.

“You humans usually don’t make your food taste strong enough,” Blacknail remarked. “I find letting it age awhile almost always makes it taste better.”

Ilisti frowned, and Blacknail didn’t think it was because of his culinary advice. “We vympirs don’t really consider ourselves humans, and most men agree with the distinction.”

“That’s silly,” Blacknail huffed. “As someone who really isn’t human, I know what humans look like. Having red eyes and magic doesn’t make you all that different. Mutant wolves are still wolves, and they usually lead wolf packs, sort of like you and your men.”

The vympir looked uncertain but then a moment later he nodded thoughtfully. “Perhaps you are right. You certainly see the issue from a fresh perspective. Huh, you have given me something unexpected to think about, my unusual green friend.”

“I like being unexpected,” Blacknail replied cheerfully. It made it easier to take things and stab people.

“Well, I should get back to my own men. I bid you goodnight,” Ilisti told them all before nodding and walking away.

Garen stayed until his liege was out of sight, and then he frowned at Blacknail. “He lets you get away with so much. Your inhumanity protects you. You are outside all our social norms, and he doesn’t hold your ignorance of them against you. He has killed men for a fraction of the disrespect you show.”

“Plus I’m handsome!” Blacknail added.

Garen scowled disapprovingly at the hobgoblin, but then Khita leaned closer and smiled at him. The vympir hesitated and then beat a quick retreat.

“He’s very flighty for a monster from legend,” Khita remarked.

Blacknail rolled his eyes. “You can annoy anyone or anything.”

Soon after that, everyone tucked in for the night. Their sleep was uninterrupted by attacks by unknown terrors from the Green, and they woke up the next morning ready to continue on their way back to Shelter.

Sometime after noon, Blacknail found himself leading the main body again while his hobgoblins were out scouting. Garen and Khita were with him, but Ilisiti was at the back somewhere, and Elyias was actually with some of the hobgoblins. He had apparently decided they were less threatening than vympirs. The way his mind worked was a mystery. Khita was doing her best to draw Garen into a conversation, while Garen did his stoic best to ignore her.

Walking so much was beginning to bore Blacknail. Movement in the forest up ahead drew his attention, but it turned out to just be two hobgoblins. They pushed through the bushes at the edge of the forest and headed over to report to their chieftain. They looked to be in a hurry, so something was probably happening.

Blacknail sighed in resignation as he watched them approach. “I sort of miss doing my own scouting, but I’m an important leader now. I don’t get to explore the forest and almost nothing exciting happens without someone telling me about it beforehand.”

“I think that’s the entire point of having scouts,” Garen remarked dryly.

Blacknail shrugged. “They are also more people for me to boss around.”

The lead hobgoblin raised an arm and shouted. “Boss! Trouble. There is a troll lurking about in the forest nearby. It has seen some of the humans and is stalking them now.”

“I’ll go get my lord!” Garen exclaimed as he ran back toward the other humans.

Blacknail watched him go and the turned back to the scout. “It is probably looking for an easy target, so we have a bit of time. Where is Elyias?”

“He’s with the scouts we sent to watch the troll,” the scout explained.

“Huh,” Blacknail remarked. That didn’t sound like something Elyias would do. “Did you tell him that was where he was going?”

“No. We wanted it to be a surprise.”

“Good job,” Blacknail replied as he gave the hobgoblin scout a thumbs up.

“I hear we have visitor!” Ilisiti yelled as he ran over with Garen at his side. He was wearing a chainmail shirt with long sleeves and armored boots.

“Yes, I was just thinking about how we were going to scare it away,” Blacknail replied. Trolls mad him nervous.

“Nonsense, it has been too long since my last troll hunt,” Ilisti countered. “Just point me in its direction and I will kill it.”

What? Blacknail couldn’t believe his ears. His jaw hung slightly open, as he turned and gave Ilisti an uncomprehending stare. “You want to fight it? For fun?”

“Yes, trolls aren’t too dangerous for a vympir as long as they don’t grow overconfident,” Ilisti explained as he smiled in anticipation. “I will have my weapons, armor, and men-at-arms with me to contain it and drive it off if I become injured.”

“Troll hunting is traditional for western lords. It impresses on others their might and power,” Garen added.

Blacknail shook his head in disbelief. “It works. I’m impressed.”

“Do they not hunt trolls in the East?” Ilisti asked curiously.

“Not unless they have no choice,” Blacknail answered. “I’ve hunted one with my old master once, but only because it was stalking us and we had to kill it before it killed us.”

“I wish I could have been there, but that was before I joined,” Khita remarked wistfully. “At least I will get to see a troll today! I’ve never seen one before.”

“You don’t hunt drakes, do you?” Blacknail asked the vympirs. That was the only beast more dangerous than trolls that he could think of.

Ilisti laughed. “Ha, no. Even the ancient blood has limits, and being swallowed alive by a giant lizard is one of them.”

“Good,” Blacknail remarked in relief. He wasn’t planning on going anywhere near a drake anytime soon, and he didn’t want a suicidal ally.

As they were talking, a squad of a dozen men hurried over. They were carrying various pieces of equipment including armor and several long lances. The men immediately began strapping the armor onto Ilisti. When they were done, one of them handed the vympir a steel helmet with a full faceplate and decorative bat wings on the sides.

Ilisti tucked the helmet under his arm and turned to Blacknail. “Alright, take me to the troll. It would be shame if it decided to wander off before we got to it.”

Blacknail looked over at the scouts. The lead one shrugged, so Blacknail sighed and motioned for them to lead the way, which they promptly did. They headed over into the forest at the side of the road, and everyone else followed them, including a dozen of Ilisti’s men who held long spears.

Blacknail noticed that Ilsiti moved surprisingly quietly considering all the metal he was wearing. He avoided branches and soft earth with ease. It must have been because of his vympir strength and great balance. How strong were vympirs? Blacknail had been assuming they weren’t much different from vessels, but if they hunted trolls then that might not be the case. He hoped they weren’t too strong. He had come here looking for an ally that needed him, not a new rival he didn’t understand.

The forest was fairly open here next to the road. The trees were tall with rough brown bark, but they had no branches near the ground and there was enough space between them that you could see fairly far. There was also next to no bushes or tall plants to block people’s sight.

After a few moments of walking, the mixed group of men and hobgoblins encountered another pair of hobgoblins that were warily watching the forest up ahead. They gave the newcomers a quick glance and then turned back to watch the trees.

“The troll beast is just on the other side of that hill,” their guide explained quietly

“Good. I’ll handle it from here,” Ilisit remarked with a smile. “Hunting trolls isn’t complicated. I’ll go in first to get its attention, while my men and you surround it. It will focus on me.”

“Do you want us to do anything?” Blacknail asked him.

“Just help out my men if they engage. Otherwise stay out of the way. Garen and my men know what to do.”

“Not a problem. Good luck!” Blacknail told him. He was planning on staying as far back possible and seeing what happened. It would at the very least be an interesting show.

As everyone watched, Ilisti lifted his lance and began walking forward. Garen and his soldiers let him get twenty feet ahead and then fanned out after him in a loose formation. All of them were walking carefully with raised spears, including Garen who held two long lances. Blacknail gave them a few seconds and then followed with his minions in tow. Those hobgoblins that had bows readied them, although arrows wouldn’t do much against a troll. The only vulnerable spots on trolls were their small eyes, and they didn’t hold still so you could line up a shot.

Ilisti stopped atop the slope, and there was a rustling sound from down below. Blacknail tensed as Ilsiti began edging forward. The human men-at-arms began spreading out to encircle the target, and the hobgoblin stayed atop the hill so that they could see what was happening. Below, the troll emerged from behind a large tree.

The beast was huge, as all trolls were. Standing on two legs, it towered over even Ilisti, who was very tall himself. Its thick hide was splattered in mud and had tufts of brown hair. Its elongated arms hung almost to the ground, and long black claws sprouted from its thick fingers. It gazed at the vympir before it with beady red eyes that were set below a thick forehead, and boar-like tusks protruded from its lips. All in all, it looked like what it was, an unthinking killing machine.

“It’s a bit of a runt,” Ilisti remarked in disappointment as he studied it.

A thunderous snort exploded out of the beast’s nostrils as it stepped towards him. It seemed slightly confused by the vympir’s behavior. The human wasn’t running and it didn’t seem frozen by fear, however that didn’t matter to much to the troll. It had only one real reaction to almost every situation anyway, hunt and kill. With startling speed, the troll reached out with its claws and lunged at Ilisti. Blacknail held his breath.










TNT 5









Branches and leaves were shredded and brushed aside as the troll leapt through the forest at Ilisti, and the its long deadly claws reached out for him. Killing intent radiated out from the beast. It was unrestrained violence in motion, and it moved almost too quickly for Blacknail to keep track off, but Ilisti was ready. In one fluid motion, the vympir stepped to the side and lowered his stance, as he brought up the tip of his lance. The troll’s claws missed him by mere inches and caught only empty air, but his weapon sank into the flesh beneath the beast’s shoulder, pushing it back. The force of the blow was incredible, but the butt of the lance was set against the earth, and although it shivered, the sturdy weapon did not break. It kept the troll away from Ilisti.

Roaring savagely in pain, the troll swiped at the vympir with a claw. Its eyes were wide with hate, and its thunderous voice ripped through the forest as its mouth stretched opened to reveal countless jagged yellow teeth. Ilisiti ducked and raised an arm to protect his head. There was a terrible scratching noise as the troll’s claws scrapped against his armor. He was knocked slightly back by the force, but he quickly righted himself and kept his balance. The troll hissed as it tried to press forward and snap at Ilisiti with its jaws, but its body was held back by the rooted lance. In front of the deadly monstrosity, Ilisiti didn’t freeze or hesitate. He was unflinching as he drew a long knife from his waist, and he grunted loudly as he rammed it up under the troll’s ribs. It sank up to the hilt, but the troll didn’t bleed. Thick green fluid oozed out of the wound for a second and then it dried, sealing the wound.

Dumbfounded, Blacknail could only stare at the spectacle. The power of both combatants was unreal. Their might defied belief, and dwarfed that of humans or hobgoblins. One of swing of the troll’s claws would have sent Blacknail flying, even if he had been wearing armor, and the idea of standing in front of charging troll was ludicrous, but it had appeared to work.

The combat didn’t let up. Ilisti stabbed the troll again with his long knife. Trolls weren’t the smartest of creatures, they didn’t need to be, but this one knew it had to try something else. Its claws weren’t doing much damage to the armored vympir who was enthusiastically trying to gut it. Eyeing the lance keeping it at bay, it raised a fist and smashed down on the weapon’s shaft. The wood splintered, and Ilisti jumped backward out of the way.

“Lance!” he yelled as he raised a hand.

Immediately, Garen pressed forward and threw him a new weapon. Ilisti caught it and leveled it at the troll. The red-eyed beast wavered as it studied its unexpectedly tough opponent, but it was a predator and it didn’t flee from creatures that were so much smaller than itself. Instead, it made a hissing noise like a kettle full of very angry snakes and stepped forward again.

The beast moved with new wariness as it slashed at Ilisti with a claw, but the vympir deftly stepped aside and responded with a stab of his lance that forced the troll to back off. Frustrated, the beast swiped at the weapon, but Ilisti danced the lance out of the way and then slashed the troll’s lead leg. It was a superficial wound, but it annoyed the creature.

“It’s too cautious. Harry it forward,” Ilisti yelled as he launched a series of quick stabs that failed to damage the troll but distracted it for several seconds.

Immediately, most of the arms-men that had been hanging back behind Ilisti rushed out to flank the troll from both sides. Garen led half of them as they circled behind the beast. Once in position, they began stompin their feet and yelling. The troll growled at them but didn’t dare turn away from Ilisti. However, this new threat unnerved it. It didn’t like being surrounded, and it wanted out. Its eyes locked on Ilsiti as it realized that the vympir was now standing alone. The green giant roared again and charged forward, with the intent of battering Ilisti aside. The vympir had other plans. He rushed to meet the charge and ruined the beast’s angle of attack. Instead of coming at Ilisiti from an angle, the two combatants hit each other head on.

Ilisti ducked under a swipe from the troll and raised his weapon. The troll’s bulk barreled forward, and the tip of the weapon sank into its gut. Quick as a snake, Ilisti managed to set the butt of his weapon against the earth, and once again the trolls own power drove the lance through its tough hide and into its soft flesh. It shrieked in pain as it tried to back away, and one of its flailing limbs hit Ilisti square in the chest. The heavily armored vympir was sent flying sideways and hit a tree before falling to the ground in a shower of leaves.

Watching from a safe distance away, Blacknail winced. “Ouch.”

However, Ilisti didn’t stay down. Almost immediately he climbed to his feet. The troll had taken a few a few steps past him, but its injuries obviously pained it and hampered its movements. It walked with a limp, and there were now two lance shafts sticking out of its body. Garen ran over and handed his lord a longsword, and then Ilisti began stomping over to the troll.

Realizing it couldn’t get away, the beast stopped trying to flee and turned to face its challenger. Its voice shook the trees as it roared again, but Ilisti kept coming. It slashed at him, but he dodged back and cut at the troll’s arms. The creature was definitely moving slower now, while Ilisti didn’t even seem tired, despite his crash into the tree.

The combatants exchanged a flurry of blows, which resulted in the troll gaining a series of small wounds all over its body, all of which instantly closed up, but then the troll stumbled. Halfway through a swing of one of its arms, its back leg gave out. Ilisti seized the advantage. He spun around the beast’s outstretched arm, and raised his blade up high. With all his power, the vympir chopped down at the trolls neck. The blade sliced through air and into flesh. There was a wet thud as metal hit bone and cut into it. As Ilisti pulled his blade free, the long ragged wound began to fill with green ooze, but that didn’t stop the troll from falling. There was another thud as the beast hit the ground face first amid a small cloud of dust. It shuddered a few times and then went still. Was it dead? Blacknail wasn’t sure. He was still shocked, and he hadn’t seen many dead trolls.

Ilisti seemed to think he was victorious. He dropped his blade and stepped back away from his fallen opponent. An arms-man ran over to pick up his lord’s sword, while two others approached and poked the troll’s sides with their spears. It didn’t move.

Taking off his helmet, Ilisti turned to give Blacknail a satisfied look. “Not a bad hunt. The troll looked a little gaunt, though. Which is strange for a healthy adult. They rarely have trouble hunting in forest such as this. The area must be short on game for some reason. Still, it’s a shame I have no hall to hang its head in. It wouldn’t be a bad trophy”

Blacknail snorted. “I’m sure you’ll get a hall for yourself eventually. I know some that wouldn’t be all that hard for you to take.” In fact, if the bout he had just seen was any indication, Blacknail wasn’t sure he had ever encountered a building that Ilisti couldn’t have taken with ease.

Ilisti grinned. “True, but keeping it is the problem. I wouldn’t want to live anywhere that I would have to deal with constant attacks by your cults or paladins.”

“They aren’t my paladins,” Blacknail replied with a roll of his eyes. “I’ve only ever met one, and now that you mention it, I’m not even sure what they’re supposed to do.”

“Ah, that’s right. I keep forgetting about your… unusual upbringing, even if you’re an Easterner.”

“The fact that I’m green should remind you,” Blacknail pointed out dryly.

“Ha, yes. However, you can also talk, which sometimes confuses me. Did the paladin by chance survive your meeting?” the vympir asked. He was clearly fishing for information. He’d perked up the moment Blacknail had mentioned meeting a paladin.

“It was a long time ago. I wasn’t allowed to kill him, but we ended up exploding a giant snake together, so it all worked out.”

Ilisiti’s eyes grew unfocused for a second. “Um, good?”

“I liked it,” Blacknail replied with a smug grin. He wasn’t going to give too much away without getting anything back in return.

The vympir’s men began cleaning up, and Blacknail sent his scouts out to make sure all the noise hadn’t attracted anything else dangerous. Trolls were solitary creatures and their presence usually scared most other beasts away, but not everything. It was possible a mutant or a drake would come looking for the source of all the commotion.

When they got back to the road and rejoined the others, Blacknail took a moment to think over what he had just witnessed. It was obvious that he’d underestimated his new vympir ally a lot. Ilisti was an incredibly formidable fighter. He was both very fast and far stronger than any vessel Blacknail had ever encountered. He would make a useful ally, but also a terrible rival.

Blacknail didn’t like being the weaker partner in an alliance. He was supposed to be in charge, but it seemed likely that Ilisti would eventually try to assert authority over him. The man was very proud and forceful. The only reason he really need Blacknail was for his expertise and skill as a guide, and over time that value would slip as Ilisti established himself in the East. However, Blacknail didn’t have any intention of giving up his position as boss. He would have to take steps to keep Ilisti in check and to learn more about him and vympirs. They must have some sort of weakness he could exploit. They probably weren’t immune to being killed in their sleep, and fire killed almost everything.

After Ilisti had taken off his armor and everyone involved in the hunt had taken a quick break, the expedition started moving again. Men called out, and the cart creaked as the horse pulling it began walking again. It was still a long way to Shelter. Blacknail took up his position at the front of the group, while Garen and Ilisti kept to the back for a while. It wasn’t until the late afternoon that the vympirs reemerged. With Garen in tow, Ilisti approached Blacknail.

“Greetings. How fare you?” Ilisti asked as he walked over.

Blacknail rolled his eyes before turning around. “I’m tired of walking and annoyed that I have to keep doing it for days. My feet hurt and the world is too big.”

“Ah, perhaps. I hope you enjoyed the hunt earlier.”

“You certainly outsmarted that starving troll that my minions found, and it was fun to watch you stab it a lot,” Blacknail replied. He was feeling a little surly, but he tried to keep his tone respectful.

“Thanks,” Ilisti responded in a dry tone, while Garen glared at the hobgoblin.

“Did you want something else?” Blacknail asked.

“Yes, I find you to be an interesting conversationalist, despite your peculiarities, or maybe because of them. Talking with you is always amusing and sometimes surprisingly illuminating. Also, allies should get to know each other.”

That suited Blacknail’s purposes so he nodded. “What do you want to talk about? I know a lot about quite a few interesting things, like all the best mushrooms you can eat.”

“Ah, I’m curious about the East. I must admit to never having travelled past Westwatch, although I’ve heard a lot about it. It must be quite different than the West.”

“The people are friendlier, if they don’t know you’re a hobgoblin, the trees are the same, and there are fewer vympirs,” Blacknail explained as he began to describe some of the other difference he had noticed. He hadn’t seen all that much of the West but he had noticed a few things.

“Oh, and the people in the West smell less like sweat and more like bitter herbs. They must eat a lot of onions,” Blacknail finished before asking a question of his own. He thought it was particularly important to describe exactly how everything smelled because humans had such useless noses. “What’s it like being a vympir?”

Ilsiti stood up straight and spoke in a reverent tone. “The burden of our responsibilities and power weighs heavy on us, but we have a sworn duty to protect our people.”

That didn’t tell Blacknail anything he wanted to know, although he hadn’t expected the vympir to just blurt out his secret weakness. The hobgoblin asked a few more questions but didn’t learn anything important, and after talking for several minutes both parties fell silent and concentrated on walking.

The next two days were rather uneventful, but on the third they neared Westwatch. While everyone else set up camp on a hidden hill in the forest, Blacknail sent Khita and Elyias into town to look around. He had been gone a while now, and he had a lot of new faces with him, so he didn’t want to run into trouble. Going himself would be riskier since he would have to go in disguise. It would also have required him to walk around, and his feet deserved a break.

Blacknail was sitting on a log next to a campfire and wiggling his bare toes to get his blood flowing, when he saw Khita and Elyias return. They looked aggravated, which wasn’t good and probably meant that they had something bad to tell him.

“We have a problem,” Khita announced sourly to confirm the hobgoblins’ suspicions.

Blacknail let his foot drop and sighed. “You never bring me good news. Why do I send you places?”

“That doesn’t make sense. I’m not responsible for what I find.”

“Maybe you should be,” Blacknail responded. He would get more good new that way.

“Are you going to actually listen to what I found?”

“I suppose I’d better. It’s my duty as your leader. What did you see in the town? Was it more trolls? A drake? Two drakes?”

Khita glared at Blacknail. “Why would there be a troll or a drake in a town. No, it’s Werrick’s men. They’ve taken over the place.”

After listening to what Khita said, Blacknail immediately put his shoes on and went to find Ilisti. The vympir needed to hear this.

“So, what seems to be the problem? We haven’t even truly left the West yet,” Ilisti asked once Blacknail had gotten everyone together.

“My enemy Werrick has been moving quickly while I was gone. His men have taken Westwatch, and his troops watch the roads now,” Blacknail explained.

This news caused Ilisti to frown and look thoughtful, while behind him, Garen kept his expression neutral and unreadable.

Khita gave the noble a cautious look and then spoke up in a respectful tone. “It’s not just here in this town, either. I talked to a bunch of people on the street and everyone is saying that the Wolf is taking over everywhere. He has troops in all the important towns and villages, and he is even collecting dues now!”

“No one is doing anything to stop him,” Elyias added. “They’ve all just rolled over like dogs. The bastard is actually doing it! He is setting himself up as some sort of king.”

“That is upsetting, and not just because of the consequences to the plans we discussed,” Ilisti remarked carefully. “There has always been an unspoken agreement about this place, that no one would claim it. Thus, your cults and lords have touched it only lightly, and those of the ancient blood have avoided it. Westwatch has always served as a buffer between lands.”

Khita shrugged. “I guess no one told Werrick that, and technically he is still just a bandit, even if everyone works for him and he also wants to be king. He probably sees no reason not to take it like every other town.”

Ilisti nodded. “Such is the way of tyrants; however, his ignorance is not an excuse. There will be repercussions for this action.”

“Like what?” Blacknail asked. He didn’t get it. From what he’d heard the western nobles didn’t exactly get along with each other, or even talk all that much.”

“A powerful noble might attempt to conquer the town and wrest it from this Werrick, while claiming it was self-defense, and his peers may look the other way now. They would have quickly acted to remove him before, so that he wouldn’t draw too much attention to the presence of the ancient blood.”

“Huh, are you thinking of giving it a shot?”Khit asked.

Ilisti chuckled dryly. “Maybe, but not anytime soon. I don’t have the forces to hold such a prize as of this moment, to say nothing of placating the populace.”

“So, what are you planning on doing about all this?” Khita asked Blacknail. “You’re the boss.”

The hobgoblin chieftain scratched his nose and began thinking. “We could probably slip past their patrols on the road, after killing only a few of them.”

Ilisti coughed politely to get everyone’s attention. “But then we would have to worry about their presence behind us, and whether or not they can get a message out. It is possible they might coordinate and set up a blockade in front of us.”

Blacknail shrugged. “I can lead us around any other humans that show up.”

“I’d rather not waste time running and hiding. It is not in my nature, Ilisti replied. “This Werrick has overextended himself here. He obviously doesn’t expect a creditable challenge to emerge, and his position seems weak. I believe the best move would be to smash his local forces, and then move on with our rear secure. My men can easily handle the troops the young woman saw within the city.”

“Sure, we could do that,” Blacknail agreed. It sounded like Ilisit’s men would be doing all the hard work anyway.

“Hmm, there is one thing I didn’t mention, but probably should if we’re going to start a brawl,” Khita added. “Rumor has it that Wolfy’s men have two combat mages with them.”

Ilisti frowned. “Wisemen? I don’t know much about them, or their capabilities in combat. In the West, they are considered dangerous and their powers are shunned by both the nobles and the common folk.”

“Smart,” Elyias huffed quietly to himself as he gave the vympir a critical look. He obviously wondered why they tolerated vympirs.

“Mages blow stuff up a lot. They point their staff at you and then boom! Fire or lightning shoots out and you die,” Blacknail explained before reciting some of his more exciting experiences fighting mages. It was kind of weird that he had done it so many times…

Ilisiti listened patiently before speaking up again. “It sounds like my plan is still viable, with some alterations and a little aid from the hobgoblins.”

Blacknail licked his lips and smiled eagerly. “Yes, let’s sack a city. I’ve always wanted to do that.”

Werrick had made his move, so now Blacknail needed to make one of his own. The people of the North only obeyed Werrick because they were afraid of him, however they would soon learn that the Wolf was far from the most terrifying warrior around. It was time for Blacknail to announce his glorious self to the world. Joy! He could already taste the blood and ash.













TNT 6









The walls of Westwatch lay before Blacknail. They were twice a man’s height and constructed of irregular rocks being held in place by gritty grey mortar. The materials had undoubtedly been taken from the rocky hills that surrounded the town. Like most human walls in the North, this one had been constructed primarily to keep dangerous wildlife out. Bears, wolves, and even trolls would have a hard time getting through or over it, which undoubtedly made the people within feel much safer. The wall also helped keep unwanted people from getting into the town, but not reliably. It could be scaled by a determined invader since most of its length wasn’t watched, and it was barely a barrier at all for Blacknail and his hobgoblins. Most of them had already climbed over it. Their light bodies and sharp claws made them excellent climbers, especially if they took off their boots so that they could use their sharp toenails.

The noonday sun was almost completely overhead, as Blacknail jumped down off the wall and onto the ground inside. He was now in a dirty alley, and there were rough-looking houses with thatch roofs to either side. As his minions gathered behind him, Blacknail pulled up his hood and rearranged his clothes to complete his disguise and cover his skin. His minions did likewise, and once everyone was ready, the hobgoblins began to move carefully deeper into the city.

With wary anticipation, the hobgoblins crept through the back alleys and toward their goal, the city gates. Blacknail had infiltrated the city and scouted out the place earlier in the day, so he knew where to go and the best way to get there undetected. There was a guard tower next to the gate that was always occupied by at least one sentry and several guards. That meant attacking it directly would be a difficult. Luckily, there were several spots along the wall that were unwatched, like the one that Blacknail and his minions had just climbed over.

There were a few people on the streets, but the hobgoblins easily avoided them. The city was nervous and on edge. The occupation by Werrick’s men was recent and the townsfolk hadn’t had time to get used to it. This worked in Blacknail’s advantage in some ways, though. Few people would be rushing to report suspicious activity to the occupiers.

Blacknail leaned out from behind the corner of a building to study a structure across the street. It was a long two-story building made of brick and stone. It was surrounded by an old low stone wall that looked like it was being worked on and shored up, although there were no workers present right now. This was the place that Werrick’s men had taken as their headquarters in Westwatch. It was both defensible and just down the street from the city gates. Blacknail studied it for a few moments, but he didn’t see any activity at the windows or anyone outside, so he signaled to his minions and they continued on.

The hobgoblins hurried down the road and past an abandoned cart, before darting back into an alley where they could look out at the gate. There was a simple guard tower next to a double wooden door that could be swung shut to block the way into the city. There were several armed men loitering around near the bottom of the tower. As Blacknail watched, a man on horseback approached from outside. One of the guards walked over to talk to him, and then waved him inside a moment later. None of the other guards did more than look over briefly. Most of them were leaning up against the wall or standing around lazily. They didn’t seem that organized or motivated, which was what Blacknail expected from Werrick’s men. They had all probably been deserters and bandits not too long ago.

After taking a moment to go over the plan in his head again and make sure he had it right, Blacknail looked back over his shoulder. There were two dozen hobgoblins behind him, and all of them looked ready to go. Most of them were grinning in anticipation and licking their lips. Their prey lay ahead, and they had been promised blood and loot. Hobgoblins were simple creatures. That was all they wanted from life, and Blacknail didn’t mind giving it to them.

“It’s time to wet your teeth and blades with red, but remember the plan,” Blacknail said as he gave them all a harsh glare. “Sow chaos and take out any armed humans you see, but be ready to regroup on the signal. If you run off or get lost then you will be left behind, and you will get a kicking from me if you somehow survive, which is unlikely.”

“Yes, boss!” several of the hobgoblins instantly replied. Some of them also threw him sloppy salutes. The others just nodded and grinned in delight.

Blacknail wasn’t convinced that they would obey. Sighing to himself, he pulled out a vial of Elixir and took a swig from it. He then charged across the road, as his minions fell in behind him. They raced toward the unsuspecting guards, most of whom were looking out in the wrong direction, since they assumed any attack would come from outside the city. It wasn’t until Blacknail was within thirty feet of them that someone raised the alarm. A guard near the wall had turned to look in their direction and seen them.

“Watch out! I think we’re under attack from within,” the man yelled to his companions as he drew his sword.

The other guards reacted quickly, despite their surprise. They drew their weapons as they spun around. Six of them clustered together, and they stepped forward to form a line and buy time for their allies. Blacknail swerved to meet them, as he drew his own weapon. Right before meeting the enemy, he burned a bit of Elixir and sped up ahead of his minions. Power flared throughout his body and carried him forward. Air flowed around him and pulled his hood back, as he slammed into the guards. He laughed manically, and his blade flashed as he hacked at the lead guard’s exposed arm. The man screamed and stumbled back as his flesh was cut and blood spurted out. Blacknail’s speed and fury had shocked them.

“It’s a hobgoblin. They all are!” one of the men yelled. He sounded shocked and more than a little scared, which excited Blacknail.

“By the gods, you’re right!” another guard at the back of the group facing the hobgoblins shouted in response. He was so terrified that his voice broke, and he stumbled backwards.

Sensing their sweet fear, Blacknail redoubled his assault. He didn’t need the strange magical sense that he’d gained to know that fear was slowing the men’s responses, but he used it. As he batted aside a shaky blade, Blacknail reached out with his magic and touched his preys' minds. He could sense the glowing fear in their minds, and it was simple for him to feed that spark and make it grow into a fire.

Ducking under an off-balance slash at his head, Blacknail stabbed the attacker in the gut and then quickly withdrew his blade. The man spat up blood and fell. Swirling about, Blacknail blocked another slash and kicked the swordsman in the groin. There was a satisfying crunch and the man squeaked shrilly as he rose up an inch into the air. Blacknail was already turning to deal with his next target, and then his hobgoblin minions crashed into the guards. Frozen in fear and with Blacknail running amok in their midst, they were cut down like wheat by the wave of hobgoblins.

Another large group of about half a dozen guards had formed beneath the sentry tower. After finishing off a fallen guard by slashing his neck, Blacknail stalked over to confront them. He wanted to keep fighting. The scent of blood saturated the air, and it filled Blacknail with red-hot energy, mixing with the power of the Elixir that pumped though his veins, driving him forward. He needed to fight and dance upon the corpses of his vanquished foes. What joy that would bring!

Hesitantly, a guard with a spear stepped forward and stabbed at Blacknail. The hobgoblin grinned as he danced aside and then lunged forward with his blade raised high. He slashed down, and the terrified guard jumped back. The guard hit the man behind him and they both fell in a pile. Blacknail took this opportunity to unleash a flurry of blows upon all the other assembled guards. His sword knocked blades aside and cut through flesh, until several other hobgoblins joined him in cutting down the last few survivors. When the final one was dead, Blacknail took a deep breath to calm his fury and looked around. It was probably time for him to do boss things, so he needed to keep his head clear.

There were no guards left standing anywhere in sight, although there were corpses piled everywhere, including one that belonged to a hobgoblin. One of his arms had been mangled and hung loose. The cut must have hit a vein because the hobgoblin lay in a pool of his own blood. Blacknail scowled at the corpse for a moment and then moved on. He could afford to lose minions, and it hadn’t been anyone important. In fact, Blacknail had found the dead hobgoblin to be one of his more annoying minions. If he had been better at life he would still be alive now, but he hadn’t been, so his death wasn’t Blacknail’s fault.

Just then, there was a stomping of boots. Blacknail looked up in alarm, in case it was enemy reinforcements, but he quickly realized the noise was coming from the wrong direction. The stomping sound was rising from outside the gate, which meant it was probably allies. Indeed, when Blacknail looked over, he saw Ilisti leading a formation of troops inside the city. The vympir was fully armored in chain and plate, but he was wearing a new helm. Unlike the one he had worn when facing the troll, this one was open at the front so that his mouth was visible, even if his nose and eyes were protected. Behind the vympir's men, came Khita and Elyias.

“Ha, I see everything is going well so far. You’ve secured the gate for us without any problems. That speaks well of your capability,” Ilisti remarked as he walked over to Blacknail’s side. He sounded excited.

“Yes, but that’s the easy part,” Blacknail replied. “Now you need to hold the gate.”

The vympir turned to study the city. “We can handle it. Have you seen any sign of the wise-men?”

Blacknail shook his head. “No, they must be hiding, but if they show themselves I will deal with them, as I promised I would. Mages die easily enough if you do it right.”

“Make sure of it,” Ilisti replied grimly. For all is supposed confidence, he sounded a little fearful of the mages.

“I will. Just hold the gate and wait,” Blacknail told him before turning and walking back to his minions.

“I’m going with you,” Khita yelled as she ran after him. Blacknail sighed but didn’t try to dissuade her. He was busy, and it wasn’t worth the effort.

At this point, most the hobgoblins were either watching Ilisti’s men or looting the fallen guards. However, they had all been keeping an eye on their leader and formed up when he yelled to get their attention. They knew they would get a kicking if they ignored him or looked inattentive.

Blacknail pointed to a pair of hobgoblins. “You two stay with me. The rest of you, start setting fires and chasing people, but don’t go far and watch for the signals. You all know the plan. Follow it.”

The hobgoblins nodded and did as they were told. Most of them had already dropped their hoods, but those that hadn’t did so now. For this next part of the action, Blacknail wanted everyone to know who was attacking. It was time to make sure everyone heard of Blacknail the hobgoblin and his tribe of savage killers. Word of his might and ability to fight Werrick needed to spread throughout the North.

The hobgoblins had orders to spread out and sow chaos, and that’s what they did. The hobgoblins ran down the streets and began busting through windows and ransacking everything in sight. There were screams as people inside the nearby homes saw them.

“Sweet, I’m getting in on this,” Khita shouted as she ran over to join them.

Blacknail sighed again, but let her go. The town was apparently going to be raided by a bunch of hobgoblins and one young redheaded woman. Whatever. He didn’t want to look after her anyway.

Blacknail led the minions he had selected over towards the enemy base. The streets were completely empty now. Shouts from the fighting and bystanders who had ran off had alerted the city that someone was attacking the gate. The townsfolk had reacted by withdrawing into their homes and hoping whatever was happening passed them by. However, Blacknail did see several people peek out at him from nearby windows. He ignored them, and led his minions to a two story home he had picked out earlier. Blacknail kicked the door open and stormed inside. There was a brief scuffle as they subdued the surprised man inside, but then they left his unconscious body behind and headed upstairs. Up there, Blacknail walked over to a bedroom window and looked out. He could see both the enemy base and all the streets around it clearly.

The walled compound that Werrick’s men had taken as their own was buzzing with activity now. Dozens of men were running in and out, and a mob was forming up in the courtyard out front. They already outnumbered Ilisti’s troops, and more men were still joining them, but that was Ilisti’s problem. Blacknail ignored them and looked for any sign of the mages. Dealing with them was his mission, however he didn’t see anyone holding a staff or displaying any other signs that they were mages. Everyone he could see looked like thugs or soldiers.

Patiently, Blacknail watched for several minutes as the soldiers finished assembling and headed off to the gate, but neither of the mages showed themselves. A few moments later, the sound of fighting reached Blacknail’s ears, but he couldn’t see what was going at the gate from his vantage point. He didn’t hear any explosions though, so Ilisti was probably fine. If he could handle a troll he could deal with some normal human soldiers.

Just as he was about to give up and retreat, Blacknail spotted movement in the compound. A small squad of soldiers rushed out and began running to the gate. In their midst was a man holding a long staff.

Blacknail grinned “There he is!”

“The guy you want to kill?” a hobgoblin asked as he perked up and looked over Blacknail’s shoulder.

There wasn’t enough room at the window for everyone, and hobgoblins got bored easily, so they had found ways to distract themselves. One hobgoblin had been sleeping on the bed, and the other had carried the unconscious man upstairs and had been poking him in the hope that he would wake up, so he could knock him unconscious again.

“Yes, we’re going to kill him,” Blacknail replied as he rushed out of the room.

“Yeah!” the hobgoblins exclaimed as they followed after him.

The group of soldiers with the mage had already passed by the house, so Blacknail slipped out the front door and quickly followed them. The street was empty except for the mage’s guards.

“Get your bows ready,” told his minions as he readied his own.

The best way to kill mages was from afar, before they saw you coming. It was easier not to die in a fiery explosion that way.

“Release all together at my command,” Blacknail ordered the hobgoblins when they all had their bows in hand. “Go!”

One of the guards heard something and turned to look, but it was too late. Four arrows zoomed through the air towards the mage’s exposed back. Two of them missed completely, but the others passed through the soldiers and slammed into the mage. As the mage dropped his staff and fell, his guards spun around.

“Now we leave,” Blacknail remarked as he dashed away at top speed. He could probably finish the soldiers himself, but that wasn’t his job, and he needed to keep an eye out for the other mage.

“After them!” one of the soldiers yelled.

Instead of going back to the house, Blacknail slipped into an alley and headed for the gate. It was time to check on the fight there, and he wanted to make sure that the second mage hadn’t somehow slipped by him.

With the dead mage’s guards in pursuit, Blacknail and his minions zipped through a maze of alleys and then scrambled up a drain pipe and over a wall. There was cursing from behind him as the guards were forced to stop in front of the barrier. Ignoring them, Blacknail led the way down another alley. There was a pile of barrels there he used as a springboard so that he could jump up and reach the roof. Pulling himself up, he crouched on the roof and surveyed the fight happening at the gate.

Ilisiti’s men were still outnumbered but they were holding their ground. They had formed up into a bent line formation right in front of the gate, with Ilisti himself at the front. The vympir was cutting down enemy soldiers left and right as Werrick’s men tried to push him and his men outside the city. They weren’t having much luck. Down the street, a few buildings were starting to catch fire, and Blacknail saw two hobgoblins chase a man down the road.

“Can we join in the fun?” a hobgoblin asked as he crouched down beside Blacknail. “I want to find some shiny trophies to take.”

“Fine, let’s go,” Blacknail responded.

He had no idea where the other mage was, but Ilisti didn’t look like he needed any help. The men attacking him were like water splashing against a rock. As Blacknail watched, Ilisti grabbed an enemy swordsman, picked him up, and bit his neck before throwing him aside. Ya, it was time for Blacknail to start rounding up his minions. Also, he needed to go look for Khita. Knowing her, she was probably doing something stupid that would ruin all his plans if he didn’t stop her.











INT : ASP









A skittering sound echoed out from every direction. It wasn’t that loud, but the sound bounced eerily through the dark confines of the tunnel. Unfazed, the watcher waited patiently in the darkness as the noise grew louder. Soon it would complete the mission that it had been commanded to fulfill, and service to the Host was all. It was a warrior and the purpose of life was obedience.

The cave around the warrior was dark and dank. The only sources of light were small glowing mushrooms that grew in clumps on the ground and from the walls, but that was enough for the warrior. Its four eyes shimmered as they drank up all the light, and they allowed the warrior to see the shiny Harvester beetles that were tending to the nearby mushrooms.

A few moments later, a mob of shadowy figures emerged from a side passage. The mass of skinny limbs and dark carapace came to stop before the watcher, and the skittering sound died down. The new arrivals were short. They didn’t even come up to the watcher’s shoulders. One of the creatures stepped forward and began making a strange mix of hisses and clicks. It was a member of the Host’s worker cast.

The warrior listened and then replied in a similar way. When he was done, the lead worker bowed, and the warrior began to return the way he had come. The tunnel was once again full of the sound of claws scrapping against stone as the workers followed him.

They passed several small Harvester plantations, which they left alone out of respect. The mounds were built from piles of organic mass gathered from the depths and above ground. They were covered in many different types of mushrooms, some of which glowed or glimmered different colors. Sometimes shapes that were much larger than harvesters moved among the fungi, but the shadowy creatures all avoided or fled from the travelers. Clusters of stalactites hung from the ceilings, and occasionally drops of water dripped down from them to splash against the stone floor. The mob of skittering creatures moved past it all unimpeded.

Soon, they emerged into a circular cavern that was illuminated by a dull light. Across the chamber stood two more warriors, who were guarding the far passage. Both the warriors were armored in thick black carapace, had four shining eyes, and sharp mandibles protruding from their mouths. Like the workers, they had six legs, but they were standing on four of them. Using their top pair of limbs, one of the warriors held a long spear, while the other held a tall staff. Both the staff and the spear were made from a bone-white material that was twisted and looked like it had been grown instead of crafted. The top of the staff held a glowing white crystal, which was the source of the dim light that filled the cave.

After a brief nod of acknowledgement from the guards, the newly arrived warrior led his worker charges into the passage beyond them. They came out into a huge cavern that had a high roof and was hundreds of feet across. An underground river flowed through the middle of it, filling the chamber with a gentle lapping sound. Around the river, dozens of workers were busy with varied tasks. Using their claws, they tended to the heaps of dirt and refuse they had collected. Like giant Harvesters, the workers built and rooted through the piles. However, they weren’t growing mushrooms. There were very little fungi in sight. Instead, the workers seemed to be reaching inside the piles and extracting something. Claws emerged from dark rotting soil with long white filaments clutched within them. The thin shapes squirmed and flailed about in the air as the beetle-like workers gathered them. They were worms. The entire cavern was a farm for huge white worms.

The warrior was undaunted by the sight, although it made his stomach rumble slightly from hunger. His mandibles clicked softly as he thought about the sweet taste of slimy worm flesh, but he banished the thought. He had a duty to fulfill, and there was no time to consider anything else. He had been trained well, and he would eat his fill later. There was more than enough food for all the servants of the Host. Under the leadership of the noble caste, the Host had greatly expanded its agricultural operations, so that the next grand spawning could be the biggest ever. The Host's numbers were growing in leaps and bounds, as was their destiny. Soon.

At this point, most of the workers that had been following the warrior walked off to seek their next task. Only their leader kept shadowing the warrior and following behind him. Together, they passed through several more caverns. Some of them were farms of various sizes that teams of workers were taking care of.

Eventually, they entered an incredibly large cavern. The distant walls were veiled by darkness that seemed to stretch on forever, and the roof hung hundreds of feet overhead. Hundreds of towers made of some sort of dark resin-like material stretched from the floor to the ceiling, and similarly constructed walkways and bridges connected the buildings. All throughout the darkness little pinpricks of white light glowed softly, like stars in the night sky. A nearby light post revealed the source of the dull illumination. There was a small mana crystal sitting atop it.

A steady chorus of whispering and tapping echoed through the cavern. The dim light glinted off countless black carapaces, as workers and warriors scurried along the bridges and ramps that led in every direction. The darkness here flowed and roiled with the gathered creatures’ endless obscured movements.

The warrior and the worker submerged themselves into the flow of their kind, as they headed to a ramp that twisted its way up one of the largest towers. They ascended the incline, and when they were halfway to the ceiling, they entered the tower through a gaping irregular entrance in the resin. It was quiet and completely dark within the room, and after stepping inside both of them stood at attention and waited.

From the impenetrable darkness, two large creatures emerged. They were as tall as the warrior but with thicker builds. Their bellies were rounder and the armor at back of their heads was longer and covered with ridges, although they had the same general shape and black carapace. With a series of clicks and raspy grunts they addressed the warrior and the worker. These were administrators, the highest servants of the nobility, and their words were not to be questioned.

When they were done talking, the warrior responded. He told them all about what the scouts had discovered above ground and the feed they had brought back with them. Of particular importance was their observations of the humans, the ancient invaders. The nobility and the administrators wanted to map out the location of as many human settlements as possible. The resurgence was coming, and the Host would soon reclaim what had once been theirs. The exile had been long ago and they were no longer what they had once been, they were now the Host. Their weaknesses had been stripped from them during their retreat into the darkness below. The deep places and its beasts had tried to devour them, but they had devoured them instead. The exiles had learned much and taken their enemy’s strength as their own. Under the divine guidance of the nobility, the casts had been formed, and the Host had been forged into a single will with a single purpose. Soon.

